California, session 20252026, AB604.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 21400) is added to Division 21 of the Elections Code, to read: CHAPTER 5. Congressional Districts21400. This chapter sets forth the congressional districts.21401. Congressional District 01 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 01BUTTE, GLENN, LASSEN, PLUMAS, SIERRA, TEHAMAPartial Counties in Congressional District 01LAKEWhole Tracts in Lake County0001.00, 0003.00, 0004.01, 0004.02, 0005.01, 0005.02, 0006.01, 0006.02, 0007.03, 0007.04, 0008.01, 0008.02, 0009.01, 0009.02, 0010.00, 0011.01Partial Tracts in Lake County0007.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 20920011.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1024, 1026, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1059, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 20400012.00--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 40210013.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 20190013.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006MENDOCINOWhole Tracts in Mendocino County0101.00, 0107.00, 0108.01, 0108.02, 0113.00, 0114.00, 0115.01, 0115.02, 0116.00, 0117.00, 0118.00Partial Tracts in Mendocino County0102.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2076, 2078, 2079, 2082, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2099, 2100, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2129, 2135, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2259, 22600103.00--the following census blocks:5067, 5070, 5071, 5072, 5105, 5106, 5107, 5108, 51090106.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2073, 2074, 2077, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 30250106.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1080, 1081, 1085, 1086, 1088, 1089, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1113, 1114, 1115, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220109.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130111.02--the following census blocks:1091, 10920112.00--the following census blocks:1027, 1091, 1105, 1108, 1109, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2035, 2036, 2044, 2045, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2062, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2070, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025SONOMAWhole Tracts in Sonoma County1514.04, 1514.06, 1515.04, 1515.06, 1517.01, 1517.02, 1518.00, 1519.00, 1520.00, 1521.00, 1522.01, 1522.03, 1522.04, 1522.05, 1523.00, 1524.01, 1524.02, 1525.01, 1525.02, 1527.01, 1527.02, 1528.01, 1528.03, 1528.04, 1529.03, 1529.04, 1529.05, 1529.06, 1530.01, 1530.02, 1530.03, 1530.05, 1530.06, 1531.02, 1531.03, 1531.04, 1532.01, 1534.05, 1534.06, 1536.01, 1537.11, 1537.12, 1538.04, 1538.06, 1538.07, 1538.08, 1538.09, 1538.10, 1538.11, 1539.02, 1539.03, 1539.04, 1539.05, 1540.00, 1542.01, 1542.02Partial Tracts in Sonoma County1514.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2038, 2039, 2040, 20411514.05--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 4009, 40101515.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30181515.05--the following census blocks:1002, 1006, 1007, 10121516.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30131516.02--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 30311526.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2005, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 50101526.02--the following census blocks:1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 10641532.02--the following census blocks:1000, 20081533.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2032, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40081533.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30121534.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40131534.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4002, 40071536.02--the following census blocks:2005, 3006, 3007, 30081537.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 40201541.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4012, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4059, 4060, 40611543.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1081, 1082, 1179, 1180, 1181 21402. Congressional District 02 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 02DEL NORTE, HUMBOLDT, MARIN, MODOC, SHASTA, SISKIYOU, TRINITYPartial Counties in Congressional District 02MENDOCINOWhole Tracts in Mendocino County0104.00, 0105.00, 0110.01, 0110.03, 0110.04, 9901.00Partial Tracts in Mendocino County0102.00--the following census blocks:2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2077, 2080, 2081, 2083, 2098, 2101, 2102, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2247, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2261, 2262, 2263, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4079, 4080, 4081, 4082, 4083, 4084, 4085, 4086, 4087, 4088, 4089, 4090, 4091, 4092, 4093, 4094, 4095, 4096, 4097, 4098, 4099, 4100, 4101, 4102, 4103, 4104, 4105, 4106, 4107, 4108, 4109, 4110, 4111, 4112, 4113, 41140103.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5050, 5051, 5052, 5053, 5054, 5055, 5056, 5057, 5058, 5059, 5060, 5061, 5062, 5063, 5064, 5065, 5066, 5068, 5069, 5073, 5074, 5075, 5076, 5077, 5078, 5079, 5080, 5081, 5082, 5083, 5084, 5085, 5086, 5087, 5088, 5089, 5090, 5091, 5092, 5093, 5094, 5095, 5096, 5097, 5098, 5099, 5100, 5101, 5102, 5103, 5104, 5110, 5111, 5112, 5113, 5114, 51150106.01--the following census blocks:2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2072, 2075, 20760106.02--the following census blocks:1052, 1064, 1065, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1087, 1090, 1091, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1112, 11160109.00--the following census blocks:1016, 10340111.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 30840112.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1106, 1107, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 2001, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2063, 2067, 2068, 2069, 3026SONOMAWhole Tracts in Sonoma County1507.01, 1508.00, 1509.01, 1509.02, 1510.00, 1511.00, 1535.02, 1537.07, 1537.08, 1537.09, 1537.10, 1543.05, 1543.06, 1543.07, 1543.08, 9901.00Partial Tracts in Sonoma County1507.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40061512.05--the following census blocks:2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 20261534.03--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 10131534.04--the following census blocks:4001, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40111535.01--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 40191536.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30171537.05--the following census blocks:1030, 10311543.04--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1182, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036 21403. Congressional District 03 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 03NEVADAPartial Counties in Congressional District 03EL DORADOWhole Tracts in El Dorado County0302.01, 0302.02, 0303.01, 0303.02, 0304.02, 0304.03, 0304.04, 0305.02, 0305.04, 0305.06, 0305.07, 0313.02, 0314.05, 0314.06, 0316.01, 0316.02, 0319.00, 0320.01, 0320.02, 9900.00Partial Tracts in El Dorado County0306.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1011, 1012, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2021, 2030, 2032, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4079, 4080, 4081, 4082, 4083, 4084, 4085, 4086, 4087, 4088, 4089, 4090, 4091, 4092, 4093, 4094, 4095, 4096, 4097, 4098, 4099, 4100, 4101, 4102, 4103, 4104, 4105, 4106, 4107, 4108, 4109, 4110, 4111, 4112, 4113, 4114, 4115, 4116, 4117, 4118, 4119, 4120, 4121, 4122, 4123, 4124, 4125, 4126, 4127, 4128, 4129, 4130, 4131, 4132, 4133, 4134, 4135, 4136, 4137, 4138, 4139, 4140, 4141, 4142, 4143, 4144, 4145, 4146, 4147, 4148, 4149, 4150, 4151, 4152, 4153, 4154, 4155, 4156, 4157, 4158, 4159, 4160, 4161, 4162, 4163, 4164, 4165, 4166, 4167, 4168, 4169, 4170, 4171, 4172, 4173, 4174, 4175, 4176, 4177, 4178, 4179, 4180, 4181, 4182, 4183, 4184, 4185, 4186, 4187, 4188, 4189, 4190, 4191, 4192, 4193, 4194, 4195, 4196, 4197, 4198, 4199, 4200, 4201, 4202, 4203, 4204, 4205, 4206, 4207, 4208, 4209, 4210, 4211, 4212, 4213, 4214, 4215, 4216, 4217, 4218, 42190306.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1063, 10660313.01--the following census blocks:1004, 1040, 10410314.08--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 20380314.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102PLACERWhole Tracts in Placer County0201.04, 0201.05, 0201.06, 0201.07, 0202.00, 0203.00, 0204.01, 0204.02, 0205.01, 0205.02, 0206.01, 0206.04, 0206.08, 0215.01, 0215.02, 0216.03, 0218.01, 0218.02, 0219.01, 0219.02, 0220.02, 0220.11, 0220.13, 0220.14, 0221.00, 0222.00, 0223.00, 9900.00Partial Tracts in Placer County0206.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3017, 30180206.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170206.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2019, 2023, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 20460211.03--the following census blocks:10020211.23--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4008, 4011, 40180212.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30160212.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 20250213.04--the following census blocks:3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 30330216.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 20310235.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 20010238.00--the following census blocks:2019, 2020SACRAMENTOWhole Tracts in Sacramento County0029.00, 0030.01, 0030.02, 0031.01, 0031.02, 0032.02, 0032.03, 0032.04, 0044.01, 0046.02, 0046.03, 0046.04, 0047.01, 0047.02, 0048.01, 0048.02, 0050.03, 0050.04, 0052.02, 0052.04, 0055.05, 0055.06, 0055.08, 0055.09, 0055.10, 0056.01, 0056.05, 0056.06, 0057.01, 0057.02, 0058.01, 0058.03, 0058.04, 0059.03, 0059.04, 0060.02, 0060.03, 0060.04, 0061.01, 0061.02, 0062.03, 0062.04, 0077.01, 0077.02, 0078.01, 0078.02, 0080.05, 0080.06, 0080.07, 0080.08, 0080.09, 0080.10, 0081.22, 0082.09, 0084.02, 0084.03, 0084.04, 0085.01, 0085.04, 0085.05, 0085.06, 0085.07, 0085.08, 0085.09, 0085.10, 0085.12, 0085.13, 0087.02, 0087.03, 0087.04, 0087.06, 0087.07, 0087.08, 0088.02, 0088.03, 0089.05, 0089.07, 0089.08, 0089.09, 0089.10, 0089.11, 0089.12, 0089.13, 0090.04, 0090.05, 0090.06, 0090.07, 0090.08, 0090.10, 0090.11, 0091.03, 0091.05, 0091.06, 0091.07, 0091.08, 0091.09, 0091.10, 0091.11, 0091.12, 9883.00Partial Tracts in Sacramento County0016.01--the following census blocks:2017, 2023, 20240017.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 10360044.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120045.01--the following census blocks:1010, 2000, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180045.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150049.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2022, 2023, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110050.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220051.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2012, 20140052.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20040054.02--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 10130054.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1018, 1019, 1020, 3000, 3002, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 60130055.02--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170059.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4016, 4017, 40180062.02--the following census blocks:2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30040076.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 40020079.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1011, 1012, 1023, 1024, 10250081.39--the following census blocks:10060082.06--the following census blocks:10000082.07--the following census blocks:5004, 50050082.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30240086.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110092.01--the following census blocks:2001, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2024, 2025, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064 21404. Congressional District 04 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 04COLUSA, NAPA, SUTTER, YUBAPartial Counties in Congressional District 04LAKEPartial Tracts in Lake County0007.02--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 30250011.02--the following census blocks:1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 10580012.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 20320013.01--the following census blocks:1015, 10180013.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047PLACERWhole Tracts in Placer County0214.01, 0214.03, 0225.00, 0232.00, 0233.00, 0234.00, 0235.02, 0236.00, 0237.00, 0239.00Partial Tracts in Placer County0209.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1022, 1027, 10280211.23--the following census blocks:4005, 4006, 40280213.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 40300213.23--the following census blocks:2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 4013, 40140213.27--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 10480213.28--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5019, 5020, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5051, 50520216.04--the following census blocks:10110230.00--the following census blocks:2013, 20140235.01--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 20090238.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034SACRAMENTOWhole Tracts in Sacramento County0072.02, 0072.06, 0072.07, 0072.08, 0072.09, 0074.17, 0074.26, 0074.27, 0074.30, 0074.31, 0074.38Partial Tracts in Sacramento County0071.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1046, 1047, 1072, 1073, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 10910071.06--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 40030071.07--the following census blocks:2007, 2008SONOMAWhole Tracts in Sonoma County1501.00, 1502.03, 1502.04, 1502.05, 1502.06, 1503.03, 1503.04, 1503.05, 1503.06, 1505.01, 1505.02, 1506.01, 1506.02, 1506.03, 1506.07, 1506.09, 1506.10, 1506.11, 1506.12, 1512.03, 1512.04, 1512.06, 1513.01, 1513.05, 1513.06, 1513.07, 1513.08, 1513.09, 1513.10, 1513.11Partial Tracts in Sonoma County1507.02--the following census blocks:10031512.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2027, 20281514.03--the following census blocks:2008, 2023, 2035, 2036, 20371514.05--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40081515.03--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 10111515.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20171516.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2016, 2017, 20281516.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 3018, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 30361526.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2008, 20091526.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 10691532.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30241533.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 20311533.02--the following census blocks:20251535.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 10071541.00--the following census blocks:4009, 4010, 4011, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4054, 4058, 4062, 4063YOLOWhole Tracts in Yolo County0105.01, 0105.05, 0105.08, 0105.09, 0105.10, 0105.11, 0105.12, 0105.13, 0106.02, 0106.05, 0106.09, 0106.10, 0106.11, 0107.01, 0107.03, 0107.04, 0108.00, 0109.01, 0109.02, 0110.01, 0110.02, 0111.01, 0111.02, 0111.03, 0112.03, 0112.04, 0112.07, 0112.08, 0112.09, 0112.10, 0112.11, 0113.01, 0113.02, 0113.03, 0113.04, 0114.00, 0115.00Partial Tracts in Yolo County0101.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1028, 1032, 1061, 1062 21405. Congressional District 05 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 05ALPINE, AMADOR, CALAVERAS, INYO, MARIPOSA, MONO, TUOLUMNEPartial Counties in Congressional District 05EL DORADOPartial Tracts in El Dorado County0314.08--the following census blocks:2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 20330314.09--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036FRESNOWhole Tracts in Fresno County0043.01, 0044.05, 0044.06, 0044.10, 0044.11, 0055.03, 0055.04, 0055.05, 0055.07, 0055.08, 0055.09, 0055.12, 0055.13, 0055.14, 0055.15, 0055.16, 0055.18, 0055.20, 0055.22, 0055.24, 0055.25, 0055.26, 0055.27, 0055.28, 0055.29, 0056.06, 0057.01, 0057.02, 0057.03, 0059.07, 0059.13, 0059.14, 0064.05, 0064.06, 0064.08, 0064.09Partial Tracts in Fresno County0042.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3027, 30280044.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 20310044.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070056.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 40140056.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 10060057.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30240058.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 10170058.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 10200064.07--the following census blocks:1014, 1016, 1017, 2006, 2008, 2009, 20100064.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1108, 1109MADERAWhole Tracts in Madera County0001.02, 0001.03, 0001.04, 0001.06, 0001.09, 0001.10, 0001.11, 0005.09, 0005.16, 0007.01Partial Tracts in Madera County0002.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1081, 1082, 1084, 1085, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 20340002.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2013, 2014, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2064, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2083, 21120002.04--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1010, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1046, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2010, 2011, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2043, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 30460003.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30240003.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 5000, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 50290005.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 30380005.12--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 20280005.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 30310005.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4029, 4030, 40310005.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 20380005.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1039, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1054, 10550005.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20050006.03--the following census blocks:3000, 30010006.04--the following census blocks:1000, 10010007.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 30270011.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1058, 1059, 1060, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3069, 3070SAN JOAQUINWhole Tracts in San Joaquin County0049.03, 0049.04, 0049.05, 0049.06Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County0047.04--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1026, 1028, 10290048.00--the following census blocks:1033, 4035, 4046, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4063, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 40720050.01--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 30060050.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3009, 3010, 4015STANISLAUSWhole Tracts in Stanislaus County0001.01, 0001.02, 0002.01, 0002.02, 0002.04, 0002.05, 0003.01, 0003.02, 0003.03, 0003.04, 0004.03, 0004.04, 0004.05, 0004.06, 0004.07, 0005.01, 0005.03, 0005.05, 0005.06, 0005.11, 0005.12, 0008.01, 0008.05, 0008.06, 0009.05, 0009.06, 0009.07, 0009.08, 0009.09, 0009.10, 0009.11, 0009.13, 0009.14, 0009.15, 0010.01, 0011.00, 0020.06, 0028.01, 0028.02, 0028.03, 0029.03, 0029.04, 0036.07, 0036.08, 0036.09, 0036.10, 0036.11Partial Tracts in Stanislaus County0008.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2013, 2014, 20150010.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30100012.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 3000, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 30100013.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018, 6019, 6020, 6021, 6022, 6023, 60240014.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1022, 4000, 4001, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 40340020.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20200020.04--the following census blocks:1000, 10050020.05--the following census blocks:1001, 2001, 20050029.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5033, 5034, 50350030.02--the following census blocks:40000030.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 10190036.03--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3040, 30410036.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220038.05--the following census blocks:1003, 10040039.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 4000, 4001, 4014, 40190039.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40100039.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 10080039.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4014, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 40200039.08--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 20050039.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003 21406. Congressional District 06 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 06PLACERWhole Tracts in Placer County0207.10, 0207.11, 0207.12, 0207.13, 0207.14, 0207.15, 0207.17, 0208.05, 0208.06, 0209.01, 0210.03, 0210.34, 0210.37, 0210.38, 0210.39, 0210.40, 0210.43, 0210.44, 0210.45, 0210.46, 0210.47, 0210.48, 0211.06, 0211.08, 0211.09, 0211.22, 0211.28, 0211.29, 0211.30, 0211.31, 0213.24, 0213.25, 0213.26, 0224.00, 0226.00, 0228.00, 0229.00, 0231.00Partial Tracts in Placer County0206.05--the following census blocks:3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30160206.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2014, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090206.07--the following census blocks:1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 20290209.08--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40080211.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 40210211.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4007, 4009, 4010, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4029, 40300212.03--the following census blocks:1030, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2023, 2024, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 20520212.04--the following census blocks:20200213.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 40390213.27--the following census blocks:1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1049, 1050, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130213.28--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 5018, 5021, 5034, 5035, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5050, 5053, 50540230.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033SACRAMENTOWhole Tracts in Sacramento County0001.00, 0002.00, 0003.00, 0015.00, 0016.02, 0063.00, 0064.00, 0065.01, 0065.02, 0066.00, 0067.03, 0067.04, 0067.05, 0067.06, 0068.01, 0068.02, 0068.03, 0069.01, 0069.02, 0070.01, 0070.07, 0070.10, 0070.11, 0070.12, 0070.13, 0070.16, 0070.17, 0070.19, 0070.20, 0070.21, 0070.22, 0070.23, 0070.24, 0070.25, 0070.26, 0070.27, 0070.28, 0071.03, 0071.05, 0071.08, 0071.09, 0071.10, 0071.11, 0072.04, 0073.01, 0074.02, 0074.03, 0074.13, 0074.14, 0074.15, 0074.16, 0074.22, 0074.23, 0074.24, 0074.28, 0074.29, 0074.32, 0074.34, 0074.35, 0074.36, 0074.37, 0074.39, 0075.01, 0075.03, 0075.04, 0076.03, 0076.04, 0079.03, 0079.04, 0079.06, 0081.11, 0081.13, 0081.17, 0081.19, 0081.20, 0081.24, 0081.25, 0081.27, 0081.28, 0081.29, 0081.30, 0081.31, 0081.32, 0081.33, 0081.34, 0081.35, 0081.36, 0081.37, 0081.38, 0081.40, 0081.41, 0081.42, 0081.43, 0081.44, 0081.45, 0082.03, 0082.04, 0082.08, 0082.11Partial Tracts in Sacramento County0004.00--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4022, 5000, 5001, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 50320013.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1044, 1046, 1047, 10480014.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2041, 2042, 2043, 20440016.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2009, 2013, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120017.02--the following census blocks:10020018.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 10170019.00--the following census blocks:3000, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130052.01--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 20040053.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120054.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180055.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 20290059.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150062.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20180071.01--the following census blocks:1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1074, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 11070071.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 40280071.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150076.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30120079.05--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20230081.39--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080082.06--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 30230082.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 50030082.10--the following census blocks:1004YOLOWhole Tracts in Yolo County0101.03, 0101.04, 0101.05, 0102.01, 0102.03, 0102.04, 0103.10, 0103.12, 0103.13, 0103.14, 0103.15Partial Tracts in Yolo County0101.02--the following census blocks:1019, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 10600104.01--the following census blocks:4001, 4015, 4016, 4017, 40180104.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 21407. Congressional District 07 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 07EL DORADOWhole Tracts in El Dorado County0306.01, 0306.05, 0306.06, 0307.01, 0307.06, 0307.09, 0307.10, 0307.11, 0307.12, 0308.01, 0308.04, 0308.07, 0308.08, 0308.09, 0308.10, 0308.11, 0308.12, 0309.01, 0309.02, 0310.00, 0311.00, 0312.00, 0314.04, 0314.07, 0315.03, 0315.04, 0315.05, 0315.06, 0317.00, 0318.00Partial Tracts in El Dorado County0306.03--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 20380306.04--the following census blocks:1047, 1048, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1064, 1065, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 10710313.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1042, 1043, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 30490314.08--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015SACRAMENTOWhole Tracts in Sacramento County0005.01, 0005.02, 0006.00, 0007.00, 0008.00, 0011.02, 0011.03, 0012.01, 0012.02, 0020.00, 0021.00, 0022.00, 0023.00, 0024.00, 0025.00, 0026.00, 0027.00, 0028.00, 0033.00, 0034.00, 0035.01, 0035.02, 0036.00, 0037.00, 0038.00, 0039.00, 0040.05, 0040.06, 0040.08, 0040.11, 0040.12, 0040.13, 0040.14, 0040.15, 0040.16, 0040.17, 0040.18, 0040.19, 0040.20, 0041.00, 0042.01, 0042.02, 0042.03, 0043.01, 0043.02, 0049.06, 0049.07, 0049.08, 0049.09, 0049.10, 0051.02, 0054.03, 0086.01, 0093.07, 0093.08, 0093.09, 0093.10, 0093.11, 0093.12, 0093.14, 0093.16, 0093.17, 0093.18, 0093.19, 0093.20, 0093.21, 0093.23, 0093.26, 0093.28, 0093.29, 0093.30, 0093.31, 0093.32, 0093.33, 0093.34, 0093.35, 0093.36, 0094.03, 0094.04, 0094.06, 0094.08, 0094.09, 0094.10, 0095.01, 0095.02, 0095.03, 0095.04, 0096.01, 0096.08, 0096.09, 0096.10, 0096.11, 0096.12, 0096.14, 0096.16, 0096.17, 0096.18, 0096.22, 0096.32, 0096.33, 0096.34, 0096.35, 0096.37, 0096.39, 0096.40, 0096.41, 0096.42, 0096.43, 0096.44, 0096.45, 0096.46, 0096.47, 0096.48, 0096.49, 0096.50, 0096.51, 0096.52, 0096.53Partial Tracts in Sacramento County0004.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 50250013.00--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1045, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 30270014.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2038, 2039, 2040, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 30290016.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2025, 20260017.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1018, 1024, 1025, 1026, 10270017.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190018.00--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 50270019.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 40390044.02--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30050045.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20070045.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 10250049.04--the following census blocks:2021, 2024, 2025, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170050.02--the following census blocks:2013, 2014, 2015, 30230051.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 20280052.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160052.05--the following census blocks:1015, 10160053.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 30290054.04--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 6010, 6011, 60120086.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 20660092.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 20380099.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 2003, 2004, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3026, 3027, 3028, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4079, 4080, 4081, 4082, 4083, 4084SAN JOAQUINWhole Tracts in San Joaquin County0041.05, 0042.02, 0042.03, 0042.04, 0045.01, 0047.01, 0047.03Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County0040.01--the following census blocks:1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 20420041.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2017, 20180042.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110043.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4019, 4020, 40210043.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 20120043.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110044.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120044.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1029, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3006, 30070045.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2024, 2025, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30240046.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4029, 4030, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 50130047.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 3000, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3020, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40190048.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4036, 4037, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4061, 4062, 4064 21408. Congressional District 08 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 08SOLANOPartial Counties in Congressional District 08CONTRA COSTAWhole Tracts in Contra Costa County3580.00, 3591.02, 3591.03, 3591.04, 3591.05, 3592.02, 3592.03, 3592.04, 3601.01, 3601.02, 3602.00, 3610.00, 3620.00, 3630.00, 3640.02, 3650.02, 3650.03, 3660.01, 3660.02, 3671.00, 3672.00, 3680.01, 3680.02, 3690.01, 3690.02, 3700.00, 3710.00, 3720.00, 3730.00, 3740.00, 3750.00, 3760.00, 3770.00, 3780.00, 3790.00, 3800.01, 3800.02, 3810.00, 3820.00, 3830.00, 3840.00, 3851.00, 3852.00, 3860.00, 3870.00, 3880.00, 3891.00, 3892.00, 3901.00, 3902.00, 3910.00, 3920.00, 3922.01, 3922.02, 3923.00, 9800.00, 9900.00Partial Tracts in Contra Costa County3540.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1018, 10333560.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30193560.02--the following census blocks:1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1028, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1123, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1169, 1175, 1176, 1177, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 20223570.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037SACRAMENTOWhole Tracts in Sacramento County0098.00Partial Tracts in Sacramento County0099.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2023, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040SAN JOAQUINWhole Tracts in San Joaquin County0041.04, 0042.06, 0043.05Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County0039.00--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1127, 11280040.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1109, 11100041.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1043, 1047, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 20320041.08--the following census blocks:3008, 3009, 30210042.05--the following census blocks:30030043.02--the following census blocks:3006, 3007, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 40310043.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 30100043.08--the following census blocks:30030043.09--the following census blocks:2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20240043.10--the following census blocks:2012, 2013YOLOWhole Tracts in Yolo County0106.07, 0106.08Partial Tracts in Yolo County0104.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 40360104.02--the following census blocks:1014, 1015, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1038, 1039 21409. Congressional District 09 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 09CONTRA COSTAWhole Tracts in Contra Costa County3010.00, 3020.06, 3020.09, 3050.00, 3060.03, 3060.04, 3071.01, 3071.02, 3072.01, 3072.02, 3072.04, 3072.05, 3080.01, 3080.02, 3090.00, 3100.00, 3110.00, 3120.00, 3131.02, 3131.04, 3131.05, 3131.07, 3132.06, 3551.09, 3551.10, 3551.11, 3551.18, 3551.20Partial Tracts in Contra Costa County3020.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40073020.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 20413020.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 10343020.13--the following census blocks:1000, 2012, 20133032.06--the following census blocks:2006, 2007, 20083032.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30083060.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2041, 2043, 20443131.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2029, 2030, 20313132.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20153132.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30103132.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1005, 1006, 1007, 10083141.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 30213141.06--the following census blocks:2000, 20013551.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30133551.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20163552.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30113552.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041SAN JOAQUINWhole Tracts in San Joaquin County0004.01, 0004.02, 0009.00, 0010.00, 0011.01, 0011.02, 0012.00, 0013.00, 0014.00, 0015.01, 0031.06, 0031.08, 0031.09, 0031.10, 0031.11, 0031.12, 0031.15, 0031.16, 0031.17, 0031.18, 0031.19, 0032.03, 0032.05, 0032.09, 0032.10, 0032.13, 0032.14, 0032.15, 0032.16, 0032.17, 0032.18, 0032.19, 0033.05, 0033.06, 0033.07, 0033.08, 0033.10, 0033.11, 0033.12, 0033.13, 0034.03, 0034.04, 0034.05, 0034.06, 0034.07, 0034.09, 0034.10, 0035.01, 0035.02, 0035.03, 0035.04, 0036.01, 0036.02, 0038.04, 0038.05, 0038.06, 0038.08, 0040.03, 0040.04, 0041.07, 0044.02, 0051.08, 0051.09, 0051.23, 0051.24, 0051.25, 0051.26, 0051.31, 0051.32, 0051.33, 0051.34, 0051.35, 0051.36, 0051.37, 0051.38, 0051.39, 0051.40, 0051.41, 0052.08, 0052.11, 0052.12, 0052.13, 0052.15, 0052.16, 0052.17, 0052.18, 0052.19, 0052.20, 0052.21, 0052.22, 0052.23, 0052.24, 0052.25, 0053.03, 0053.07, 0053.08, 0053.09, 0053.10, 0053.11, 0053.12, 0054.03, 0054.05, 0054.06, 9800.00Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County0001.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180003.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 10310005.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 10370008.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1090, 1091, 1093, 1094, 10950008.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 10170015.02--the following census blocks:1021, 1022, 1023, 2001, 20070025.03--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 10170025.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110027.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1012, 10130027.02--the following census blocks:10000037.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20240038.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2025, 2027, 2034, 2036, 20370038.07--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060039.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 20650040.01--the following census blocks:1097, 1098, 1099, 11080041.06--the following census blocks:1027, 1028, 1029, 1038, 1039, 1042, 1044, 1045, 1046, 10480041.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 40290043.02--the following census blocks:4004, 4005, 4032, 40330043.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3006, 30070043.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005, 30060044.03--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 10190044.04--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 30090045.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2022, 2023, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30200046.00--the following census blocks:4015, 4016, 4017, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 40280047.04--the following census blocks:3001, 3002, 3003, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 40420048.00--the following census blocks:3005, 40380050.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 40280050.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 40410050.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 40270051.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1029, 1031, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 40590051.19--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2012, 2013, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2049, 3007, 30080051.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3002, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40070052.14--the following census blocks:1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1164, 1165, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 20450055.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1095, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2010 21410. Congressional District 10 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 10ALAMEDAWhole Tracts in Alameda County4301.01, 4301.02, 4302.00, 4303.00, 4304.00, 4305.00, 4306.00, 4307.00, 4308.00, 4337.00, 4338.01, 4339.00, 4340.00Partial Tracts in Alameda County4309.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 30024310.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 20194328.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30244331.02--the following census blocks:10194332.00--the following census blocks:3012, 3013, 3014, 30154338.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20244505.02--the following census blocks:1008, 2009CONTRA COSTAWhole Tracts in Contra Costa County3020.12, 3020.14, 3031.04, 3031.05, 3031.06, 3031.07, 3032.02, 3032.04, 3032.08, 3032.09, 3032.10, 3032.11, 3040.01, 3040.02, 3040.03, 3040.04, 3040.06, 3040.07, 3141.03, 3141.05, 3142.00, 3150.00, 3160.00, 3170.00, 3180.00, 3190.01, 3190.02, 3200.01, 3200.03, 3200.04, 3211.01, 3211.02, 3211.03, 3212.00, 3220.00, 3230.00, 3240.02, 3240.03, 3240.04, 3250.00, 3260.00, 3270.01, 3270.02, 3280.00, 3290.00, 3300.00, 3310.00, 3320.00, 3331.01, 3331.02, 3332.00, 3340.01, 3340.06, 3340.07, 3340.08, 3342.00, 3350.00, 3361.01, 3361.03, 3361.04, 3362.01, 3362.02, 3371.00, 3372.01, 3372.02, 3373.00, 3381.01, 3381.02, 3382.01, 3382.03, 3382.04, 3383.01, 3383.02, 3390.01, 3390.03, 3390.04, 3400.01, 3400.03, 3400.04, 3410.00, 3430.01, 3430.02, 3430.03, 3451.01, 3451.02, 3451.03, 3451.05, 3451.11, 3451.12, 3451.13, 3451.14, 3451.15, 3451.16, 3451.17, 3451.18, 3452.03, 3452.04, 3452.05, 3452.06, 3461.01, 3461.02, 3462.03, 3462.04, 3462.05, 3462.06, 3470.00, 3480.00, 3490.00, 3500.00, 3511.01, 3511.03, 3511.04, 3511.05, 3512.00, 3521.01, 3521.02, 3522.01, 3522.02, 3530.01, 3530.02, 3540.02, 3551.12, 3551.13, 3551.15, 3551.21, 3551.22, 3551.23, 3551.24, 3551.25, 3551.26, 3553.02, 3553.06, 3553.07, 3553.08, 3553.09, 3553.10Partial Tracts in Contra Costa County3020.05--the following census blocks:3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30113020.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2030, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30143020.11--the following census blocks:1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20243020.13--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20213032.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20153032.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2010, 2018, 20193060.02--the following census blocks:2039, 2040, 2042, 20453131.06--the following census blocks:2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 20283132.03--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1010, 20113132.04--the following census blocks:2001, 2006, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20143132.05--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 10043141.02--the following census blocks:1017, 2005, 20063141.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20153540.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 10323551.07--the following census blocks:1008, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 30313551.19--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1019, 1021, 1022, 10233552.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1029, 3012, 30133552.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2020, 2021, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 20363560.01--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 30253560.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1026, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1121, 1122, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 11743570.00--the following census blocks:1027, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021 21411. Congressional District 11 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 11SAN FRANCISCOWhole Tracts in San Francisco County0101.01, 0101.02, 0102.01, 0102.02, 0103.00, 0104.01, 0104.02, 0105.00, 0106.00, 0107.01, 0107.02, 0108.00, 0109.01, 0109.02, 0110.01, 0110.02, 0111.01, 0111.02, 0112.00, 0113.00, 0117.00, 0118.00, 0119.01, 0119.02, 0120.01, 0120.02, 0121.00, 0122.02, 0122.03, 0122.04, 0123.01, 0123.02, 0124.03, 0124.04, 0124.05, 0124.06, 0125.02, 0125.03, 0125.04, 0126.01, 0126.02, 0127.00, 0128.01, 0128.02, 0129.01, 0129.02, 0130.01, 0130.02, 0131.01, 0131.02, 0132.00, 0133.00, 0134.01, 0134.02, 0135.00, 0151.00, 0152.01, 0152.02, 0153.00, 0154.01, 0154.02, 0155.00, 0156.00, 0157.01, 0157.02, 0158.01, 0158.02, 0159.00, 0160.00, 0161.01, 0161.02, 0162.00, 0163.00, 0164.00, 0165.00, 0166.01, 0166.02, 0167.00, 0168.01, 0168.02, 0169.00, 0170.00, 0171.01, 0171.02, 0176.02, 0176.03, 0176.04, 0177.00, 0178.01, 0178.03, 0178.04, 0179.03, 0180.00, 0201.01, 0201.02, 0202.01, 0202.02, 0203.00, 0204.01, 0204.02, 0205.00, 0206.01, 0206.02, 0207.01, 0207.02, 0208.01, 0208.02, 0209.00, 0210.00, 0211.00, 0212.00, 0213.00, 0214.00, 0215.00, 0216.00, 0217.00, 0218.00, 0226.00, 0227.02, 0227.04, 0228.01, 0228.02, 0228.03, 0229.01, 0229.02, 0229.03, 0230.01, 0230.03, 0231.02, 0231.03, 0232.00, 0233.00, 0234.00, 0251.00, 0252.00, 0253.00, 0254.01, 0254.02, 0254.03, 0301.01, 0301.02, 0302.01, 0302.02, 0303.01, 0303.02, 0304.00, 0305.00, 0306.00, 0307.00, 0308.00, 0309.00, 0310.00, 0311.00, 0326.01, 0326.02, 0327.00, 0328.01, 0328.02, 0329.01, 0329.02, 0330.01, 0330.02, 0331.00, 0332.01, 0332.03, 0332.04, 0351.01, 0351.02, 0352.01, 0352.02, 0353.00, 0354.00, 0401.00, 0402.00, 0426.01, 0426.02, 0427.00, 0428.00, 0451.00, 0452.01, 0452.02, 0476.00, 0477.01, 0477.02, 0478.01, 0478.02, 0479.02, 0479.03, 0479.04, 0601.00, 0604.00, 0607.01, 0607.02, 0607.03, 0611.01, 0611.02, 0612.00, 0614.01, 0614.02, 0615.01, 0615.02, 0615.03, 0615.04, 0615.05, 0615.06, 0615.07, 0615.08, 9802.00, 9803.00, 9804.01, 9806.00, 9809.00, 9901.00, 9902.00Partial Tracts in San Francisco County0255.02--the following census blocks:1000, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3012, 3013, 30140257.01--the following census blocks:20000312.01--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30050313.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110313.02--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3015, 30160610.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014 21412. Congressional District 12 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 12ALAMEDAWhole Tracts in Alameda County4001.00, 4002.00, 4003.00, 4004.00, 4005.00, 4006.00, 4007.00, 4008.00, 4009.00, 4010.00, 4011.00, 4012.00, 4013.00, 4014.00, 4015.00, 4016.00, 4017.00, 4018.00, 4022.00, 4024.00, 4025.00, 4026.00, 4027.00, 4028.01, 4028.02, 4029.00, 4030.00, 4031.00, 4033.01, 4033.02, 4034.01, 4034.02, 4035.01, 4035.02, 4036.00, 4037.01, 4037.02, 4038.00, 4039.00, 4040.00, 4041.01, 4041.02, 4042.00, 4043.00, 4044.00, 4045.01, 4045.02, 4046.00, 4047.00, 4048.00, 4049.00, 4050.00, 4051.00, 4052.00, 4053.01, 4053.02, 4054.01, 4054.02, 4055.00, 4056.00, 4057.00, 4058.00, 4059.01, 4059.02, 4060.00, 4061.00, 4062.01, 4062.02, 4063.00, 4064.00, 4065.00, 4066.01, 4066.02, 4067.00, 4068.00, 4069.00, 4070.00, 4071.01, 4071.02, 4072.00, 4073.00, 4074.00, 4075.00, 4076.00, 4077.00, 4078.00, 4079.00, 4080.00, 4081.00, 4082.00, 4083.00, 4084.00, 4085.00, 4086.00, 4087.00, 4088.00, 4089.00, 4090.00, 4091.00, 4092.00, 4093.00, 4094.00, 4095.00, 4096.00, 4097.00, 4098.00, 4099.00, 4100.00, 4101.00, 4102.00, 4103.00, 4104.00, 4105.00, 4201.00, 4202.00, 4203.01, 4203.02, 4204.01, 4204.02, 4205.00, 4206.00, 4211.00, 4212.00, 4213.00, 4214.00, 4215.00, 4216.00, 4217.00, 4218.00, 4219.00, 4220.00, 4221.00, 4222.00, 4223.00, 4224.00, 4225.00, 4227.00, 4228.00, 4229.01, 4229.02, 4230.00, 4231.00, 4232.00, 4233.00, 4234.00, 4235.00, 4236.01, 4236.02, 4237.00, 4238.00, 4239.01, 4239.02, 4240.01, 4240.02, 4251.01, 4251.02, 4251.03, 4251.04, 4261.00, 4262.00, 4271.00, 4272.00, 4273.00, 4276.00, 4277.00, 4278.00, 4279.00, 4280.00, 4281.00, 4282.00, 4283.01, 4283.02, 4284.00, 4285.00, 4286.00, 4287.00, 4321.00, 4322.00, 4323.00, 4324.00, 4325.01, 4325.02, 4326.01, 4326.02, 4327.00, 4330.00, 4331.03, 4331.04, 9819.00, 9820.00, 9821.00, 9832.00Partial Tracts in Alameda County4328.00--the following census blocks:1011, 2005, 2012, 30094331.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2003, 20154332.00--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 40324333.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 50144334.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018, 6019, 60204335.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20054336.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 10074338.02--the following census blocks:10039900.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0009, 0010, 0011 21413. Congressional District 13 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 13MERCEDPartial Counties in Congressional District 13FRESNOWhole Tracts in Fresno County0083.01, 0083.03, 0084.03, 0084.04, 0084.05Partial Tracts in Fresno County0039.00--the following census blocks:2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 20220083.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1148, 1151, 1152, 1166, 1169, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1183, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 40240084.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2140, 2141MADERAWhole Tracts in Madera County0005.10, 0005.11, 0006.02, 0008.01, 0008.02, 0009.01, 0009.02, 0009.03Partial Tracts in Madera County0002.01--the following census blocks:1080, 1083, 1086, 1087, 1088, 10930002.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2063, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2081, 2082, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 21110002.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2029, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2044, 30050003.01--the following census blocks:10090003.02--the following census blocks:2001, 2010, 50010005.06--the following census blocks:1014, 1015, 20380005.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 2008, 2009, 20100005.13--the following census blocks:1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 3000, 30190005.14--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 40280005.15--the following census blocks:1019, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 10310005.17--the following census blocks:1038, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1052, 10530005.18--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1018, 2006, 2007, 20080006.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110006.04--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190007.02--the following census blocks:1002, 1016, 1018, 1027, 1034, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40220011.00--the following census blocks:1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4081, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5050, 5051, 5052, 5053, 5054, 5055, 5056, 5057, 5058, 5059, 5060, 5061, 5062, 5063, 5064, 5065, 5066, 5067, 5068, 5069, 5070, 5071, 5072, 5073, 5074, 5075, 5076, 5077, 5078, 5079, 5080, 5081, 5082, 5083, 5084, 5085, 5086, 5087, 5088, 5089, 5090, 5091, 5092, 5093, 5094, 5095, 5096, 5097, 5098, 5099, 5100, 5101, 5102, 5103, 5104, 5105, 5106, 5107, 5108, 5109, 5110, 5111, 5112, 5113, 5114, 5115, 5116, 5117, 5118, 5119, 5120, 5121, 5122, 5123, 5124, 5125, 5126, 5127, 5128, 5129, 5130, 5131, 5132, 5133, 5134, 5135, 5136, 5137, 5138, 5139, 5140, 5141, 5142, 5143, 5144, 5145, 5146, 5147, 5148, 5149, 5150, 5151, 5152, 5153, 5154, 5155, 5156, 5157, 5158, 5159, 5160, 5161, 5162, 5163, 5164, 5166, 5167, 5168, 5169, 5170, 5171, 5172, 5173, 5174, 5175, 5176, 5177, 5178, 5179, 5180, 5181, 5182, 5183, 5184, 5185, 5186, 5187, 5188, 5189, 5190, 5191, 5192, 5193, 5194, 5195, 5196, 5197, 5198, 5199, 5200, 5201, 5202, 5203, 5204, 5205, 5206, 5207, 5208, 5209, 5210, 5211, 5212, 5215, 5216, 5217, 5218, 5219, 5220, 5221, 5222, 5223, 5224, 5225, 5226, 5227, 5228, 5229, 5230, 5231, 5232, 5233, 5235, 5236, 5239, 5240, 5241, 5242, 5243, 5244, 5245, 5246, 5247, 5248, 5249, 5250, 5251, 5252SAN JOAQUINWhole Tracts in San Joaquin County0001.01, 0006.00, 0007.00, 0016.00, 0017.00, 0018.00, 0019.00, 0020.00, 0021.00, 0022.01, 0022.02, 0023.00, 0024.01, 0024.02, 0028.00, 0051.27, 0051.29, 0051.30, 0055.03Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County0001.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 30250003.00--the following census blocks:1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 20410005.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 20320008.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1049, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1092, 1096, 10970008.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150015.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30160025.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20100025.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 10080027.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40220027.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060037.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 30320038.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 2015, 2016, 2024, 2026, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2035, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 30770038.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 2007, 20080050.04--the following census blocks:1012, 10190051.06--the following census blocks:1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1073, 1074, 1075, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 30250051.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 40380051.22--the following census blocks:3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 30320052.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1028, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1166, 1188, 1189, 1190, 11910055.02--the following census blocks:1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1064, 1065, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1143, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043STANISLAUSWhole Tracts in Stanislaus County0005.13, 0005.14, 0006.01, 0006.02, 0008.03, 0015.00, 0016.01, 0016.03, 0016.04, 0017.00, 0018.00, 0019.00, 0021.00, 0022.00, 0023.02, 0023.03, 0023.04, 0024.01, 0024.02, 0025.03, 0025.04, 0025.05, 0025.06, 0026.02, 0026.03, 0026.04, 0026.05, 0027.01, 0027.02, 0030.03, 0031.00, 0032.01, 0032.03, 0032.04, 0032.05, 0032.06, 0033.00, 0034.00, 0035.01, 0035.02, 0037.00, 0038.02, 0038.03, 0038.04, 0040.00Partial Tracts in Stanislaus County0008.07--the following census blocks:2010, 2011, 20120010.02--the following census blocks:3007, 3008, 30090012.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3001, 3002, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 30460013.00--the following census blocks:2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 20300014.00--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4019, 4020, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 50100020.02--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 30470020.04--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40090020.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20140029.01--the following census blocks:50320030.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150030.04--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20100036.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3006, 3007, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3042, 3043, 3044, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 40530036.12--the following census blocks:1016, 10170038.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 10280039.04--the following census blocks:1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4020, 40210039.05--the following census blocks:40110039.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080039.07--the following census blocks:4013, 40150039.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2003, 20040039.09--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1010, 1012, 1013, 2002, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 21414. Congressional District 14 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 14ALAMEDAWhole Tracts in Alameda County4311.00, 4312.00, 4351.02, 4351.03, 4351.04, 4352.00, 4353.00, 4354.00, 4355.00, 4356.01, 4356.02, 4357.00, 4358.00, 4359.00, 4360.00, 4361.00, 4362.00, 4363.01, 4363.02, 4364.02, 4364.03, 4364.04, 4365.00, 4366.01, 4366.02, 4367.00, 4368.00, 4369.00, 4370.00, 4371.01, 4371.02, 4372.00, 4373.00, 4374.00, 4375.00, 4376.00, 4377.01, 4377.02, 4378.00, 4379.00, 4380.00, 4381.00, 4382.01, 4382.03, 4382.04, 4383.00, 4384.00, 4401.00, 4402.00, 4403.01, 4403.04, 4403.05, 4403.06, 4403.07, 4403.08, 4403.31, 4403.32, 4403.33, 4403.34, 4403.36, 4403.37, 4403.38, 4411.00, 4412.00, 4413.01, 4413.02, 4414.01, 4414.02, 4415.01, 4415.21, 4415.22, 4415.23, 4417.02, 4418.00, 4419.21, 4419.23, 4419.24, 4419.26, 4419.27, 4419.28, 4419.29, 4420.00, 4421.00, 4422.00, 4423.01, 4423.02, 4424.00, 4425.01, 4425.02, 4426.01, 4426.02, 4430.01, 4501.01, 4501.02, 4502.00, 4503.00, 4504.00, 4505.01, 4506.01, 4506.03, 4506.04, 4506.05, 4506.06, 4506.07, 4506.08, 4506.09, 4507.01, 4507.41, 4507.42, 4507.43, 4507.44, 4507.45, 4507.46, 4507.50, 4507.51, 4507.52, 4511.02, 4511.03, 4511.04, 4512.01, 4512.02, 4513.00, 4514.01, 4514.03, 4514.04, 4515.01, 4515.03, 4515.04, 4515.05, 4515.06, 4516.01, 4516.02, 4517.01, 4517.03, 4517.04Partial Tracts in Alameda County4309.00--the following census blocks:1005, 10064310.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20124331.02--the following census blocks:1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1031, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20204332.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30114333.00--the following census blocks:10094334.00--the following census blocks:4010, 40114335.00--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 40124336.00--the following census blocks:1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40084338.02--the following census blocks:2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20144415.03--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4033, 4034, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 40714415.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20164416.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30124416.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30194417.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20094427.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30084428.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 10174429.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 40144430.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30184431.03--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 30164431.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40104505.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 20429900.00--the following census blocks:0007, 0008, 0012, 0013, 0014, 0015 21415. Congressional District 15 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 15SAN FRANCISCOWhole Tracts in San Francisco County0255.01, 0256.00, 0257.02, 0258.00, 0259.00, 0260.01, 0260.02, 0260.03, 0260.04, 0261.00, 0262.01, 0262.02, 0263.01, 0263.02, 0263.03, 0264.01, 0264.02, 0264.03, 0264.04, 0312.02, 0314.01, 0314.02, 0605.02, 9805.01Partial Tracts in San Francisco County0255.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3010, 3011, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 30230257.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120312.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 40050313.01--the following census blocks:1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090313.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30140610.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2009, 2010SAN MATEOWhole Tracts in San Mateo County6001.00, 6002.00, 6003.00, 6004.01, 6004.02, 6005.01, 6005.02, 6006.00, 6007.01, 6007.02, 6008.00, 6009.00, 6010.00, 6011.00, 6012.00, 6013.01, 6013.02, 6014.00, 6015.01, 6015.02, 6016.01, 6016.03, 6016.04, 6016.05, 6017.00, 6018.00, 6019.01, 6019.02, 6020.01, 6020.02, 6021.00, 6022.01, 6022.02, 6023.00, 6024.00, 6025.00, 6026.01, 6026.02, 6037.00, 6038.01, 6038.02, 6039.00, 6040.00, 6041.02, 6041.03, 6041.04, 6042.00, 6044.00, 6045.00, 6046.00, 6047.00, 6048.00, 6049.00, 6050.00, 6051.00, 6052.00, 6053.00, 6054.00, 6055.01, 6055.02, 6056.00, 6058.00, 6059.01, 6059.02, 6060.00, 6061.00, 6062.01, 6062.02, 6063.00, 6064.00, 6065.00, 6066.00, 6067.00, 6068.00, 6069.00, 6070.00, 6071.00, 6072.00, 6073.00, 6074.00, 6075.00, 6076.00, 6077.01, 6077.02, 6078.00, 6079.00, 6080.01, 6080.02, 6080.13, 6080.23, 6080.24, 6080.25, 6081.00, 6082.00, 6083.00, 6084.00, 6085.01, 6085.02, 6086.00, 6087.00, 6088.00, 6089.00, 6090.00, 6091.00, 6092.01, 6092.02, 6093.00, 6094.00, 6095.00, 6096.01, 6096.02, 6098.00, 6099.00, 6100.00, 6101.00, 6102.01, 6102.02, 6102.03, 6103.02, 6103.03, 6103.04, 6104.00, 6105.00, 6106.01, 6106.02, 6107.00, 6108.00, 6109.01, 6109.02, 6110.00, 6111.00, 6112.00, 6116.00, 6117.00, 6118.00, 6119.01, 6119.02, 6120.01, 6120.02, 6121.02, 6140.00, 9843.00Partial Tracts in San Mateo County6057.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 40236096.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40086097.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 20496113.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 1005, 1025, 2001, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2018, 2019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 40176115.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20046121.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30066135.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2004, 2012, 20146139.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 4000, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4013, 4014, 40159901.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011, 0012, 0013, 0014, 0015, 0016, 0017, 0018, 0019, 0020, 0021, 0022, 0023, 0024, 0025, 0026, 0027, 0034 21416. Congressional District 16 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 16SAN MATEOWhole Tracts in San Mateo County6027.00, 6028.00, 6029.00, 6030.00, 6031.00, 6032.00, 6033.00, 6034.00, 6114.00, 6125.00, 6126.00, 6127.00, 6128.00, 6129.00, 6130.00, 6132.00, 6133.00, 6134.00, 6135.02, 6136.00, 6137.01, 6137.02, 6138.00Partial Tracts in San Mateo County6057.00--the following census blocks:30206096.03--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 10136097.00--the following census blocks:1030, 10316113.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 3000, 3001, 3002, 40186115.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30196121.01--the following census blocks:10076135.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 20646139.00--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4001, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 50149901.00--the following census blocks:0028, 0029, 0030, 0031, 0032, 0033, 0035SANTA CLARAWhole Tracts in Santa Clara County5021.01, 5021.03, 5021.04, 5022.02, 5022.03, 5022.04, 5025.00, 5026.01, 5026.03, 5026.04, 5027.01, 5027.03, 5027.04, 5028.00, 5029.01, 5029.02, 5029.03, 5029.06, 5029.07, 5029.08, 5029.09, 5029.10, 5030.01, 5030.02, 5031.05, 5031.10, 5031.11, 5031.17, 5031.18, 5031.24, 5031.25, 5031.26, 5032.11, 5032.12, 5032.13, 5032.17, 5032.19, 5032.20, 5032.21, 5032.22, 5033.04, 5033.37, 5034.01, 5034.02, 5046.01, 5064.02, 5065.02, 5065.03, 5065.04, 5066.01, 5066.03, 5066.04, 5066.06, 5067.01, 5067.02, 5067.03, 5068.01, 5068.02, 5068.03, 5068.04, 5069.00, 5070.02, 5070.03, 5070.04, 5071.00, 5072.03, 5072.05, 5072.06, 5073.01, 5073.02, 5074.01, 5074.02, 5075.00, 5091.08, 5091.09, 5091.11, 5092.01, 5092.02, 5093.02, 5093.03, 5093.04, 5094.01, 5094.03, 5094.04, 5095.00, 5096.00, 5097.00, 5098.01, 5098.02, 5099.01, 5099.02, 5100.02, 5101.00, 5102.00, 5103.00, 5104.00, 5105.00, 5106.00, 5107.00, 5108.01, 5108.02, 5108.03, 5109.00, 5110.00, 5111.00, 5112.00, 5113.01, 5113.02, 5114.00, 5115.01, 5115.02, 5116.08, 5116.09, 5117.01, 5117.02, 5117.04, 5117.05, 5119.15, 5130.00Partial Tracts in Santa Clara County5020.01--the following census blocks:3023, 30245020.02--the following census blocks:3031, 3032, 3033, 3036, 3038, 3039, 30405024.00--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 50165030.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 30265031.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30145031.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 10145031.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 20035031.23--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20125031.27--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2039, 20405032.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20085032.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 10105032.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30085033.05--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30155033.06--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30075035.04--the following census blocks:3004, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4007, 40085035.06--the following census blocks:10085035.07--the following census blocks:10105036.02--the following census blocks:3006, 30075047.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 10485062.02--the following census blocks:2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 40205063.02--the following census blocks:3005, 3006, 3007, 30085064.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 40145065.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20215066.05--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20115076.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40095077.02--the following census blocks:3005, 3006, 3008, 3015, 30165077.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10025077.05--the following census blocks:2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 30015078.05--the following census blocks:1003, 1006, 1008, 1009, 10105079.03--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 10165079.04--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20165079.05--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 30145079.06--the following census blocks:3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40105084.01--the following census blocks:5004, 5005, 5006, 50075091.02--the following census blocks:20035091.07--the following census blocks:10035091.10--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 20035100.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 60065117.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1035, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1048, 1049, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 21095118.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 3002, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3039, 3041, 3043, 3044, 3062, 30635119.11--the following census blocks:10075119.13--the following census blocks:2007, 20155119.14--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2011, 2012, 20135119.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20235119.18--the following census blocks:20155120.24--the following census blocks:1007, 10085120.27--the following census blocks:1013, 10145120.52--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1007, 1011 21417. Congressional District 17 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 17ALAMEDAWhole Tracts in Alameda County4415.25, 4431.02, 4431.05, 4432.00, 4433.01, 4433.21, 4433.22, 4441.00, 4442.00, 4443.01, 4443.03, 4443.04, 4444.00, 4445.00, 4446.01, 4446.02Partial Tracts in Alameda County4415.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 4032, 4035, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4079, 4080, 4081, 40824415.24--the following census blocks:2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20114416.01--the following census blocks:30054416.02--the following census blocks:30094417.01--the following census blocks:1031, 20084427.00--the following census blocks:30074428.00--the following census blocks:10164429.00--the following census blocks:40154430.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 20104431.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30174431.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20169900.00--the following census blocks:0016SANTA CLARAWhole Tracts in Santa Clara County5003.00, 5004.00, 5005.00, 5006.00, 5019.01, 5037.08, 5038.03, 5038.04, 5043.07, 5043.11, 5043.14, 5043.15, 5043.16, 5043.17, 5043.18, 5043.19, 5043.20, 5043.21, 5043.22, 5043.23, 5044.10, 5044.11, 5044.12, 5044.13, 5044.14, 5044.15, 5044.16, 5044.18, 5044.21, 5044.22, 5044.23, 5044.24, 5045.05, 5045.06, 5045.07, 5045.08, 5045.09, 5045.10, 5046.02, 5048.02, 5048.05, 5048.06, 5048.07, 5048.08, 5049.02, 5049.03, 5050.06, 5050.07, 5050.10, 5050.11, 5050.12, 5050.13, 5050.14, 5050.15, 5051.00, 5052.02, 5052.03, 5053.01, 5053.02, 5053.03, 5053.04, 5053.05, 5054.01, 5054.02, 5054.03, 5055.00, 5056.00, 5057.00, 5058.00, 5059.01, 5059.02, 5060.00, 5061.01, 5061.02, 5061.03, 5062.03, 5062.04, 5063.01, 5063.04, 5063.05, 5077.01, 5078.06, 5078.07, 5078.08, 5080.03, 5080.04, 5080.05, 5080.06, 5081.01, 5081.02, 5082.03, 5082.04, 5082.05, 5082.06, 5083.01, 5083.03, 5083.05, 5083.06, 5084.03, 5084.04, 5085.03, 5085.05, 5085.07, 5085.08, 5085.09, 5085.10, 5086.01, 5086.02, 5087.05, 5087.06, 5087.07, 5087.08, 5088.00, 5089.00, 5090.01, 5090.02, 5091.06Partial Tracts in Santa Clara County5001.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 10035002.00--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1020, 20035008.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1047, 10485019.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 10155020.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 40285020.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3034, 3035, 3037, 30415036.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 10125037.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 20015038.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4019, 4021, 4023, 40245042.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1006, 1007, 1012, 1022, 1023, 1026, 10275042.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20075043.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30155047.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1008, 10095062.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2007, 2013, 40135063.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 40055064.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 40005065.05--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20075066.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20125076.00--the following census blocks:1009, 1011, 10195077.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3017, 30185077.04--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 20345077.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2014, 3000, 3002, 30035078.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 40295079.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30135079.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20175079.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3007, 30125079.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 4000, 40045084.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 60115091.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30095091.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30065091.10--the following census blocks:1000, 10125100.01--the following census blocks:1004, 10105117.07--the following census blocks:1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1024, 1033, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1047, 20405135.00--the following census blocks:1020, 1027, 1064, 1065, 1068, 1069, 1073, 107421418. Congressional District 18 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 18SAN BENITOPartial Counties in Congressional District 18FRESNOWhole Tracts in Fresno County0080.00, 0081.00Partial Tracts in Fresno County0078.01--the following census blocks:2056, 2057, 2058, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2127, 2130, 2131, 21320078.02--the following census blocks:20490079.03--the following census blocks:1064, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1098, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 21580083.04--the following census blocks:1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1056, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1149, 1150, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1167, 1168, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 22340084.02--the following census blocks:2075, 2076, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2115, 2116, 2139KINGSWhole Tracts in Kings County0017.02, 0017.03, 9818.00Partial Tracts in Kings County0016.01--the following census blocks:1086, 1087, 1088, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1327, 1344, 1345, 1346, 1347, 1348, 1349, 1350, 1351, 1353, 1453, 1454, 1455, 1456, 1457, 1458, 1459, 1460, 1461, 1462, 1463, 1464, 1465, 1466, 1467, 1468, 1469, 1470, 1471, 1472, 1473, 1474MONTEREYWhole Tracts in Monterey County0001.01, 0001.03, 0001.04, 0001.05, 0001.06, 0002.00, 0003.00, 0004.00, 0005.01, 0005.02, 0006.00, 0007.01, 0007.02, 0008.00, 0009.00, 0012.00, 0013.00, 0014.00, 0015.00, 0016.00, 0017.00, 0018.01, 0018.02, 0101.02, 0104.00, 0105.04, 0105.05, 0105.06, 0106.03, 0106.04, 0106.05, 0106.07, 0106.08, 0109.00, 0111.01, 0111.03, 0111.04, 0111.05, 0111.06, 0112.02, 0112.03, 0112.04, 0113.02, 0113.03, 0113.05, 0113.06, 0148.00, 9800.00Partial Tracts in Monterey County0101.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 20030102.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1004, 1010, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080103.05--the following census blocks:3001, 30050103.06--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1025, 10510105.01--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 30420106.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1078, 1081, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1119, 1123, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30240107.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1032, 1033, 1034, 10360108.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40100110.02--the following census blocks:1051, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 20440114.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1283, 1284, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1294, 1295, 1296, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 1301, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 1317, 1318, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1322, 1323, 1324, 1325, 1326, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, 1331, 1332, 1333, 1334, 1335, 1336, 1337, 1338, 1339, 1340, 1341, 1342, 1343, 1344, 1345, 1346, 1347, 1348, 1349, 1350, 1351, 1352, 1353, 1354, 1355, 1356, 1357, 1358, 1359, 1360, 1361, 1362, 1363, 1364, 1365, 1366, 1367, 1368, 1369, 1370, 1371, 1372, 1373, 1374, 1375, 1376, 1377, 1378, 1379, 1380, 1381, 1382, 1383, 1384, 1385, 1386, 1387, 1388, 1389, 1390, 1391, 1392, 1393, 1394, 1395, 1396, 1397, 1398, 1399, 1400, 1401, 1402, 1403, 1404, 1405, 1406, 1407, 1408, 1409, 1410, 1411, 1412, 1413, 1414, 1415, 1416, 1417, 1418, 1419, 1420, 1421, 1422, 1423, 1424, 1425, 1426, 1427, 1428, 1429, 1430, 1431, 1432, 1433, 1434, 1435, 1436, 1437, 1438, 1439, 1440, 1441, 1442, 1443, 1444, 1445, 1446, 1447, 1448, 1449, 1450, 1451, 1452, 1453, 1454, 1455, 1456, 1457, 1458, 1459, 1460, 1461, 1462, 1463, 1464, 1465, 1466, 1467, 1468, 1469, 1470, 1471, 1472, 1473, 1474, 1475, 1476, 1477, 1478, 1479, 1480, 1481, 1482, 1483, 1484, 1485, 1486, 1487, 1488, 1489, 1490, 1491, 1492, 1493, 1494, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2041, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2259, 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2267, 2268, 2269, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 2276, 2277, 2278, 2279, 2280, 2281, 2282, 2283, 2284, 2285, 2286, 2287, 2288, 2289, 2290, 2291, 2292, 2293, 2294, 2295, 2296, 2297, 2298, 2299, 2300, 2301, 2302, 2303, 2304, 2305, 2306, 2307, 2308, 2309, 2310, 2311, 2312, 2313, 2314, 2315, 2316, 2317, 2318, 2319, 2320, 2321, 2322, 2323, 2324, 2325, 2326, 2327, 2328, 2329, 2330, 2331, 2332, 2333, 2334, 2335, 2336, 2337, 2338, 2339, 2340, 2341, 2342, 2343, 2344, 2345, 2346, 2347, 2348, 2349, 2350, 2351, 2352, 2353, 2354, 2355, 2356, 2357, 2358, 2359, 2360, 2361, 2362, 2363, 2364, 2365, 2366, 2367, 2368, 2369, 2370, 2371, 2372, 2373, 2374, 2375, 2376, 2377, 2378, 2379, 2380, 2381, 2382, 2383, 2384, 2385, 2386, 2387, 2388, 2389, 2390, 2391, 2392, 2393, 2394, 2395, 2396, 2397, 2398, 2399, 2400, 2401, 2402, 2403, 2404, 2405, 2406, 2407, 2408, 2414, 2415, 2416, 2419, 2420, 2421, 2424, 2425, 2426, 2428, 2429, 2430, 2431, 2432, 2433, 2434, 2435, 2436, 2437, 24380115.02--the following census blocks:1066, 1067, 1068, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1147, 1150, 1151, 11520145.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1048, 1049, 1053, 1054, 1055, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180146.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2003, 2041, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070147.00--the following census blocks:4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4010, 4011, 4012SANTA CLARAWhole Tracts in Santa Clara County5009.01, 5009.02, 5010.00, 5011.01, 5011.02, 5012.00, 5013.00, 5014.01, 5014.02, 5015.01, 5015.02, 5016.01, 5016.02, 5017.00, 5018.00, 5023.01, 5023.02, 5031.12, 5031.13, 5035.08, 5035.10, 5037.03, 5037.07, 5037.10, 5037.11, 5037.12, 5037.13, 5039.02, 5039.03, 5040.01, 5040.02, 5041.01, 5041.02, 5123.08, 5123.09, 5123.10, 5123.12, 5124.02, 5125.05, 5125.09, 5125.10, 5125.11, 5125.12, 5125.13, 5125.14, 5125.16, 5126.02, 5126.03, 5126.04Partial Tracts in Santa Clara County5001.00--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 40265002.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40225008.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1007, 1015, 1027, 1028, 1044, 1045, 1046, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 30335019.02--the following census blocks:1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20135024.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 5000, 5001, 5005, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 70095031.21--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30175031.22--the following census blocks:10065031.23--the following census blocks:10005033.06--the following census blocks:10005033.12--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30065033.22--the following census blocks:1006, 10075033.26--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3006, 3007, 30085033.30--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 40035035.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4005, 40065035.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30095035.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 10095035.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 20145035.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20155036.01--the following census blocks:1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20165036.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30085037.09--the following census blocks:30005038.02--the following census blocks:4008, 4009, 4010, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4020, 40225042.01--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1024, 1025, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30135042.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30085043.08--the following census blocks:2019, 2020, 20215122.00--the following census blocks:2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 30425123.05--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1028, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 20105123.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 30275123.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 20505123.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 20135123.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 40185124.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 30405125.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2006, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 30215135.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1066, 1067, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1189, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1201, 1202, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260SANTA CRUZWhole Tracts in Santa Cruz County1101.01, 1101.02, 1102.01, 1102.02, 1103.01, 1103.02, 1104.02, 1105.03, 1105.04, 1105.05, 1105.06, 1106.01, 1106.02, 1107.00, 1225.00, 1231.00Partial Tracts in Santa Cruz County1104.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20231223.00--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1033, 1034, 10361224.02--the following census blocks:2031, 2032, 20331233.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038 21419. Congressional District 19 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 19MONTEREYWhole Tracts in Monterey County0110.01, 0116.04, 0116.05, 0116.06, 0117.00, 0118.01, 0118.02, 0119.01, 0119.02, 0120.00, 0121.00, 0122.00, 0123.02, 0124.01, 0124.02, 0125.03, 0125.04, 0126.01, 0127.00, 0128.00, 0130.00, 0131.00, 0132.00, 0133.00, 0134.00, 0135.00, 0136.00, 0137.00, 0138.00, 0139.00, 0140.00, 0141.02, 0141.04, 0141.05, 0141.08, 0141.09, 0141.10, 0142.01, 0142.02, 0143.01, 0143.02, 9900.00Partial Tracts in Monterey County0101.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220102.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 30090103.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30060103.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 10570105.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1006, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3007, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 30410106.06--the following census blocks:1077, 1079, 1080, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1108, 1118, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 11320107.02--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20240108.04--the following census blocks:20350110.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1065, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2045, 2046, 20470114.00--the following census blocks:2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2071, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2238, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2249, 2409, 2410, 2411, 2412, 2413, 2417, 2418, 2422, 2423, 2427, 2439, 2440, 24410115.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1069, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1148, 1149, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 11760145.00--the following census blocks:1047, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 10610146.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 20400147.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4009, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019SAN LUIS OBISPOWhole Tracts in San Luis Obispo County0100.16, 0100.17, 0101.01, 0101.03, 0101.04, 0102.02, 0102.04, 0102.05, 0102.06, 0102.07, 0103.02, 0103.03, 0104.03, 0104.04, 0125.02, 0125.03, 0125.05, 0126.01, 0126.02, 0127.07Partial Tracts in San Luis Obispo County0103.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2228, 2249, 2250, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 30330127.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1019, 1020, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1058, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4023, 40270127.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1043, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1053, 1054, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 30300127.08--the following census blocks:10000130.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1098, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1126, 1127, 1171, 1176, 1177, 1178, 2006, 20070131.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 50509900.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003SANTA CLARAWhole Tracts in Santa Clara County5032.08, 5033.13, 5033.15, 5033.21, 5033.23, 5033.24, 5033.25, 5033.27, 5033.29, 5033.31, 5033.32, 5033.33, 5033.36, 5033.38, 5033.39, 5119.05, 5119.07, 5119.10, 5119.12, 5119.17, 5120.01, 5120.05, 5120.19, 5120.21, 5120.22, 5120.23, 5120.25, 5120.26, 5120.29, 5120.30, 5120.31, 5120.32, 5120.34, 5120.35, 5120.36, 5120.37, 5120.38, 5120.39, 5120.42, 5120.43, 5120.45, 5120.47, 5120.53, 5120.54, 5120.55, 5120.56, 5120.57, 5120.58, 5120.59, 5121.00Partial Tracts in Santa Clara County5030.03--the following census blocks:10255031.16--the following census blocks:1014, 20115031.27--the following census blocks:20385032.07--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 10125032.10--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20125032.18--the following census blocks:20025033.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1010, 1011, 2000, 3000, 30025033.06--the following census blocks:1014, 1015, 10165033.12--the following census blocks:2007, 2008, 2010, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2030, 2032, 20335033.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30085033.26--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30245033.30--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40225035.09--the following census blocks:2011, 2012, 20155035.11--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 10085118.00--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3020, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3037, 3038, 3040, 3042, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 30765119.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 30315119.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30185119.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2009, 2010, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30185119.16--the following census blocks:20195119.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 20265120.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30085120.27--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 20225120.52--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30095122.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2037, 3019, 3020, 3028, 3029, 30305123.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1025, 1027, 1029, 1031, 2000, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 20125123.07--the following census blocks:10125123.11--the following census blocks:2001, 20235123.13--the following census blocks:20105123.14--the following census blocks:1004, 1012, 10135124.01--the following census blocks:1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1025, 10265125.15--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 30045135.00--the following census blocks:1129, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1188, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1200, 1203, 1204SANTA CRUZWhole Tracts in Santa Cruz County1001.00, 1002.00, 1003.00, 1004.00, 1005.00, 1006.00, 1007.00, 1008.01, 1008.02, 1009.00, 1010.01, 1010.02, 1011.00, 1012.00, 1202.00, 1203.01, 1203.02, 1204.00, 1205.00, 1206.00, 1207.00, 1208.00, 1209.01, 1209.02, 1210.00, 1211.00, 1212.00, 1213.00, 1214.01, 1214.02, 1214.03, 1215.01, 1215.02, 1216.01, 1216.02, 1217.01, 1217.02, 1218.01, 1218.02, 1220.01, 1220.02, 1220.04, 1220.05, 1221.00, 1222.02, 1222.03, 1222.04, 1222.05, 1224.01, 9901.00Partial Tracts in Santa Cruz County1104.01--the following census blocks:2013, 2016, 2017, 20181223.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1035, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 30371224.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2034, 20351233.00--the following census blocks:1006 21420. Congressional District 20 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 20FRESNOWhole Tracts in Fresno County0059.04, 0059.06, 0059.11, 0059.12, 0059.15, 0059.16, 0064.10Partial Tracts in Fresno County0014.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1017, 1018, 10190014.13--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2018, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 20380058.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 20220058.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 20270058.05--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2071, 2073, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190062.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 10300063.01--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110063.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 20560064.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 20590064.11--the following census blocks:1030, 1031, 1093, 1107, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 30480065.01--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 40040065.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2051KERNWhole Tracts in Kern County0001.02, 0001.03, 0001.04, 0001.05, 0002.01, 0002.02, 0003.00, 0005.04, 0005.05, 0005.06, 0005.07, 0005.08, 0005.09, 0005.10, 0009.11, 0009.13, 0018.03, 0018.04, 0028.04, 0028.06, 0028.07, 0028.11, 0028.18, 0028.19, 0028.20, 0028.21, 0028.22, 0028.23, 0031.29, 0031.34, 0031.35, 0032.03, 0032.12, 0032.13, 0032.21, 0032.22, 0033.03, 0033.04, 0033.05, 0033.07, 0033.08, 0034.00, 0035.00, 0036.00, 0038.06, 0038.07, 0038.08, 0038.10, 0038.11, 0038.12, 0038.14, 0038.15, 0038.16, 0038.17, 0038.18, 0038.19, 0038.20, 0038.21, 0038.22, 0038.23, 0038.24, 0038.25, 0038.27, 0051.04, 0052.03, 0052.05, 0052.06, 0052.07, 0054.05, 0054.07, 0054.08, 0054.09, 0054.10, 0055.10, 0055.13, 0055.14, 0058.03, 0058.04, 0058.05, 0058.06, 0060.02, 0060.03, 0060.06, 0060.09, 0060.10, 0060.11, 0060.12, 0061.01, 0061.02Partial Tracts in Kern County0001.06--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 10250004.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 30350006.03--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2018, 20190009.06--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 30000009.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 10040009.09--the following census blocks:1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160009.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180009.14--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 30520010.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 20290017.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4028, 40330018.01--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 50210032.10--the following census blocks:1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2010, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 20210032.19--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 20330032.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3037, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 30440038.26--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 30300039.00--the following census blocks:2032, 2046, 2047, 2156, 2157, 22290040.01--the following census blocks:1009, 1020, 1021, 1043, 1044, 1055, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1065, 1066, 1070, 20070040.02--the following census blocks:1002, 20060043.05--the following census blocks:1021, 1022, 1023, 1044, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1073, 1081, 1082, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1100, 1101, 11020045.00--the following census blocks:2557, 2564, 2646, 2647, 2648, 2649, 2650, 26510051.03--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1040, 1047, 1048, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2099, 2124, 21360052.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3129, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197, 3198, 3199, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3216, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3237, 3238, 3239, 3240, 3241, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 3251, 3252, 3306, 3307, 3309, 3310, 3311, 3313, 3314, 3315, 3316, 3318, 3319, 3321, 3322, 3323, 3325, 3326, 33270053.00--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1020, 1033, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1141, 1142, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 21520054.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 30510054.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2050, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30160055.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 3012, 3013, 3036, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3044, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 31930056.00--the following census blocks:2068, 2069, 20780057.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2019, 2020, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 21950059.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 2006, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 30810060.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1116, 1117, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 20610062.02--the following census blocks:2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2107, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 22120063.03--the following census blocks:10050065.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2150, 2151, 2944, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3216, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3237, 3238, 3239, 3240, 3241, 3242, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 3251, 3252, 3253, 3254, 3255, 3256, 3257, 3258, 3259, 3260, 3261, 3262, 3263, 3264, 3265, 3266, 3267, 3268, 3269, 3270, 3271, 3272, 3273, 3274, 3275, 3276, 3277, 3278, 3279, 3280, 3281, 3282, 3283, 3284, 3285, 3286, 3287, 3288, 3289, 3290, 3291, 3292, 3293, 3294, 3295, 3296, 3297, 3298, 3299, 3300, 3301, 3302, 3303, 3304, 3305, 3306, 3307, 3308, 3309, 3310, 3311, 3312, 3313, 3314, 3315, 3316, 3317, 3318, 3319, 3320, 3321, 3322, 3323, 3324, 3325, 3326, 3327, 3328, 3329, 3330, 3331, 3332, 3333, 3334, 3335, 3336, 3337, 3338, 3339, 3340, 3341, 3342, 3343, 3344, 3345, 3346, 3347, 3348, 3349, 3350, 3351, 3352, 3353, 3354, 3355, 3356, 3357, 3358, 3359, 3360, 3361, 3362, 3363, 3364, 3365, 3366, 3367, 3368, 3369, 3370, 3371, 3372, 3373, 3374, 3375, 3376, 3377, 3378, 3379, 3380, 3381, 3382, 3383, 3384, 3385, 3386, 3387, 3388, 3389, 3390, 3391, 3392, 3393, 3394, 3395, 3396, 3397, 3398, 3399, 3400, 3401, 3402, 3403, 3404, 3405, 3406, 3407, 3408, 3409, 3410, 3411, 3412, 3413, 3414, 3415, 3416, 3417, 3418, 3419, 3420, 3421, 3422, 3423, 3424, 3425, 3426, 3427, 3428, 3429, 3430, 3431, 3432, 3433, 3434, 3435, 3436, 3437, 3438, 3439, 3440, 3443, 3444, 3445, 3446, 3447, 3448, 3449, 3450, 3451, 3452, 3453, 3454, 3455, 3456, 3457, 3458, 3459, 3460, 3461, 3462, 3463, 3464, 3465, 3466, 3467, 3468, 3469, 3470, 3471, 3472, 3473, 3474, 3475, 3476, 3477, 3478, 3479, 3480, 3481, 3482, 3483, 3484, 3485, 3486, 3487, 3488, 3489, 3490, 3491, 3492, 3493, 3494, 3495, 3496, 3497, 3498, 3499, 3500, 3501, 3502, 3503, 3504, 3505, 3506, 3507, 3508, 3509, 3510, 3511, 3512, 3513, 3514, 3515, 3516, 3517, 3518, 3519, 3520, 3521, 3522, 3523, 3524, 3525, 3526, 3527, 3528, 3529, 3530, 3531, 3532, 3533, 3534, 3535, 3643, 3644, 3645, 3646, 3647, 36480066.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3073, 3074, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3197, 3198, 3199, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3216, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3237, 3238, 3239, 3240, 3241, 3242, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 3251, 3252, 3253, 3254, 3255, 3256, 3257, 3258, 3259, 3260, 3261, 3262, 3263, 3264, 3265, 3266, 3267, 3268, 3269, 3270, 3271, 3272, 3273, 3274, 3275, 3276, 3277, 3278, 3279, 3280, 3281, 3282, 3283, 3284, 3285, 3286, 3287, 3288, 3289, 3290, 3291, 3292, 3293, 3294, 3295, 3296, 3297, 3298, 3299, 3300, 3301, 3302, 3303, 3304, 3305, 3306, 3307, 3308, 3309, 3310, 3311, 3312, 3313, 3314, 3315, 3316, 3317, 3318, 3319, 3320, 3321, 3322, 3323, 3324, 3325, 3326, 3327, 3328, 3329, 3330, 3331, 3332, 3333, 3334, 3335, 3336, 3337, 3338, 3339, 3340, 3341, 3342, 3343, 3344, 3345, 3346, 3347, 3348, 3349, 3350, 3351, 3352, 3353, 3354, 3355, 3356, 3357, 3358, 3359, 3360, 3361, 3362, 3363, 3364, 3365, 3366, 3367, 3368, 3369, 3370, 3371, 3372, 3373, 3374, 3377, 3378KINGSWhole Tracts in Kings County0001.00, 0002.00, 0004.02, 0004.03, 0004.05, 0004.06, 0004.07, 0006.02, 0006.03, 0006.04, 0007.01, 0007.02, 0008.00, 0009.01, 0010.01, 9800.00Partial Tracts in Kings County0005.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4017, 4018, 40190011.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 10070012.00--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1015, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1056, 1057, 1058, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 20590016.01--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2013TULAREWhole Tracts in Tulare County0001.01, 0010.05, 0010.06, 0010.07, 0010.08, 0015.01, 0015.02, 0017.05, 0017.06, 0019.01, 0019.02, 0020.02, 0020.03, 0020.04, 0020.06, 0020.08, 0020.09, 0020.10, 0020.11, 0021.00, 0023.02, 0024.01, 0024.03, 0027.01, 0027.02, 0029.04, 0035.03, 0035.04, 0036.01, 0040.00Partial Tracts in Tulare County0001.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2083, 2086, 2087, 2093, 2094, 2095, 20960002.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 20600007.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2017, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 20430008.02--the following census blocks:2051, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 20910009.01--the following census blocks:1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1057, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 30350010.11--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 20280010.12--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4013, 4014, 40150012.00--the following census blocks:1017, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1122, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 11340013.05--the following census blocks:1027, 10280013.06--the following census blocks:1023, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30190014.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 50330016.01--the following census blocks:10000016.02--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3031, 30320017.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2002, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 50160017.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 40320018.00--the following census blocks:1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160022.02--the following census blocks:4002, 4003, 4004, 40090022.03--the following census blocks:2002, 2010, 2018, 3003, 3004, 3014, 4000, 4004, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150023.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 50220023.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120024.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 30480025.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 4000, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4010, 4016, 40220029.01--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1010, 1011, 20280029.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2021, 2025, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40220033.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 10860033.02--the following census blocks:3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 30480034.02--the following census blocks:1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 20430035.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 20270036.02--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 40200037.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 40260038.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2012, 20130039.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 4000, 4001, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 40200039.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1025, 20170045.00--the following census blocks:1026, 1052, 1053, 1054, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4070, 4073 21421. Congressional District 21 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 21FRESNOWhole Tracts in Fresno County0001.00, 0002.00, 0003.00, 0004.00, 0005.01, 0005.02, 0006.01, 0006.02, 0007.01, 0007.02, 0009.01, 0009.02, 0010.00, 0011.00, 0012.01, 0012.02, 0013.01, 0013.03, 0013.04, 0014.07, 0014.08, 0014.09, 0014.11, 0014.15, 0014.16, 0014.17, 0014.18, 0015.00, 0016.00, 0020.00, 0021.00, 0022.00, 0023.00, 0024.00, 0025.01, 0025.02, 0026.01, 0026.02, 0027.01, 0027.02, 0028.00, 0029.03, 0029.04, 0029.05, 0029.06, 0030.01, 0030.03, 0030.04, 0031.02, 0031.03, 0031.04, 0032.01, 0032.02, 0033.01, 0033.02, 0034.01, 0034.02, 0035.00, 0036.00, 0037.01, 0037.02, 0038.04, 0038.05, 0038.07, 0038.08, 0038.09, 0038.11, 0042.05, 0043.02, 0043.03, 0045.03, 0045.04, 0045.05, 0045.06, 0046.01, 0046.02, 0047.03, 0047.04, 0047.05, 0047.06, 0048.01, 0048.02, 0049.01, 0049.02, 0050.00, 0051.00, 0052.02, 0052.03, 0052.04, 0053.01, 0053.02, 0053.04, 0053.05, 0054.03, 0054.05, 0054.06, 0054.07, 0054.08, 0054.09, 0054.10, 0056.05, 0056.08, 0058.04, 0060.01, 0060.02, 0061.01, 0061.02, 0062.01, 0066.02, 0066.03, 0066.05, 0066.06, 0067.00, 0068.02, 0069.00, 0070.02, 0070.03, 0070.04, 0071.01, 0071.02, 0072.02, 0072.03, 0072.04, 0085.01, 0085.03, 0085.04Partial Tracts in Fresno County0014.12--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 10360014.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 20670017.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2037, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 40740018.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 40370038.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110038.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 10090042.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20200042.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4008, 40230042.17--the following census blocks:10060044.04--the following census blocks:10290044.09--the following census blocks:1028, 10290056.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220056.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 40030057.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 10160058.01--the following census blocks:2003, 2004, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220058.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2045, 2046, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2072, 20740062.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 40170063.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 30420063.02--the following census blocks:2019, 2020, 2021, 2038, 2054, 20550065.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4002, 4003, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 40320065.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2008, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2052, 20530073.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3027, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 40360076.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 4000, 4018, 40190086.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1045, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3000, 3004, 3005, 3010, 3011, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022TULAREWhole Tracts in Tulare County0002.03, 0002.04, 0003.02, 0003.03, 0003.04, 0004.01, 0004.02, 0005.01, 0005.02, 0006.00, 0007.02, 0008.01, 0009.02, 0010.09, 0010.10, 0011.01, 0011.02, 0013.03, 0013.04Partial Tracts in Tulare County0001.02--the following census blocks:2082, 2084, 2085, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 20920002.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 30410007.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 20300008.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2052, 2053, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2071, 2072, 2090, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180009.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 10560010.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190010.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40220012.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1121, 1123, 1124, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 11350013.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180013.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 30330014.00--the following census blocks:1019, 1020, 1030, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018, 6019, 6020, 6021, 6022, 6023, 6024, 6025, 6026, 60270016.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160016.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 30300017.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2016, 20170017.03--the following census blocks:2000, 40030018.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028 21422. Congressional District 22 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 22FRESNOWhole Tracts in Fresno County0040.03, 0040.04, 0040.05, 0040.06, 0041.00, 0042.10, 0042.11, 0042.12, 0042.15, 0042.16, 0042.18, 0074.00, 0075.00, 0077.00, 0082.00Partial Tracts in Fresno County0017.00--the following census blocks:2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20360018.00--the following census blocks:3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 30360038.10--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 20020038.12--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110039.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 50320042.08--the following census blocks:30260042.13--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 10030042.14--the following census blocks:4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40220042.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20140073.00--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 50420076.00--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 40530078.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2128, 21290078.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2050, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40110079.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 11820083.04--the following census blocks:1122, 1123, 1133, 1182, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2227, 22350086.00--the following census blocks:1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1046, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015KERNWhole Tracts in Kern County0006.01, 0006.02, 0007.01, 0007.02, 0008.00, 0009.02, 0009.03, 0009.04, 0009.05, 0009.08, 0010.02, 0010.03, 0011.01, 0011.04, 0011.05, 0011.06, 0011.07, 0012.01, 0012.02, 0013.01, 0013.02, 0014.01, 0014.02, 0015.00, 0016.00, 0019.01, 0019.02, 0020.01, 0020.02, 0021.00, 0022.01, 0022.02, 0023.02, 0023.03, 0023.04, 0023.05, 0024.01, 0024.02, 0024.03, 0025.01, 0025.02, 0025.03, 0026.00, 0027.01, 0027.02, 0028.13, 0028.14, 0028.15, 0028.16, 0028.17, 0028.24, 0028.25, 0029.01, 0029.02, 0030.01, 0030.02, 0031.03, 0031.12, 0031.13, 0031.24, 0031.25, 0031.26, 0031.27, 0031.28, 0031.30, 0031.31, 0031.32, 0031.33, 0031.36, 0031.37, 0032.07, 0032.08, 0032.09, 0032.11, 0032.14, 0032.15, 0032.16, 0032.17, 0032.18, 0041.01, 0041.02, 0043.02, 0043.03, 0043.04, 0044.02, 0044.03, 0044.04, 0046.01, 0046.03, 0046.05, 0046.06, 0046.07, 0047.02, 0047.03, 0047.04, 0048.01, 0048.02, 0049.01, 0049.03, 0049.04, 0050.03, 0050.05, 0050.06, 0062.01, 0063.01, 0063.04, 0064.03, 0064.04, 0064.05, 0064.06Partial Tracts in Kern County0001.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10170004.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 10160006.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 20410009.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30100009.07--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 10240009.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 10040009.12--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 20140009.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 10200010.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 30420017.00--the following census blocks:4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4029, 4030, 4031, 40320018.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 30000032.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2019, 20200032.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 10140032.20--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 30380038.26--the following census blocks:30040039.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 22360040.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1064, 1067, 1068, 1069, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120040.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170043.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1045, 1046, 1051, 1052, 1059, 1071, 1072, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 11110045.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2259, 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2267, 2268, 2269, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 2276, 2277, 2278, 2279, 2280, 2281, 2282, 2283, 2284, 2285, 2286, 2287, 2288, 2289, 2290, 2291, 2292, 2293, 2294, 2295, 2296, 2297, 2298, 2299, 2300, 2301, 2302, 2303, 2304, 2305, 2306, 2307, 2308, 2309, 2310, 2311, 2312, 2313, 2314, 2315, 2316, 2317, 2318, 2319, 2320, 2321, 2322, 2323, 2324, 2325, 2326, 2327, 2328, 2329, 2330, 2331, 2332, 2333, 2334, 2335, 2336, 2337, 2338, 2339, 2340, 2341, 2342, 2343, 2344, 2345, 2346, 2347, 2348, 2349, 2350, 2351, 2352, 2353, 2354, 2355, 2356, 2357, 2358, 2359, 2360, 2361, 2362, 2363, 2364, 2365, 2366, 2367, 2368, 2369, 2370, 2371, 2372, 2373, 2374, 2375, 2376, 2377, 2378, 2379, 2380, 2381, 2382, 2383, 2384, 2385, 2386, 2387, 2388, 2389, 2390, 2391, 2392, 2393, 2394, 2395, 2396, 2397, 2398, 2399, 2400, 2401, 2402, 2403, 2404, 2405, 2406, 2407, 2408, 2409, 2410, 2411, 2412, 2413, 2414, 2415, 2416, 2417, 2418, 2419, 2420, 2421, 2422, 2423, 2424, 2425, 2426, 2427, 2428, 2429, 2430, 2431, 2432, 2433, 2434, 2435, 2436, 2437, 2438, 2439, 2440, 2441, 2442, 2443, 2444, 2445, 2446, 2447, 2448, 2449, 2450, 2451, 2452, 2453, 2454, 2455, 2456, 2457, 2458, 2459, 2460, 2461, 2462, 2463, 2464, 2465, 2466, 2467, 2468, 2469, 2470, 2471, 2472, 2473, 2474, 2475, 2476, 2477, 2478, 2479, 2480, 2481, 2482, 2483, 2484, 2485, 2486, 2487, 2488, 2489, 2490, 2491, 2492, 2493, 2494, 2495, 2496, 2497, 2498, 2499, 2500, 2501, 2502, 2503, 2504, 2505, 2506, 2507, 2508, 2509, 2510, 2511, 2512, 2513, 2514, 2515, 2516, 2517, 2518, 2519, 2520, 2521, 2522, 2523, 2524, 2525, 2526, 2527, 2528, 2529, 2530, 2531, 2532, 2533, 2534, 2535, 2536, 2537, 2538, 2539, 2540, 2541, 2542, 2543, 2544, 2545, 2546, 2547, 2548, 2549, 2550, 2551, 2552, 2553, 2554, 2555, 2556, 2558, 2559, 2560, 2561, 2562, 2563, 2565, 2566, 2567, 2568, 2569, 2570, 2571, 2572, 2573, 2574, 2575, 2576, 2577, 2578, 2579, 2580, 2581, 2582, 2583, 2584, 2585, 2586, 2587, 2588, 2589, 2590, 2591, 2592, 2593, 2594, 2595, 2596, 2597, 2598, 2599, 2600, 2601, 2602, 2603, 2604, 2605, 2606, 2607, 2608, 2609, 2610, 2611, 2612, 2613, 2614, 2615, 2616, 2617, 2618, 2619, 2620, 2621, 2622, 2623, 2624, 2625, 2626, 2627, 2628, 2629, 2630, 2631, 2632, 2633, 2634, 2635, 2636, 2637, 2638, 2639, 2640, 2641, 2642, 2643, 2644, 2645, 2652, 2653, 2654, 2655, 2656, 2657, 2658, 2659, 2660, 2661, 2662, 2663, 2664, 2665, 2666, 2667, 2668, 2669, 2670, 2671, 2672, 2673, 2674, 2675, 2676, 2677, 2678, 2679, 2680, 2681, 2682, 2683, 2684, 2685, 2686, 2687, 2688, 2689, 2690, 2691, 2692, 2693, 2694, 2695, 2696, 2697, 2698, 2699, 2700, 2701, 2702, 2703, 2704, 2705, 2706, 2707, 2708, 2709, 27100051.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1015, 1017, 1031, 1032, 1039, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2137, 2138, 21390052.08--the following census blocks:3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3130, 3242, 3253, 3254, 3255, 3256, 3257, 3258, 3259, 3260, 3261, 3262, 3263, 3264, 3265, 3266, 3267, 3268, 3269, 3270, 3271, 3272, 3273, 3274, 3275, 3276, 3277, 3278, 3279, 3280, 3281, 3282, 3283, 3284, 3285, 3286, 3287, 3288, 3289, 3290, 3291, 3292, 3293, 3294, 3295, 3296, 3297, 3298, 3299, 3300, 3301, 3302, 3303, 3304, 3305, 3308, 3312, 3317, 3320, 33240062.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2108, 2213, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 40200063.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070066.00--the following census blocks:3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3196, 3375, 3376KINGSWhole Tracts in Kings County0009.02, 0010.02, 0010.03, 0013.00, 0014.01, 0014.02, 0015.00, 9801.00Partial Tracts in Kings County0005.00--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160011.00--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40100012.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 11120016.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1283, 1284, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1294, 1295, 1296, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 1301, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 1317, 1318, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1322, 1323, 1324, 1325, 1326, 1328, 1329, 1330, 1331, 1332, 1333, 1334, 1335, 1336, 1337, 1338, 1339, 1340, 1341, 1342, 1343, 1352, 1354, 1355, 1356, 1357, 1358, 1359, 1360, 1361, 1362, 1363, 1364, 1365, 1366, 1367, 1368, 1369, 1370, 1371, 1372, 1373, 1374, 1375, 1376, 1377, 1378, 1379, 1380, 1381, 1382, 1383, 1384, 1385, 1386, 1387, 1388, 1389, 1390, 1391, 1392, 1393, 1394, 1395, 1396, 1397, 1398, 1399, 1400, 1401, 1402, 1403, 1404, 1405, 1406, 1407, 1408, 1409, 1410, 1411, 1412, 1413, 1414, 1415, 1416, 1417, 1418, 1419, 1420, 1421, 1422, 1423, 1424, 1425, 1426, 1427, 1428, 1429, 1430, 1431, 1432, 1433, 1434, 1435, 1436, 1437, 1438, 1439, 1440, 1441, 1442, 1443, 1444, 1445, 1446, 1447, 1448, 1449, 1450, 1451, 1452, 1475, 1476, 1477, 1478, 1479, 1480, 1481, 1482, 1483, 1484, 1485, 1486, 1487, 1488, 1489, 1490, 1491, 1492, 1493, 1494, 1495, 1496, 1497, 1498, 1499, 1500, 1501, 1502, 1503, 1504, 1505, 1506, 1507, 1508, 1509, 1510, 1511, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035MADERAPartial Tracts in Madera County0011.00--the following census blocks:1017, 1018, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1057, 3021, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 4079, 4080, 4082, 4083, 4084, 4085, 4086, 4087, 4088, 4089, 4090, 4091, 4092, 4093, 4094, 4095, 4096, 4097, 4098, 4099, 4100, 4101, 4102, 5165, 5213, 5214, 5234, 5237, 5238TULAREWhole Tracts in Tulare County0022.04, 0026.01, 0026.02, 0028.00, 0030.01, 0030.02, 0031.00, 0032.01, 0032.02, 0034.01, 0038.02, 0039.04, 0041.02, 0041.03, 0041.04, 0042.00, 0043.01, 0043.02, 0044.01, 0044.02Partial Tracts in Tulare County0022.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 4000, 4001, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 40210022.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3015, 3016, 3017, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4005, 4010, 40110023.03--the following census blocks:30060023.04--the following census blocks:1035, 1036, 20130024.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 10700025.00--the following census blocks:1027, 1032, 1033, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2071, 2072, 4001, 4002, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 40280029.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 21330029.03--the following census blocks:2004, 2009, 2019, 2020, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30130033.01--the following census blocks:1014, 1084, 1085, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 30420033.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3038, 30390034.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 10500035.01--the following census blocks:20050036.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 40210037.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20200038.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20200039.02--the following census blocks:1030, 1036, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40210039.03--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20210045.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4071, 4072, 4074, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5050, 5051 21423. Congressional District 23 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 23KERNWhole Tracts in Kern County0055.08, 0055.11, 0055.12Partial Tracts in Kern County0053.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1057, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 11400054.02--the following census blocks:3010, 3011, 30120054.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2046, 2047, 2048, 20490055.09--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3037, 3038, 3043, 30450056.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 20850057.00--the following census blocks:2016, 2017, 2018, 2021, 2022, 2023, 21780059.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 20250060.04--the following census blocks:1101, 1102, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1115, 1118, 1119, 1169, 1170, 11710065.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2144, 2145, 2149, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2259, 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2267, 2268, 2269, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 2276, 2277, 2278, 2279, 2280, 2281, 2282, 2283, 2284, 2285, 2286, 2287, 2288, 2289, 2290, 2291, 2292, 2293, 2294, 2295, 2296, 2297, 2298, 2299, 2300, 2301, 2302, 2303, 2304, 2305, 2306, 2307, 2308, 2309, 2310, 2311, 2312, 2313, 2314, 2315, 2316, 2317, 2318, 2319, 2320, 2321, 2322, 2323, 2324, 2325, 2326, 2327, 2328, 2329, 2330, 2331, 2332, 2333, 2334, 2335, 2336, 2337, 2338, 2339, 2340, 2341, 2342, 2343, 2344, 2345, 2346, 2347, 2348, 2349, 2350, 2351, 2352, 2353, 2354, 2355, 2356, 2357, 2358, 2359, 2360, 2361, 2362, 2363, 2364, 2365, 2366, 2367, 2368, 2369, 2370, 2371, 2372, 2373, 2374, 2375, 2376, 2377, 2378, 2379, 2380, 2381, 2382, 2383, 2384, 2385, 2386, 2387, 2388, 2389, 2390, 2391, 2392, 2393, 2394, 2395, 2396, 2397, 2398, 2399, 2400, 2401, 2402, 2403, 2404, 2405, 2406, 2407, 2408, 2409, 2410, 2411, 2412, 2413, 2414, 2415, 2416, 2417, 2418, 2419, 2420, 2421, 2422, 2423, 2424, 2425, 2426, 2427, 2428, 2429, 2430, 2431, 2432, 2433, 2434, 2435, 2436, 2437, 2438, 2439, 2440, 2441, 2442, 2443, 2444, 2445, 2446, 2447, 2448, 2449, 2450, 2451, 2452, 2453, 2454, 2455, 2456, 2457, 2458, 2459, 2460, 2461, 2462, 2463, 2464, 2465, 2466, 2467, 2468, 2469, 2470, 2471, 2472, 2473, 2474, 2475, 2476, 2477, 2478, 2479, 2480, 2481, 2482, 2483, 2484, 2485, 2486, 2487, 2488, 2489, 2490, 2491, 2492, 2493, 2494, 2495, 2496, 2497, 2498, 2499, 2500, 2501, 2502, 2503, 2504, 2505, 2506, 2507, 2508, 2509, 2510, 2511, 2512, 2513, 2514, 2515, 2516, 2517, 2518, 2519, 2520, 2521, 2522, 2523, 2524, 2525, 2526, 2527, 2528, 2529, 2530, 2531, 2532, 2533, 2534, 2535, 2536, 2537, 2538, 2539, 2540, 2541, 2542, 2543, 2544, 2545, 2546, 2547, 2548, 2549, 2550, 2551, 2552, 2553, 2554, 2555, 2556, 2557, 2558, 2559, 2560, 2561, 2562, 2563, 2564, 2565, 2566, 2567, 2568, 2569, 2570, 2571, 2572, 2573, 2574, 2575, 2576, 2577, 2578, 2579, 2580, 2581, 2582, 2583, 2584, 2585, 2586, 2587, 2588, 2589, 2590, 2591, 2592, 2593, 2594, 2595, 2596, 2597, 2598, 2599, 2600, 2601, 2602, 2603, 2604, 2605, 2606, 2607, 2608, 2609, 2610, 2611, 2612, 2613, 2614, 2615, 2616, 2617, 2618, 2619, 2620, 2621, 2622, 2623, 2624, 2625, 2626, 2627, 2628, 2629, 2630, 2631, 2632, 2633, 2634, 2635, 2636, 2637, 2638, 2639, 2640, 2641, 2642, 2643, 2644, 2645, 2646, 2647, 2648, 2649, 2650, 2651, 2652, 2653, 2654, 2655, 2656, 2657, 2658, 2659, 2660, 2661, 2662, 2663, 2664, 2665, 2666, 2667, 2668, 2669, 2670, 2671, 2672, 2673, 2674, 2675, 2676, 2677, 2678, 2679, 2680, 2681, 2682, 2683, 2684, 2685, 2686, 2687, 2688, 2689, 2690, 2691, 2692, 2693, 2694, 2695, 2696, 2697, 2698, 2699, 2700, 2701, 2702, 2703, 2704, 2705, 2706, 2707, 2708, 2709, 2710, 2711, 2712, 2713, 2714, 2715, 2716, 2717, 2718, 2719, 2720, 2721, 2722, 2723, 2724, 2725, 2726, 2727, 2728, 2729, 2730, 2731, 2732, 2733, 2734, 2735, 2736, 2737, 2738, 2739, 2740, 2741, 2742, 2743, 2744, 2745, 2746, 2747, 2748, 2749, 2750, 2751, 2752, 2753, 2754, 2755, 2756, 2757, 2758, 2759, 2760, 2761, 2762, 2763, 2764, 2765, 2766, 2767, 2768, 2769, 2770, 2771, 2772, 2773, 2774, 2775, 2776, 2777, 2778, 2779, 2780, 2781, 2782, 2783, 2784, 2785, 2786, 2787, 2788, 2789, 2790, 2791, 2792, 2793, 2794, 2795, 2796, 2797, 2798, 2799, 2800, 2801, 2802, 2803, 2804, 2805, 2806, 2807, 2808, 2809, 2810, 2811, 2812, 2813, 2814, 2815, 2816, 2817, 2818, 2819, 2820, 2821, 2822, 2823, 2824, 2825, 2826, 2827, 2828, 2829, 2830, 2831, 2832, 2833, 2834, 2835, 2836, 2837, 2838, 2839, 2840, 2841, 2842, 2843, 2844, 2845, 2846, 2847, 2848, 2849, 2850, 2851, 2852, 2853, 2854, 2855, 2856, 2857, 2858, 2859, 2860, 2861, 2862, 2863, 2864, 2865, 2866, 2867, 2868, 2869, 2870, 2871, 2872, 2873, 2874, 2875, 2876, 2877, 2878, 2879, 2880, 2881, 2882, 2883, 2884, 2885, 2886, 2887, 2888, 2889, 2890, 2891, 2892, 2893, 2894, 2895, 2896, 2897, 2898, 2899, 2900, 2901, 2902, 2903, 2904, 2905, 2906, 2907, 2908, 2909, 2910, 2911, 2912, 2913, 2914, 2915, 2916, 2917, 2918, 2919, 2920, 2921, 2922, 2923, 2924, 2925, 2926, 2927, 2928, 2929, 2930, 2931, 2932, 2933, 2934, 2935, 2936, 2937, 2938, 2939, 2940, 2941, 2942, 2943, 2945, 2946, 2947, 2948, 2949, 2950, 2951, 2952, 2953, 2954, 2955, 2956, 2957, 2958, 2959, 2960, 2961, 2962, 2963, 2964, 2965, 2966, 2967, 2968, 2969, 2970, 2971, 2972, 2973, 2974, 2975, 2976, 2977, 2978, 2979, 2980, 2981, 2982, 2983, 2984, 2985, 2986, 2987, 2988, 2989, 2990, 2991, 2992, 2993, 2994, 2995, 2996, 2997, 2998, 2999, 3000, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3162, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197, 3198, 3199, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3441, 3442, 3536, 3537, 3538, 3539, 3540, 3541, 3542, 3543, 3544, 3545, 3546, 3547, 3548, 3549, 3550, 3551, 3552, 3553, 3554, 3555, 3556, 3557, 3558, 3559, 3560, 3561, 3562, 3563, 3564, 3565, 3566, 3567, 3568, 3569, 3570, 3571, 3572, 3573, 3574, 3575, 3576, 3577, 3578, 3579, 3580, 3581, 3582, 3583, 3584, 3585, 3586, 3587, 3588, 3589, 3590, 3591, 3592, 3593, 3594, 3595, 3596, 3597, 3598, 3599, 3600, 3601, 3602, 3603, 3604, 3605, 3606, 3607, 3608, 3609, 3610, 3611, 3612, 3613, 3614, 3615, 3616, 3617, 3618, 3619, 3620, 3621, 3622, 3623, 3624, 3625, 3626, 3627, 3628, 3629, 3630, 3631, 3632, 3633, 3634, 3635, 3636, 3637, 3638, 3639, 3640, 3641, 3642LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County9001.02, 9001.03, 9001.04Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County9013.00--the following census blocks:1295, 1296, 1341, 13429100.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 11979110.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2259, 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2267, 2268, 2269, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 2276, 2277, 2278, 2279, 2280, 2281, 2282, 2283, 2284, 2285, 2286, 2287, 2288, 2289, 2290, 2291, 2292, 2293, 2294, 2295, 2296, 2297, 2298, 2299, 2300, 2301, 2302, 2303, 2304, 2305, 2306, 2307, 2308, 2309, 2310, 2311, 2312, 2313, 2314, 2315, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3140, 31419111.00--the following census blocks:1283, 1284, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1296, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 13019800.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040RIVERSIDEWhole Tracts in Riverside County0438.02, 0459.00, 0461.01, 0461.02, 0461.03, 0462.00, 0470.00, 9401.00, 9810.00Partial Tracts in Riverside County0424.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1018, 10190424.12--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1016, 1017, 1021, 20000426.23--the following census blocks:2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160426.24--the following census blocks:2032, 2033, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 20580426.26--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3015, 3016, 3019, 3020, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3029, 3030, 30310427.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 20050427.20--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 10210427.44--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2078, 2079, 20800427.45--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3019, 3020, 30210435.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 10350438.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30160438.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3001, 3002, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3039, 3041, 30420438.10--the following census blocks:2001, 2002, 2003, 20200438.12--the following census blocks:4023, 4024, 4030, 4033, 4034, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4050, 40650438.20--the following census blocks:20190438.22--the following census blocks:1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1031, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1063, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 10760438.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 4022, 40230438.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 40330441.03--the following census blocks:1000, 10010441.04--the following census blocks:1001, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1025, 1036, 1037, 1038, 10420469.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3195, 3196, 3197, 3198, 3199, 3200, 3212, 3342, 3343, 3344, 3345, 3346, 3347, 3348, 3349, 3350, 3351, 3352, 3361, 3362, 3363, 3364, 3365, 3366, 3367, 3368, 3369, 3370, 3374, 3375, 3376, 3379, 3380, 3381, 3386, 3387, 3388, 3389, 3390, 3391, 3392, 3393, 3394, 3397, 3398, 3399, 3400, 3401, 3402, 3403, 3404, 3405, 3406, 3407, 3408, 3409, 3410, 3411, 3412, 3413, 3414, 3415, 3416, 3417, 3418, 3419, 3420, 3421, 3422, 3423, 3424, 3425, 3426, 3427, 3428, 3430, 3431, 3432, 3433, 3435, 3436, 3437, 3438, 3439, 3440, 3441, 3442, 3443, 3444, 3458, 34590490.01--the following census blocks:2005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30100490.02--the following census blocks:2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20130513.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007SAN BERNARDINOWhole Tracts in San Bernardino County0073.05, 0073.06, 0073.07, 0074.04, 0074.11, 0085.01, 0085.02, 0087.05, 0087.08, 0087.09, 0087.10, 0087.11, 0087.12, 0087.13, 0087.14, 0087.15, 0087.16, 0088.00, 0089.01, 0091.09, 0091.19, 0091.20, 0091.21, 0091.22, 0091.23, 0091.24, 0091.25, 0091.26, 0091.27, 0091.28, 0091.29, 0091.30, 0091.31, 0091.32, 0091.33, 0091.34, 0091.35, 0091.36, 0091.37, 0091.38, 0091.39, 0093.00, 0094.00, 0095.01, 0095.02, 0097.08, 0097.09, 0097.12, 0097.13, 0097.14, 0097.17, 0097.18, 0097.19, 0097.20, 0097.21, 0097.22, 0097.23, 0097.24, 0097.25, 0097.26, 0097.27, 0098.00, 0099.06, 0099.08, 0099.10, 0099.11, 0099.12, 0099.13, 0099.14, 0099.15, 0099.16, 0099.17, 0099.18, 0100.09, 0100.10, 0100.11, 0100.12, 0100.14, 0100.15, 0100.16, 0100.19, 0100.21, 0100.22, 0100.23, 0100.24, 0100.27, 0100.28, 0100.29, 0100.30, 0100.31, 0100.32, 0100.33, 0100.34, 0100.35, 0100.36, 0100.37, 0100.38, 0100.39, 0100.40, 0100.41, 0100.42, 0103.00, 0104.10, 0104.13, 0104.17, 0104.19, 0104.20, 0104.24, 0104.27, 0104.28, 0104.29, 0104.30, 0104.35, 0104.36, 0107.00, 0108.03, 0108.04, 0108.06, 0109.03, 0109.04, 0109.05, 0109.06, 0110.03, 0110.04, 0112.03, 0112.04, 0112.05, 0112.06, 0113.00, 0114.04, 0114.05, 0114.06, 0114.07, 0114.08, 0116.01, 0116.02, 0117.00, 0118.01, 0118.02, 0119.00, 0120.01, 0120.02, 0121.01, 0121.03, 0121.05, 0121.06, 0123.00, 0250.00, 0251.00, 9401.00, 9802.00Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County0045.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2019, 2020, 20210061.02--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 20010072.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20130072.02--the following census blocks:2047, 20520073.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 30290073.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 30300078.00--the following census blocks:1035, 1036, 1038, 1039, 1055, 1058, 1059, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4016, 40170079.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20040083.01--the following census blocks:50200083.02--the following census blocks:3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3013, 30140084.03--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170084.06--the following census blocks:10000086.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 40180086.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 20980104.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1132, 1147, 1149, 1150, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 12130104.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 10050104.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 10560104.25--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1013, 1015, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1082, 1088, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2259, 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2267, 2268, 2269, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 22760104.26--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2045, 2046, 2059, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2123, 21240104.31--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3149, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 31860104.32--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1061, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1145, 1152, 1153, 1157, 1158, 1161, 11620108.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 20270110.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1060, 1064, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20230111.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4047, 4048, 40490111.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 30270115.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111 21424. Congressional District 24 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 24SANTA BARBARAPartial Counties in Congressional District 24SAN LUIS OBISPOWhole Tracts in San Luis Obispo County0105.04, 0105.05, 0105.06, 0106.02, 0106.03, 0107.01, 0107.03, 0107.07, 0109.02, 0109.03, 0109.04, 0110.01, 0110.02, 0111.01, 0111.03, 0111.04, 0111.05, 0112.01, 0112.02, 0113.00, 0114.00, 0115.01, 0115.05, 0116.00, 0117.04, 0117.05, 0117.06, 0118.00, 0119.01, 0119.03, 0119.04, 0120.01, 0120.02, 0121.02, 0122.01, 0122.02, 0123.02, 0123.05, 0123.06, 0124.03, 0124.04, 0124.05, 0124.06Partial Tracts in San Luis Obispo County0103.01--the following census blocks:2113, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2251, 2257, 2258, 22590127.05--the following census blocks:1006, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1059, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4021, 4022, 4024, 4025, 4026, 40280127.06--the following census blocks:1040, 1041, 1042, 1044, 1052, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 30140127.08--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1283, 1284, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1294, 1295, 1296, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 1301, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 1317, 1318, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1322, 1323, 1324, 1325, 1326, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, 1331, 1332, 1333, 1334, 1335, 1336, 1337, 1338, 1339, 1340, 1341, 1342, 1343, 1344, 1345, 1346, 1347, 1348, 1349, 1350, 1351, 1352, 1353, 1354, 1355, 1356, 1357, 1358, 1359, 1360, 1361, 1362, 1363, 1364, 1365, 1366, 1367, 1368, 1369, 1370, 1371, 1372, 1373, 1374, 1375, 1376, 1377, 1378, 1379, 1380, 1381, 1382, 1383, 1384, 1385, 1386, 1387, 1388, 1389, 1390, 1391, 1392, 1393, 1394, 1395, 1396, 1397, 1398, 1399, 1400, 1401, 1402, 1403, 1404, 1405, 1406, 1407, 1408, 1409, 1410, 1411, 1412, 1413, 1414, 1415, 1416, 1417, 1418, 1419, 1420, 1421, 1422, 1423, 1424, 1425, 1426, 1427, 1428, 1429, 1430, 1431, 1432, 1433, 1434, 1435, 1436, 1437, 1438, 1439, 1440, 1441, 1442, 1443, 1444, 1445, 1446, 1447, 1448, 1449, 1450, 1451, 1452, 1453, 1454, 1455, 1456, 1457, 1458, 1459, 1460, 1461, 1462, 1463, 1464, 1465, 1466, 1467, 1468, 1469, 1470, 1471, 1472, 1473, 1474, 1475, 1476, 1477, 1478, 1479, 1480, 1481, 1482, 1483, 1484, 1485, 1486, 1487, 1488, 1489, 1490, 1491, 1492, 1493, 1494, 1495, 1496, 1497, 1498, 1499, 1500, 1501, 1502, 1503, 1504, 1505, 1506, 1507, 1508, 1509, 1510, 1511, 1512, 1513, 1514, 15150130.00--the following census blocks:1096, 1097, 1099, 1103, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1179, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 20960131.00--the following census blocks:1029, 1030, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 10409900.00--the following census blocks:0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011, 0012, 0013, 0014VENTURAWhole Tracts in Ventura County0011.01, 0011.02, 0012.02, 0013.04, 0014.01, 0015.07, 0015.08, 0015.09, 0015.10, 0015.11, 0016.02, 0018.01, 0019.01, 0021.02, 0023.01, 0024.00, 0026.00, 0027.00, 0094.00, 0095.00, 9800.00Partial Tracts in Ventura County0009.01--the following census blocks:1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20150009.02--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 20450009.03--the following census blocks:1027, 1028, 2014, 2055, 2056, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 50080010.02--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2001, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 30260012.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 30300012.04--the following census blocks:1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1035, 1038, 10390013.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 10510013.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 20330014.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1025, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170015.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190020.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110022.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40060023.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080025.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40080028.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1041, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1078, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 50160036.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 10030096.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 20349901.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003, 0011, 0012, 0013 21425. Congressional District 25 consists of the following:Whole Counties in Congressional District 25IMPERIALPartial Counties in Congressional District 25RIVERSIDEWhole Tracts in Riverside County0435.09, 0435.12, 0436.01, 0436.02, 0437.03, 0438.13, 0438.18, 0438.21, 0439.00, 0440.00, 0441.01, 0441.02, 0442.00, 0443.00, 0445.05, 0445.07, 0445.09, 0445.10, 0445.15, 0445.16, 0445.17, 0445.18, 0445.23, 0449.07, 0449.16, 0449.17, 0449.18, 0449.19, 0449.21, 0449.22, 0449.23, 0449.24, 0449.25, 0449.26, 0449.27, 0449.29, 0449.30, 0449.31, 0449.32, 0449.33, 0449.34, 0451.03, 0451.09, 0451.10, 0451.14, 0451.15, 0451.16, 0451.18, 0451.19, 0451.20, 0451.26, 0451.28, 0451.29, 0452.07, 0452.09, 0452.12, 0452.13, 0452.14, 0452.16, 0452.17, 0452.22, 0452.24, 0452.26, 0452.28, 0452.33, 0452.34, 0452.35, 0453.02, 0453.03, 0453.05, 0453.06, 0455.01, 0455.02, 0456.06, 0456.10, 0456.11, 0456.12, 0456.13, 0456.14, 0456.15, 0456.16, 0456.17, 0456.18, 0456.19, 0457.03, 0457.04, 0457.06, 0457.07, 0457.08, 0457.09, 0472.01, 0472.02, 0491.01, 0491.02, 0494.00, 0495.01, 0495.02, 0513.01, 0514.01, 0514.02, 9404.00, 9406.00, 9409.00, 9415.00Partial Tracts in Riverside County0427.44--the following census blocks:2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 20770427.45--the following census blocks:1010, 1011, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1055, 1056, 10570433.04--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 40210433.11--the following census blocks:2004, 2005, 2006, 20070435.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20210435.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 10350435.17--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1038, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180435.18--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 20020435.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1015, 10160435.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 20290435.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 20050435.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060437.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180437.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170438.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20180438.09--the following census blocks:3000, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3040, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 30780438.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 30320438.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4031, 4032, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 40640438.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 20250438.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1046, 1054, 1062, 1064, 1065, 1066, 10670438.23--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 3003, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 40210438.24--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1017, 20140441.03--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190441.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 10560444.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 3000, 3031, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4079, 4080, 4081, 4082, 4083, 4084, 4085, 4086, 4087, 4088, 4089, 4090, 4091, 4092, 4093, 4094, 4095, 4096, 4097, 4098, 4099, 4100, 4101, 4102, 4103, 4104, 4105, 4106, 4107, 4108, 4109, 4110, 4111, 4112, 4113, 4114, 4115, 4116, 4117, 4118, 4119, 4120, 4121, 4122, 4123, 4124, 4125, 4126, 41270444.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2058, 2060, 2061, 20660444.05--the following census blocks:3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3022, 3024, 3025, 3027, 30420445.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 20600445.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1101, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 11520445.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2110, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 21790446.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4009, 4010, 4011, 40120447.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 10160449.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 30550449.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4014, 4015, 40160449.28--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160450.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 30420451.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 40210451.22--the following census blocks:2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 20280451.23--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20120451.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 20380451.25--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40090451.27--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20150469.00--the following census blocks:3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3188, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3216, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3237, 3238, 3239, 3240, 3241, 3242, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 3251, 3252, 3253, 3254, 3255, 3256, 3257, 3258, 3259, 3260, 3261, 3262, 3263, 3264, 3265, 3266, 3267, 3268, 3269, 3270, 3271, 3272, 3273, 3274, 3275, 3276, 3277, 3278, 3279, 3280, 3281, 3282, 3283, 3284, 3285, 3286, 3287, 3288, 3289, 3290, 3291, 3292, 3293, 3294, 3295, 3296, 3297, 3298, 3299, 3300, 3301, 3302, 3303, 3304, 3305, 3306, 3307, 3308, 3309, 3310, 3311, 3312, 3313, 3314, 3315, 3316, 3317, 3318, 3319, 3320, 3321, 3322, 3323, 3324, 3325, 3326, 3327, 3328, 3329, 3330, 3331, 3332, 3333, 3334, 3335, 3336, 3337, 3338, 3339, 3340, 3341, 3353, 3354, 3355, 3356, 3357, 3358, 3359, 3360, 3371, 3372, 3373, 3377, 3378, 3382, 3383, 3384, 3385, 3395, 3396, 3429, 3434, 3445, 3446, 3447, 3448, 3449, 3450, 3451, 3452, 3453, 3454, 3455, 3456, 34570513.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 20429410.01--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 20189411.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 30039412.00--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008SAN BERNARDINOWhole Tracts in San Bernardino County0104.33, 0104.34Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County0104.02--the following census blocks:1097, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1148, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1214, 1215, 12160104.15--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 40380104.22--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1057, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 20390104.25--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1081, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 2215, 22160104.26--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 2034, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 21220104.31--the following census blocks:3089, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3150, 3151, 3152, 31530104.32--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1159, 116021426. Congressional District 26 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 26LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County1344.21, 1344.22, 1344.23, 1344.24, 1351.02, 1351.15, 1352.01, 1352.02, 1352.04, 1352.05, 1370.00, 1372.03, 1373.01, 1373.02, 1374.01, 1374.02, 8002.04, 8002.05, 8002.06, 8003.24, 8003.25, 8003.28, 8003.33, 8003.34, 8003.37, 8003.38, 9012.09, 9012.10, 9012.15, 9012.16, 9201.04, 9201.16, 9201.18, 9201.19Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County1343.02--the following census blocks:2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20141343.03--the following census blocks:3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 40121351.13--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20071372.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30128001.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2021, 2023, 20248001.03--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 10198001.04--the following census blocks:1037, 1038, 10748002.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 30208003.35--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30088003.36--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 20029009.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 21279009.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2037, 2040, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2105, 2106, 21079010.13--the following census blocks:2014, 20159011.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 20349011.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3001, 3002, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3016, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 30339012.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1018, 1020, 10219102.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 10229102.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20249103.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 20279201.02--the following census blocks:1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3074, 3075, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3134, 3138, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3198, 3205, 3206, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3216, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3238, 3239, 3242, 32529201.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1096VENTURAWhole Tracts in Ventura County0003.02, 0003.03, 0003.04, 0004.00, 0005.00, 0006.00, 0007.01, 0007.02, 0008.00, 0029.01, 0029.05, 0030.10, 0030.11, 0030.13, 0031.01, 0031.02, 0032.01, 0033.01, 0033.02, 0036.08, 0036.13, 0036.14, 0036.15, 0036.16, 0036.17, 0037.00, 0038.01, 0038.02, 0039.01, 0039.02, 0040.00, 0041.01, 0042.00, 0043.04, 0043.05, 0044.00, 0045.03, 0045.04, 0045.05, 0045.07, 0045.08, 0046.00, 0047.04, 0047.10, 0047.11, 0047.15, 0047.16, 0047.17, 0049.01, 0049.02, 0050.02, 0050.04, 0050.05, 0050.06, 0052.02, 0052.03, 0052.04, 0052.05, 0053.04, 0053.05, 0053.06, 0053.07, 0053.08, 0054.01, 0054.03, 0054.04, 0055.02, 0055.03, 0055.04, 0056.01, 0056.02, 0057.00, 0058.01, 0058.03, 0058.04, 0059.01, 0059.06, 0059.07, 0059.08, 0059.09, 0059.10, 0059.11, 0060.00, 0061.01, 0061.02, 0062.00, 0063.01, 0063.02, 0064.00, 0065.00, 0066.00, 0067.00, 0068.00, 0069.00, 0070.00, 0071.00, 0072.01, 0072.02, 0074.02, 0074.03, 0074.06, 0075.08, 0075.10, 0076.07, 0076.09, 0076.10, 0076.11, 0076.12, 0076.13, 0086.01, 0086.02, 0087.00, 0088.00, 0089.00, 0091.00, 0092.00, 0093.00, 0097.00Partial Tracts in Ventura County0009.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1021, 1026, 1028, 1036, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 20030009.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2025, 2026, 20270009.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2057, 3000, 3001, 3012, 30130010.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 2000, 2002, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 40200012.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 30150012.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1029, 1030, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 10460013.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 10330013.03--the following census blocks:1013, 1019, 10230014.02--the following census blocks:1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 10330015.06--the following census blocks:2006, 30130020.00--the following census blocks:1000, 30000022.00--the following census blocks:2000, 40000023.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 20030025.00--the following census blocks:3009, 3010, 30110028.00--the following census blocks:1033, 1035, 1040, 1042, 1043, 1050, 1051, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1076, 1077, 1079, 10800036.18--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 30350073.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1096, 1097, 1098, 10990074.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150075.06--the following census blocks:10100075.07--the following census blocks:10060075.09--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110075.11--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 10290075.15--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 10200075.16--the following census blocks:2015, 2016, 20170076.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 40260077.00--the following census blocks:1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1058, 10680084.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 20000085.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 20190096.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 20039901.00--the following census blocks:0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010 21427. Congressional District 27 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 27LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County1066.03, 1066.41, 1066.42, 1066.45, 1066.46, 1092.00, 1093.00, 1097.00, 1098.00, 1111.00, 1114.01, 1114.02, 1153.02, 1154.01, 1154.03, 1154.04, 1173.02, 1311.00, 1312.00, 1313.00, 1314.00, 1318.02, 1319.00, 1320.01, 1320.02, 1321.01, 1323.02, 9003.01, 9005.01, 9005.04, 9005.05, 9005.06, 9005.08, 9005.09, 9005.10, 9006.02, 9006.06, 9006.07, 9006.08, 9006.09, 9006.10, 9006.11, 9007.01, 9007.03, 9007.04, 9007.05, 9008.04, 9008.05, 9008.06, 9008.07, 9008.08, 9010.03, 9010.07, 9010.08, 9010.09, 9010.10, 9010.11, 9010.12, 9010.14, 9012.14, 9012.18, 9102.10, 9102.14, 9102.15, 9102.16, 9102.17, 9102.18, 9103.02, 9104.01, 9104.04, 9104.05, 9105.01, 9105.02, 9105.04, 9105.05, 9106.01, 9106.02, 9106.05, 9106.06, 9106.07, 9106.08, 9107.06, 9107.07, 9107.12, 9107.13, 9107.14, 9107.15, 9107.16, 9107.17, 9107.18, 9107.19, 9107.20, 9107.21, 9108.07, 9200.13, 9200.15, 9200.16, 9200.17, 9200.18, 9200.20, 9200.28, 9200.29, 9200.30, 9200.31, 9200.34, 9200.35, 9200.38, 9200.39, 9200.40, 9200.41, 9200.42, 9200.44, 9200.45, 9200.46, 9200.47, 9200.48, 9200.49, 9200.50, 9201.09, 9201.10, 9201.11, 9201.12, 9201.14, 9201.15, 9201.20, 9201.21, 9202.00, 9203.12, 9203.13, 9203.14, 9203.22, 9203.26, 9203.28, 9203.29, 9203.30, 9203.31, 9203.32, 9203.34, 9203.38, 9203.39, 9203.40, 9203.41, 9203.42, 9203.43, 9800.04, 9800.22Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County1066.43--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1009, 1011, 10131112.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 20111112.02--the following census blocks:1011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 30201113.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 10131113.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 10191151.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30171151.04--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 10131152.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30191153.01--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40071173.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 10081310.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 20021310.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 20051310.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1014, 10151318.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1012, 1013, 1014, 10151321.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30101323.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20101327.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30161329.00--the following census blocks:20009009.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 11169009.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2038, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2108, 21099010.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20139011.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20059011.02--the following census blocks:1018, 3000, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3015, 3017, 3025, 30269012.17--the following census blocks:1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 10439013.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1283, 1284, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1294, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 1301, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 1317, 1318, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1322, 1323, 1324, 1325, 1326, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, 1331, 1332, 1333, 1334, 1335, 1336, 1337, 1338, 1339, 1340, 13439100.02--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 30309102.11--the following census blocks:10039102.12--the following census blocks:1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 2000, 2001, 2005, 2020, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 20499102.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 10669103.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 10129107.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 10719108.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1092, 1093, 1094, 11329108.08--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20129108.09--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 10059108.14--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2020, 2021, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2042, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2078, 2079, 20839108.15--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3017, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 31999110.01--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1101, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1127, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1140, 1141, 1147, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3109, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3127, 3131, 3138, 31399111.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1294, 1295, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 30419200.43--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20169201.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1033, 3065, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197, 3199, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3207, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3237, 3240, 3241, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 32519201.06--the following census blocks:10959203.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 10289800.03--the following census blocks:1006, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 10599800.08--the following census blocks:1007 21428. Congressional District 28 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 28LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County3001.00, 3002.00, 3005.01, 4304.00, 4305.01, 4305.02, 4306.00, 4307.01, 4307.21, 4307.23, 4307.24, 4308.01, 4308.02, 4308.03, 4316.00, 4317.01, 4318.00, 4319.00, 4320.01, 4320.02, 4322.01, 4322.02, 4329.01, 4336.01, 4336.02, 4600.01, 4600.02, 4601.01, 4602.00, 4603.01, 4603.02, 4604.01, 4605.01, 4605.02, 4606.01, 4607.00, 4610.00, 4611.00, 4612.00, 4613.00, 4614.00, 4615.01, 4615.02, 4619.01, 4619.02, 4620.01, 4620.02, 4621.00, 4622.01, 4622.02, 4623.01, 4623.02, 4624.00, 4625.00, 4626.00, 4627.00, 4628.00, 4629.00, 4630.00, 4631.03, 4632.00, 4633.00, 4634.00, 4635.00, 4636.01, 4636.02, 4637.00, 4638.00, 4639.00, 4640.00, 4641.01, 4641.02, 4642.00, 4800.02, 4800.11, 4800.12, 4801.01, 4801.02, 4802.01, 4802.02, 4803.02, 4803.03, 4803.04, 4804.00, 4805.00, 4806.01, 4806.02, 4807.02, 4807.03, 4807.04, 4808.02, 4808.03, 4808.04, 4809.01, 4809.02, 4809.03, 4810.01, 4810.02, 4811.01, 4811.02, 4811.03, 4812.01, 4812.03, 4813.00, 4814.01, 4814.03, 4814.04, 4815.00, 4816.03, 4816.04, 4816.05, 4816.06, 4817.11, 4817.12, 4817.13, 4817.14, 4818.00, 4819.01, 4819.02, 4820.01, 4820.02, 4821.01, 4821.02, 4822.01, 4822.02, 4823.01, 4823.03, 4823.04, 4824.01, 4824.03, 4824.04, 4825.02, 4825.03, 4825.21, 4826.00, 4827.01, 4827.02, 4828.01Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County1831.01--the following census blocks:2004, 20063005.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30094002.05--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1032, 1038, 1041, 10614002.09--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2014, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2028, 2029, 2030, 20314004.04--the following census blocks:2014, 2015, 2016, 2019, 2030, 20334005.01--the following census blocks:1020, 1021, 10224016.01--the following census blocks:2004, 20054313.00--the following census blocks:2004, 2005, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30084314.00--the following census blocks:1016, 20024315.01--the following census blocks:1003, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30104315.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 4000, 4001, 40024321.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30094321.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5010, 50114325.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20064329.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20184608.00--the following census blocks:1016, 2025, 2026, 20284609.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4008, 40114616.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 40164617.00--the following census blocks:2022, 2023, 2024, 20254825.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1011, 1013, 1014, 2000, 20025300.07--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 30105304.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 30159108.15--the following census blocks:3040, 3041, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3069, 3099, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197, 31989110.01--the following census blocks:3037, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3107, 3108, 3110, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3120, 3128, 3129, 31309304.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2054, 2058, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197, 3198, 3199, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3216, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3237, 3238, 3239, 3240, 3241, 3242, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 3251, 3252, 3253, 3254, 3255, 3256, 3257, 3258, 3259, 3260, 3261, 3262, 3263, 3264, 3265, 3266, 3267, 3268, 3269, 3270, 3271, 3272, 3273, 3274, 3275, 3276, 3277, 32789800.36--the following census blocks:1005SAN BERNARDINOWhole Tracts in San Bernardino County0008.04, 0008.08, 0008.12, 0008.13, 0008.14, 0008.15, 0008.16, 0008.17, 0008.18, 0008.19, 0008.20, 0020.11, 0020.13, 0020.14, 0020.15, 0020.17, 0020.18, 0020.23, 0020.25, 0020.49, 0092.01Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County0020.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2016, 20170020.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 20020020.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 10210020.27--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120020.28--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180020.35--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070020.40--the following census blocks:10000020.41--the following census blocks:20010020.42--the following census blocks:10110020.51--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060021.05--the following census blocks:3000, 30010027.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10020092.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048 21429. Congressional District 29 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 29LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County1021.03, 1021.04, 1021.05, 1033.00, 1041.03, 1041.05, 1041.08, 1042.01, 1042.03, 1042.04, 1043.10, 1043.21, 1043.22, 1044.01, 1044.03, 1044.04, 1045.00, 1046.10, 1046.20, 1047.01, 1047.03, 1047.04, 1048.21, 1048.22, 1048.23, 1048.24, 1060.10, 1060.20, 1061.11, 1061.12, 1061.13, 1061.14, 1064.03, 1064.05, 1064.06, 1064.07, 1064.08, 1065.10, 1065.20, 1066.04, 1066.48, 1066.49, 1070.10, 1070.20, 1091.00, 1094.00, 1095.00, 1096.01, 1096.03, 1096.04, 1171.01, 1171.02, 1172.01, 1172.02, 1173.03, 1174.04, 1174.05, 1174.07, 1174.08, 1175.10, 1175.20, 1175.30, 1190.01, 1190.03, 1190.04, 1192.01, 1192.02, 1193.10, 1193.20, 1193.40, 1193.41, 1193.42, 1194.00, 1197.00, 1198.01, 1198.02, 1199.00, 1200.10, 1200.20, 1200.30, 1201.03, 1201.04, 1201.05, 1201.06, 1201.07, 1201.08, 1203.00, 1204.00, 1210.10, 1210.20, 1211.01, 1211.02, 1212.10, 1212.21, 1212.22, 1216.00, 1218.01, 1218.02, 1219.00, 1220.00, 1221.20, 1221.21, 1221.22, 1222.00, 1224.10, 1224.20, 1230.10, 1230.20, 1231.03, 1231.04, 1232.03, 1232.04, 1232.05, 1232.06, 1233.01, 1233.03, 1233.04, 1234.10, 1234.20, 1235.10, 1235.20, 1236.01, 1236.02, 1237.00, 1238.00, 1239.01, 1239.02, 1240.00, 1241.02, 1241.03, 1241.04, 1241.05, 1242.01, 1242.03, 1242.04, 1243.00, 1244.00, 1245.00, 1249.02, 1249.03, 1251.01, 1251.02, 1252.00, 1253.10, 1253.21, 1253.22, 1254.03, 1254.04, 1255.01, 1255.02, 1256.00, 1271.02, 1271.03, 1271.04, 1272.10, 1272.20, 1273.00, 1274.00, 1275.20, 1276.03, 1276.04, 1276.05, 1276.06, 1277.11, 1277.12, 1278.03, 1278.04, 1278.05, 1278.06, 1279.10, 1279.20, 1281.01, 1281.02, 1282.10, 1282.20, 1283.02, 1283.03, 1284.00, 1286.01, 1431.01, 1431.02, 3201.01, 3201.02, 3202.01, 3202.02, 3203.00, 9800.21Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County1021.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 2005, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20241032.01--the following census blocks:1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 20111032.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 10341041.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3022, 3023, 30261173.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30071246.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30071247.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40061254.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30081285.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 40021286.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 30231321.02--the following census blocks:1000, 20161432.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20111433.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 20141434.02--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 20021436.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 10111436.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1006, 10079304.00--the following census blocks:2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 22019800.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017 21430. Congressional District 30 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 30LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County1011.10, 1011.22, 1012.20, 1012.21, 1012.22, 1013.00, 1014.00, 1031.01, 1031.02, 1034.01, 1034.02, 1871.01, 1873.00, 1881.00, 1882.01, 1882.02, 1883.00, 1891.01, 1891.02, 1892.01, 1892.02, 1893.00, 1894.00, 1895.01, 1895.02, 1896.00, 1897.02, 1897.03, 1897.04, 1898.01, 1898.02, 1899.03, 1899.04, 1899.05, 1899.06, 1899.07, 1901.01, 1901.02, 1902.01, 1902.02, 1903.02, 1903.03, 1904.01, 1904.02, 1905.10, 1905.20, 1907.01, 1907.02, 1908.01, 1908.02, 1909.01, 1909.02, 1910.00, 1911.10, 1911.20, 1912.01, 1912.03, 1912.04, 1913.01, 1913.02, 1914.10, 1914.20, 1915.00, 1916.10, 1916.20, 1917.10, 1917.20, 1918.10, 1918.20, 1919.01, 1919.02, 1920.01, 1920.02, 1923.00, 1924.10, 1924.20, 1944.01, 1944.02, 1945.00, 1951.00, 1952.01, 1952.02, 1953.00, 1954.00, 1955.00, 1956.00, 1957.20, 1958.03, 1958.04, 1959.01, 1959.02, 1973.00, 1974.10, 1974.20, 1975.00, 2110.00, 2140.00, 2141.00, 2144.00, 2145.01, 2145.03, 2145.04, 2145.05, 2146.00, 2147.00, 2148.00, 2149.02, 2149.03, 2149.04, 2151.01, 2151.02, 2162.01, 2163.01, 2163.02, 3003.01, 3004.00, 3006.01, 3006.02, 3007.01, 3007.02, 3008.00, 3009.01, 3009.02, 3010.00, 3011.00, 3012.03, 3012.04, 3012.05, 3012.06, 3013.00, 3014.00, 3015.01, 3015.02, 3016.01, 3016.02, 3017.01, 3017.02, 3018.01, 3018.02, 3019.01, 3019.02, 3020.02, 3020.03, 3020.04, 3021.02, 3021.03, 3021.04, 3022.01, 3022.02, 3023.01, 3023.02, 3024.01, 3025.03, 3025.04, 3025.05, 3025.06, 3101.00, 3102.01, 3102.02, 3103.00, 3104.00, 3105.01, 3106.01, 3106.02, 3107.01, 3107.03, 3107.04, 3107.05, 3108.00, 3109.00, 3110.00, 3111.00, 3112.00, 3113.00, 3114.00, 3115.00, 3116.01, 3116.02, 3117.00, 3118.01, 3118.02, 7001.01, 7001.02, 7002.00, 7003.00, 7004.00, 7005.01, 7005.02, 9108.10, 9800.01, 9800.09, 9800.20, 9800.26, 9800.39Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County1021.07--the following census blocks:1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2010, 20231032.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 20091032.02--the following census blocks:10001041.24--the following census blocks:2001, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3024, 30251437.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30181864.01--the following census blocks:2008, 20091871.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 20291872.00--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20151926.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 20031927.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2010, 20111941.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20101941.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 30021942.00--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1011, 1012, 1013, 10141957.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3006, 30071958.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1011, 10121959.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 20021972.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2002, 3001, 3002, 30031990.02--the following census blocks:2008, 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 20422060.10--the following census blocks:1000, 10012115.00--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30122117.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30082127.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30122161.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 3000, 3001, 30022162.02--the following census blocks:1002, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20053005.03--the following census blocks:10114608.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2027, 20294609.00--the following census blocks:4000, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4009, 4010, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 50074616.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4004, 4005, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40154617.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2026, 20279102.13--the following census blocks:1038, 1051, 1067, 10689107.09--the following census blocks:10379108.04--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 11339108.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 10129108.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 10199108.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2077, 2080, 2081, 2082, 20849108.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 2003, 2004, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3049, 3050, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3111, 3112, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 32129200.43--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 10469304.00--the following census blocks:1027, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 21969800.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025 21431. Congressional District 31 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 31LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County4002.07, 4002.08, 4003.04, 4004.02, 4004.03, 4006.02, 4006.03, 4006.05, 4008.01, 4010.01, 4010.02, 4011.01, 4011.02, 4012.01, 4012.02, 4012.03, 4013.03, 4013.04, 4013.11, 4013.12, 4015.00, 4016.02, 4024.03, 4024.04, 4024.05, 4025.03, 4025.04, 4028.03, 4028.04, 4029.02, 4029.03, 4029.04, 4030.00, 4033.17, 4033.18, 4034.01, 4034.02, 4034.03, 4034.04, 4034.07, 4034.08, 4034.09, 4035.00, 4036.01, 4037.02, 4037.03, 4037.21, 4037.22, 4038.01, 4038.02, 4039.01, 4039.02, 4040.00, 4041.00, 4042.01, 4042.03, 4043.01, 4043.02, 4044.01, 4044.02, 4045.01, 4045.03, 4045.04, 4046.00, 4053.01, 4053.02, 4054.00, 4055.00, 4056.00, 4057.01, 4057.02, 4058.00, 4059.00, 4060.00, 4061.01, 4061.03, 4062.01, 4063.00, 4064.13, 4065.00, 4066.01, 4066.02, 4067.01, 4067.02, 4068.01, 4071.01, 4071.02, 4072.01, 4072.02, 4073.01, 4073.02, 4074.00, 4075.01, 4075.02, 4076.01, 4077.02, 4078.01, 4079.01, 4079.02, 4080.03, 4080.04, 4080.05, 4080.06, 4081.34, 4081.35, 4081.36, 4089.00, 4300.03, 4300.04, 4300.05, 4301.01, 4301.02, 4302.00, 4303.01, 4303.02, 4309.01, 4309.02, 4310.02, 4310.03, 4310.04, 4311.00, 4312.00Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County4002.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2026, 2027, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30124004.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30134005.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 10364016.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30154025.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20164028.01--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1020, 1021, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 30204033.16--the following census blocks:10144033.27--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 10794047.03--the following census blocks:2009, 20114069.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 60084070.01--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30094070.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 20304076.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40074077.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30054078.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30104081.33--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 30024081.37--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3005, 3006, 30074081.41--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30124088.00--the following census blocks:2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 30184090.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 40464313.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30044314.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015SAN BERNARDINOWhole Tracts in San Bernardino County0002.03, 0002.05, 0002.07, 0002.08, 0003.04, 0003.05, 0003.06, 0003.07, 0003.08, 0004.03, 0004.04, 0005.01, 0005.03, 0006.03, 0006.04, 0006.05, 0006.06, 0019.01Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County0002.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 2020, 2024, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 30070004.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4015, 4017, 4018, 40190005.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3032, 30330017.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 40050019.11--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170122.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 20350122.02--the following census blocks:1006, 1007 21432. Congressional District 32 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 32LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County1081.01, 1081.02, 1081.03, 1081.04, 1082.02, 1082.03, 1082.04, 1112.04, 1112.05, 1112.06, 1113.04, 1131.01, 1131.02, 1132.11, 1132.12, 1132.13, 1132.31, 1132.32, 1132.34, 1132.35, 1132.37, 1132.38, 1132.39, 1133.01, 1133.03, 1133.22, 1133.23, 1133.24, 1134.23, 1134.24, 1134.25, 1134.26, 1134.27, 1134.28, 1151.03, 1152.03, 1152.04, 1287.03, 1287.04, 1288.01, 1288.02, 1289.10, 1310.24, 1316.00, 1317.01, 1317.02, 1325.01, 1325.02, 1330.00, 1331.01, 1331.02, 1340.01, 1340.02, 1341.01, 1341.03, 1341.04, 1342.01, 1343.04, 1343.05, 1343.06, 1345.20, 1345.21, 1345.22, 1347.10, 1347.20, 1348.01, 1348.02, 1349.01, 1349.04, 1349.05, 1349.06, 1349.07, 1351.11, 1351.16, 1371.03, 1371.04, 1375.01, 1375.02, 1375.04, 1380.00, 1390.01, 1392.00, 1393.01, 1393.02, 1393.03, 1394.01, 1394.02, 1395.02, 1395.04, 1395.05, 1395.06, 1396.00, 1397.01, 1397.03, 1397.04, 1397.05, 1398.01, 1398.02, 1411.01, 1411.02, 1412.01, 1412.02, 1413.03, 1413.04, 1413.05, 1413.06, 1414.00, 1415.00, 1416.00, 1417.00, 1433.02, 1434.01, 1435.00, 1436.02, 1436.06, 1438.01, 1438.02, 1439.01, 1439.02, 1943.00, 2611.02, 2611.03, 2611.04, 2612.00, 2621.00, 2622.00, 2623.01, 2623.02, 2623.03, 2624.00, 2625.01, 2626.01, 2626.04, 2627.04, 2627.06, 2628.02, 2640.00, 2641.02, 2641.03, 2643.03, 2643.04, 2643.06, 2654.10, 2654.20, 2655.21, 2655.22, 2674.03, 2674.04, 2674.05, 2674.06, 8004.06, 8004.10, 8004.11, 8004.12, 8005.04, 8005.06, 9800.17, 9800.19, 9800.23, 9800.24, 9901.00Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County1066.43--the following census blocks:1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30181112.01--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30121112.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 20221113.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 40001113.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20231151.01--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 10121151.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 3000, 3001, 40001152.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 10101153.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30081246.00--the following census blocks:1012, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30111247.00--the following census blocks:3007, 30081254.02--the following census blocks:10141285.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2008, 2009, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40061286.02--the following census blocks:3014, 30151310.21--the following census blocks:2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20121310.22--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20041310.23--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 10231318.01--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1016, 10171323.01--the following census blocks:2001, 2002, 20031327.00--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 20091329.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20161343.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30101343.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30141351.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1008, 10091372.02--the following census blocks:2000, 20041432.00--the following census blocks:1009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30131433.01--the following census blocks:1010, 2011, 20121434.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2003, 2004, 20051436.03--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20121436.05--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 10051437.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20051941.01--the following census blocks:20021941.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 3000, 3001, 30031942.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30112643.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30042655.23--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20052655.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20142673.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2002, 20032675.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10052675.04--the following census blocks:1000, 10018001.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1024, 2009, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20228001.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20108001.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 11018002.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 10238003.35--the following census blocks:3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 40278003.36--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20129203.03--the following census blocks:1005, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 10429902.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003, 0004VENTURAWhole Tracts in Ventura County0075.05, 0075.12, 0075.13, 0078.00, 0079.01, 0079.03, 0079.04, 0080.01, 0080.02, 0080.04, 0080.05, 0081.01, 0082.01, 0082.02, 0083.02, 0083.03, 0083.04, 0083.07, 0083.08, 0084.01, 0085.01Partial Tracts in Ventura County0073.00--the following census blocks:10950074.05--the following census blocks:2005, 20060075.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130075.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 40190075.09--the following census blocks:10000075.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170075.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120075.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20140076.14--the following census blocks:2011, 2012, 20150077.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1069, 1070, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30140084.02--the following census blocks:1002, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40080085.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2015, 2016, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033 21433. Congressional District 33 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 33RIVERSIDEPartial Tracts in Riverside County0422.06--the following census blocks:1000, 10090422.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 10090422.12--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 30060422.13--the following census blocks:20100422.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1013, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1039, 1040, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 3000, 30010423.00--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3046, 3047, 30480424.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090509.01--the following census blocks:2000, 20010509.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1007, 1008, 1009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015SAN BERNARDINOWhole Tracts in San Bernardino County0013.11, 0020.29, 0020.31, 0020.37, 0020.38, 0020.39, 0020.43, 0020.44, 0020.45, 0020.46, 0020.47, 0020.48, 0020.50, 0021.07, 0021.11, 0021.12, 0023.06, 0023.07, 0023.08, 0023.09, 0023.10, 0023.11, 0023.12, 0023.13, 0023.14, 0023.15, 0027.03, 0027.05, 0027.06, 0027.07, 0027.08, 0028.01, 0035.03, 0035.05, 0035.06, 0035.07, 0035.09, 0035.10, 0036.03, 0036.07, 0036.09, 0036.11, 0036.12, 0037.00, 0038.01, 0038.03, 0038.04, 0039.00, 0041.01, 0041.03, 0041.04, 0042.01, 0042.02, 0043.01, 0043.02, 0044.01, 0044.03, 0044.04, 0045.05, 0045.07, 0045.09, 0045.10, 0045.11, 0045.12, 0046.01, 0046.03, 0046.04, 0047.00, 0048.00, 0049.01, 0049.02, 0051.01, 0051.02, 0052.00, 0053.00, 0054.00, 0055.01, 0055.02, 0056.01, 0056.02, 0057.01, 0058.00, 0061.01, 0062.01, 0062.03, 0062.04, 0063.01, 0063.03, 0063.04, 0064.01, 0064.02, 0065.01, 0065.02, 0066.01, 0066.03, 0066.04, 0067.00, 0070.01, 0070.02, 0071.04, 0071.05, 0071.06, 0071.07, 0071.08, 0071.10, 0071.11, 0071.12, 0074.07, 0074.08, 0074.09, 0074.10, 0074.12, 0076.03, 0076.04, 0076.05, 0076.06, 0079.03, 0079.04, 0079.05, 0080.01, 0080.03, 0080.04, 0081.00, 0082.01, 0082.02, 0084.02, 0084.04, 0084.05, 0124.00, 0125.00, 9801.00Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County0020.16--the following census blocks:2015, 2018, 20190020.19--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060020.21--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060020.27--the following census blocks:20140020.28--the following census blocks:1017, 1018, 10190020.35--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 40050020.40--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160020.41--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 20290020.42--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 10200020.51--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 10140021.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 30000021.05--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220022.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 4001, 40020022.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 20030024.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1007, 1008, 2001, 20020027.09--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 10570029.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 20010029.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 20030034.01--the following census blocks:10010034.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2008, 20090034.04--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2003, 2004, 20050034.05--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070036.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 20200036.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2014, 20150040.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 30230040.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30240045.03--the following census blocks:1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2002, 2007, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 20220061.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 30210072.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 10140072.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30050073.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 10090073.08--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180078.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1056, 1057, 1060, 1068, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4018, 4019, 40200079.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 20270083.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5021, 50220083.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3012, 30150084.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40110084.06--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20150086.01--the following census blocks:2022, 30130086.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2033, 2034, 2035, 20900092.02--the following census blocks:1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1220, 1221, 12220108.05--the following census blocks:1169, 11740110.02--the following census blocks:1044, 1059, 1061, 1062, 10630111.01--the following census blocks:4045, 4046, 40500111.02--the following census blocks:20300115.00--the following census blocks:1067, 1068, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1102, 1103, 1104 21434. Congressional District 34 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 34LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County1810.00, 1813.00, 1814.00, 1815.00, 1816.00, 1831.03, 1831.04, 1832.20, 1832.21, 1832.22, 1833.00, 1834.01, 1834.02, 1835.10, 1835.20, 1836.10, 1836.20, 1837.01, 1837.02, 1838.10, 1838.20, 1851.01, 1851.02, 1852.02, 1852.03, 1852.04, 1853.10, 1853.20, 1861.00, 1862.01, 1862.02, 1862.03, 1863.01, 1863.02, 1864.03, 1864.04, 1925.10, 1925.20, 1926.20, 1976.00, 1977.00, 1990.01, 1991.10, 1991.20, 1992.01, 1992.02, 1993.00, 1994.00, 1997.00, 1998.01, 1998.02, 1999.00, 2011.10, 2011.20, 2012.00, 2013.01, 2013.02, 2014.01, 2014.02, 2015.01, 2015.03, 2015.04, 2016.01, 2016.02, 2017.00, 2031.00, 2032.00, 2033.00, 2035.00, 2036.01, 2036.02, 2037.10, 2037.20, 2038.00, 2039.00, 2041.10, 2041.20, 2042.00, 2043.00, 2044.10, 2044.20, 2046.00, 2047.00, 2048.10, 2048.20, 2049.10, 2049.20, 2051.10, 2051.20, 2060.20, 2060.50, 2060.51, 2060.52, 2060.53, 2060.54, 2062.01, 2062.02, 2063.01, 2063.02, 2063.03, 2071.01, 2071.02, 2071.03, 2073.04, 2073.05, 2073.06, 2073.07, 2073.08, 2074.00, 2075.01, 2075.02, 2080.01, 2080.02, 2083.01, 2083.02, 2084.01, 2084.02, 2085.01, 2085.02, 2086.10, 2086.20, 2087.10, 2087.20, 2088.01, 2088.02, 2089.02, 2089.03, 2089.04, 2091.03, 2091.04, 2091.05, 2091.06, 2092.01, 2092.02, 2093.00, 2094.01, 2094.02, 2094.03, 2095.10, 2095.20, 2098.10, 2098.20, 2100.10, 2111.21, 2111.22, 2111.23, 2111.24, 2112.01, 2112.02, 2113.10, 2113.20, 2114.10, 2114.20, 2117.03, 2117.04, 2118.02, 2118.03, 2118.04, 2119.10, 2119.21, 2119.22, 2121.01, 2121.02, 2122.02, 2122.03, 2122.04, 2123.03, 2123.04, 2123.05, 2123.06, 2124.10, 2124.20, 2125.01, 2125.02, 2126.10, 2126.20, 2127.01, 2129.00, 2131.00, 2132.01, 2132.02, 2133.10, 2133.20, 2134.01, 2134.02, 2211.10, 2211.20, 2212.20, 2216.02, 2243.10, 2243.20, 5303.01, 5303.02, 5305.00, 5306.03, 5307.00, 5308.01, 5308.02, 5309.01, 5309.02, 5310.00, 5311.01, 5311.02, 5312.01, 5312.02, 5313.01, 5315.02, 5315.03, 5315.04, 5316.02, 5316.03, 5316.04, 5317.01, 5317.02, 5319.01Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County1831.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30131864.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 20111871.02--the following census blocks:2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20241872.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10111926.10--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 30031927.00--the following census blocks:2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20121957.10--the following census blocks:3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 30091958.02--the following census blocks:1007, 1009, 1010, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20071959.03--the following census blocks:10071972.00--the following census blocks:1020, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 30001990.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2011, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 20612060.10--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20112077.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 10052077.12--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20132115.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20132117.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 3000, 30072127.02--the following census blocks:2000, 20052242.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 20105302.02--the following census blocks:1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 10295304.00--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3016, 3017, 30185313.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40115318.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30145319.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30109800.10--the following census blocks:1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1022 21435. Congressional District 35 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 35LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County4002.06, 4017.05, 4017.06, 4017.07, 4018.01, 4018.02, 4019.01, 4019.02, 4020.01, 4020.02, 4021.01, 4021.02, 4022.00, 4023.01, 4023.03, 4023.04, 4024.06, 4026.01, 4026.02, 4027.02, 4027.03, 4027.05, 4027.06Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County4002.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1027, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1039, 1040, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 10724002.09--the following census blocks:2003, 2008, 2009, 20324025.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1016, 10174028.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20054088.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2050, 2051, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30224090.00--the following census blocks:1001RIVERSIDEWhole Tracts in Riverside County0406.11, 0406.17, 0406.19, 0406.20, 0406.21, 0407.01, 0407.02, 0408.06, 0408.07, 0408.08, 0408.09, 0408.12, 0408.13, 0408.14, 0408.15, 0408.16, 0408.21, 0415.00, 0416.01, 0417.03, 0417.04, 0419.06, 0466.01, 0466.02, 0482.00Partial Tracts in Riverside County0406.03--the following census blocks:1038, 10390406.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 40390406.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2004, 2005, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40110406.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3091, 3092, 3093, 30940406.22--the following census blocks:1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 30200407.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20080410.04--the following census blocks:3006, 3012, 3013, 3021, 30220414.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1005, 10060414.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1026, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 20320416.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 20260417.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30050418.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 30030418.12--the following census blocks:10020418.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080419.04--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3013, 30140419.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010SAN BERNARDINOWhole Tracts in San Bernardino County0001.03, 0001.04, 0001.05, 0001.07, 0001.08, 0001.09, 0001.11, 0001.15, 0001.17, 0001.18, 0001.19, 0001.20, 0001.21, 0001.22, 0008.21, 0008.23, 0008.24, 0008.25, 0008.26, 0009.01, 0009.03, 0009.04, 0010.01, 0010.02, 0011.01, 0011.03, 0011.04, 0012.00, 0013.05, 0013.07, 0013.08, 0013.09, 0013.10, 0013.12, 0014.00, 0015.01, 0015.03, 0015.04, 0016.00, 0017.02, 0017.04, 0017.06, 0017.07, 0018.03, 0018.04, 0018.06, 0018.08, 0018.09, 0018.10, 0018.12, 0018.13, 0019.06, 0019.07, 0019.08, 0019.09, 0019.10, 0021.01, 0021.09, 0022.06, 0024.03, 0024.05, 0024.06, 0025.01, 0025.03, 0025.04, 0026.02, 0026.04, 0026.06, 0026.08, 0026.09, 0026.10, 0026.11, 0028.03, 0028.04, 0030.00, 0031.01, 0031.02, 0032.01, 0032.02, 0033.01, 0033.02, 0040.01, 0127.00Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County0002.01--the following census blocks:1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2030, 30050004.01--the following census blocks:3007, 3008, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 4008, 4009, 4014, 4016, 40200005.04--the following census blocks:3030, 30310017.03--the following census blocks:10070019.11--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 3000, 30180021.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20040021.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 10150022.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40080022.07--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 10350024.04--the following census blocks:1004, 1006, 2000, 2003, 2004, 20050029.01--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110029.02--the following census blocks:2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 5000, 5001, 50020034.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40110034.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060034.04--the following census blocks:2001, 2002, 2006, 2007, 2008, 30000034.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 20010036.05--the following census blocks:1001, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 20180036.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2005, 2006, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40070040.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220040.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3025, 3026, 3027, 30280122.01--the following census blocks:1000, 20130122.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008 21436. Congressional District 36 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 36LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County2651.00, 2652.01, 2652.03, 2652.04, 2653.01, 2653.03, 2653.04, 2653.06, 2653.07, 2656.01, 2656.02, 2657.01, 2657.02, 2671.01, 2671.02, 2672.01, 2672.02, 2675.02, 2676.00, 2677.00, 2678.00, 2679.02, 2699.08, 2711.00, 2712.00, 2713.00, 2714.00, 2715.00, 2716.00, 2717.02, 2717.03, 2717.04, 2718.01, 2718.03, 2718.04, 2719.01, 2719.02, 2721.00, 2722.01, 2722.02, 2723.01, 2723.02, 2731.00, 2732.00, 2733.00, 2734.03, 2734.04, 2735.02, 2736.00, 2737.00, 2738.00, 2739.02, 2741.00, 2742.02, 2751.01, 2751.02, 2752.00, 2753.11, 2753.12, 2753.13, 2754.00, 2755.00, 2756.03, 2756.04, 2756.05, 2760.00, 2764.00, 2765.00, 2766.01, 2766.05, 2766.06, 2770.00, 2771.00, 2781.02, 2933.01, 2933.02, 6200.01, 6200.02, 6201.01, 6201.02, 6202.01, 6203.01, 6203.03, 6203.05, 6204.00, 6205.01, 6205.21, 6205.22, 6206.01, 6206.02, 6207.01, 6207.03, 6207.04, 6208.01, 6208.02, 6209.01, 6209.04, 6210.01, 6210.05, 6211.02, 6211.04, 6212.01, 6212.04, 6213.01, 6213.24, 6213.26, 6214.00, 6505.02, 6506.03, 6507.02, 6510.01, 6510.02, 6511.01, 6511.02, 6512.01, 6512.21, 6512.22, 6513.02, 6513.04, 6514.01, 6514.02, 6700.01, 6700.02, 6700.03, 6701.01, 6701.02, 6702.01, 6702.02, 6703.24, 6703.26, 6703.28, 6704.05, 6704.06, 6704.07, 6704.13, 6704.16, 6704.17, 6704.18, 6705.00, 6706.03, 6706.04, 6707.01, 6707.02, 7006.00, 7007.00, 7008.01, 7008.02, 7009.01, 7009.02, 7010.00, 7012.01, 7012.02, 7013.02, 7013.04, 7014.02, 7015.01, 7015.02, 7016.01, 7016.02, 7017.01, 7017.02, 7018.01, 7018.02, 7019.02, 7020.02, 7021.02, 7022.01, 7022.02, 7023.00, 7028.03, 7029.00, 9800.13, 9800.30Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County2643.05--the following census blocks:20122655.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1008, 2000, 20012655.24--the following census blocks:20132673.00--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2001, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30042675.03--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 10112675.04--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20052690.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3001, 3002, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 50052693.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 50102695.00--the following census blocks:30012699.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20072699.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 20022766.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20122766.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 10052772.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20042780.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022, 2023, 20242933.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 20062933.06--the following census blocks:1009, 1018, 10192944.21--the following census blocks:30026503.00--the following census blocks:5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 50106505.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30146506.06--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20116506.07--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 10186507.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20397026.00--the following census blocks:4020, 4021, 4022, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4038, 40397028.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 20337030.03--the following census blocks:2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 20339800.28--the following census blocks:1000, 1061, 1064, 1065, 1068, 1069, 1080, 10819902.00--the following census blocks:0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011, 0012, 0013, 0014, 0015, 0016, 00179903.00--the following census blocks:0008, 0009, 0010 21437. Congressional District 37 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 37LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County2073.03, 2079.01, 2079.02, 2128.00, 2164.01, 2164.02, 2167.00, 2168.00, 2169.01, 2169.02, 2170.01, 2170.02, 2171.01, 2171.02, 2172.00, 2181.10, 2181.20, 2182.10, 2182.20, 2183.00, 2184.00, 2185.00, 2186.00, 2187.01, 2187.02, 2188.00, 2189.00, 2190.10, 2190.20, 2193.00, 2195.00, 2197.00, 2198.00, 2199.01, 2199.02, 2200.00, 2201.00, 2212.10, 2213.02, 2213.03, 2213.04, 2214.01, 2214.02, 2215.00, 2216.01, 2217.10, 2218.10, 2218.20, 2219.00, 2220.01, 2220.02, 2221.00, 2222.00, 2225.00, 2226.00, 2227.00, 2240.10, 2240.20, 2244.10, 2244.20, 2246.00, 2247.01, 2247.02, 2260.01, 2260.02, 2264.10, 2264.20, 2267.01, 2267.02, 2270.10, 2270.20, 2281.00, 2282.10, 2282.20, 2283.10, 2283.20, 2284.10, 2284.20, 2285.00, 2286.00, 2287.10, 2287.20, 2288.00, 2289.00, 2291.00, 2292.00, 2293.00, 2294.10, 2294.20, 2311.00, 2312.10, 2312.20, 2313.01, 2313.02, 2314.00, 2315.00, 2316.01, 2316.02, 2316.03, 2317.10, 2317.20, 2318.00, 2319.01, 2319.02, 2321.10, 2321.20, 2322.00, 2323.00, 2324.01, 2324.02, 2325.00, 2326.01, 2326.02, 2327.01, 2327.02, 2328.00, 2340.01, 2340.02, 2342.00, 2343.01, 2343.02, 2345.01, 2345.02, 2346.00, 2347.00, 2348.00, 2349.01, 2349.02, 2351.00, 2352.01, 2352.02, 2360.01, 2361.01, 2361.02, 2362.03, 2362.04, 2362.05, 2362.06, 2364.00, 2371.01, 2371.02, 2372.01, 2372.02, 2373.00, 2374.01, 2374.02, 2375.00, 2376.00, 2377.10, 2377.20, 2378.00, 2379.00, 2381.00, 2383.10, 2384.00, 2392.01, 2392.02, 2393.10, 2393.20, 2393.30, 2395.01, 2395.02, 2396.01, 2396.02, 2397.01, 2398.01, 2398.02, 2679.01, 2691.00, 2696.01, 2696.02, 2697.00, 2698.00, 2699.03, 2699.05, 2699.06, 2701.01, 2701.02, 2702.00, 2703.00, 7024.00, 7025.01, 7025.02, 7027.00, 7028.01, 7031.00, 7032.00, 9800.38Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County2077.11--the following census blocks:1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 10242077.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 10052127.02--the following census blocks:1014, 1015, 2010, 20112161.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30062162.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20102242.00--the following census blocks:20092380.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 60152382.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 40142383.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30052397.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30092400.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20212400.20--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 30082690.00--the following census blocks:2014, 3000, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 40192693.00--the following census blocks:10002695.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 40142699.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 10032699.09--the following census blocks:2003, 2004, 20057026.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4023, 4024, 4029, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 60187028.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 2000, 2011, 2012, 20157030.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 40257030.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005 21438. Congressional District 38 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 38LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County4033.05, 4033.19, 4033.20, 4033.21, 4033.23, 4033.24, 4033.25, 4033.26, 4033.28, 4047.01, 4047.02, 4048.04, 4048.05, 4048.06, 4049.01, 4049.02, 4049.03, 4050.01, 4050.02, 4051.01, 4051.02, 4052.01, 4052.02, 4052.03, 4081.38, 4081.39, 4081.40, 4082.12, 4082.13, 4083.01, 4083.02, 4083.03, 4084.01, 4084.02, 4085.03, 4085.04, 4085.05, 4086.23, 4086.24, 4086.25, 4086.26, 4086.27, 4086.28, 4086.29, 4086.31, 4087.05, 4087.07, 4087.22, 4087.24, 4087.25, 4091.00, 4323.00, 4324.01, 4324.02, 4325.01, 4326.01, 4326.02, 4327.00, 4328.01, 4328.02, 4331.03, 4332.00, 4333.02, 4333.04, 4333.05, 4333.06, 4333.07, 4334.02, 4334.03, 4335.05, 4335.06, 4338.03, 4338.04, 4339.01, 4339.03, 4340.01, 4340.03, 4340.04, 4341.00, 5001.00, 5002.04, 5003.00, 5004.02, 5004.03, 5004.04, 5005.00, 5006.00, 5007.00, 5008.00, 5009.00, 5300.05, 5300.06, 5301.01, 5301.02, 5302.03, 5302.04, 5320.01, 5320.02, 5321.01, 5321.02, 5322.00, 5323.02, 5323.03, 5323.04, 5334.01, 5334.02, 5334.03, 5336.01, 5336.02, 5336.03, 5337.01, 5337.02, 5337.03, 5338.03, 5338.04, 5338.05, 5338.06, 5343.01, 5343.02, 5344.03, 5344.04, 5344.05, 5344.06, 9800.35Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County4033.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30124033.27--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20054047.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20154069.03--the following census blocks:30004070.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20124070.02--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2023, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 20514076.02--the following census blocks:40014077.01--the following census blocks:1000, 10114078.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 10074081.33--the following census blocks:20024081.37--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30044081.41--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30134087.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30134315.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 10164315.02--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40114321.01--the following census blocks:10084321.02--the following census blocks:1010, 50094325.02--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20124329.02--the following census blocks:2000, 20014825.22--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30125002.02--the following census blocks:50055010.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 20165010.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 30365012.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1009, 1010, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2027, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2037, 20385015.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1011, 1012, 10135016.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1025, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 10335021.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2002, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30145022.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 40235023.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 5002, 5007, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5019, 5020, 5021, 50225300.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 40185302.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 30325313.02--the following census blocks:40105318.00--the following census blocks:30095319.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10025333.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20059800.36--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0117.17, 0218.02, 0218.07, 0218.09, 0218.12, 0218.13, 0218.16, 0218.17, 0218.22, 0218.23, 0218.24, 0218.25, 0218.27, 0218.28, 0218.29, 0218.30, 0218.31, 0218.32, 0219.03Partial Tracts in Orange County0014.03--the following census blocks:1000, 10010015.01--the following census blocks:30090015.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2014, 20150015.07--the following census blocks:30250117.07--the following census blocks:40000117.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 30250117.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1028, 1029, 1030, 10370117.18--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2013, 20190218.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060218.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4017, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 40310218.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2025, 2026, 20270218.21--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110218.26--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1020, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180219.05--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40110219.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 3000, 3001, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40140219.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1010, 2001, 2002, 20030219.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 10170219.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1005, 1008, 10090219.24--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3045, 3056, 3057, 30580864.07--the following census blocks:4002 21439. Congressional District 39 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 39RIVERSIDEWhole Tracts in Riverside County0301.01, 0301.03, 0301.04, 0302.00, 0303.00, 0304.00, 0305.01, 0305.02, 0305.03, 0306.02, 0306.03, 0306.04, 0306.05, 0307.00, 0308.00, 0309.00, 0310.01, 0310.02, 0311.00, 0312.00, 0313.00, 0314.01, 0314.02, 0315.01, 0315.03, 0315.04, 0316.01, 0316.02, 0317.01, 0317.02, 0317.03, 0317.04, 0401.01, 0401.02, 0402.01, 0402.02, 0402.03, 0402.04, 0403.02, 0403.03, 0403.04, 0403.05, 0404.02, 0404.03, 0404.04, 0404.05, 0405.01, 0405.02, 0405.03, 0406.04, 0406.05, 0406.06, 0409.01, 0409.02, 0409.03, 0409.04, 0410.01, 0410.02, 0410.03, 0411.01, 0411.02, 0412.01, 0412.02, 0412.03, 0413.01, 0413.02, 0414.03, 0414.06, 0414.07, 0414.08, 0414.11, 0420.10, 0420.12, 0420.15, 0420.16, 0420.17, 0420.18, 0422.07, 0422.08, 0422.10, 0422.17, 0424.02, 0424.03, 0424.04, 0424.05, 0424.06, 0424.07, 0424.08, 0424.09, 0424.10, 0424.11, 0425.05, 0425.07, 0425.08, 0425.09, 0425.10, 0425.11, 0425.12, 0425.13, 0425.14, 0425.15, 0425.16, 0425.17, 0425.18, 0425.19, 0425.20, 0425.21, 0425.22, 0425.23, 0426.21, 0426.22, 0426.25, 0426.27, 0426.28, 0426.29, 0426.30, 0426.31, 0426.32, 0427.46, 0427.47, 0428.01, 0428.02, 0429.05, 0429.06, 0429.08, 0465.01, 0465.02, 0467.00, 0468.00, 0483.00, 0487.00, 0488.00, 0489.01, 0489.02, 0511.00, 9800.04Partial Tracts in Riverside County0406.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 10370406.16--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2021, 2022, 20230406.18--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 31130406.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 10100407.03--the following census blocks:1008, 10140410.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 30300414.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20080414.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20140414.10--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20070414.12--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 20400414.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1012, 10130414.14--the following census blocks:2009, 20100414.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2010, 3003, 3004, 3014, 3027, 3028, 30290420.03--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090420.04--the following census blocks:1015, 10160420.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3014, 3015, 3017, 30180420.08--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 20220420.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160422.06--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40070422.09--the following census blocks:1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30100422.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40090422.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 30200422.14--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1037, 1038, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180423.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2017, 2027, 2028, 2032, 2033, 30450424.01--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 10340424.12--the following census blocks:1005, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180426.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2017, 2018, 20190426.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2049, 20500426.26--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3013, 3014, 3017, 3018, 3021, 3027, 3028, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 30360427.09--the following census blocks:1014, 3004, 30050427.17--the following census blocks:2008, 20090427.19--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 30340427.20--the following census blocks:3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30240427.28--the following census blocks:1008, 10090427.30--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1047, 10480427.31--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1036, 1055, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150427.32--the following census blocks:3000, 30180427.49--the following census blocks:2000, 3000, 30120427.50--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 10030429.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 40300429.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3010, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150429.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 20440438.22--the following census blocks:10580490.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30110490.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20090509.01--the following census blocks:1000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 20250509.02--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3006, 3011, 3016 21440. Congressional District 40 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 40ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0219.12, 0219.16, 0219.17, 0219.20, 0219.23, 0320.02, 0320.03, 0320.20, 0320.28, 0320.30, 0320.31, 0320.32, 0320.33, 0320.34, 0320.35, 0320.36, 0320.37, 0320.38, 0320.39, 0320.41, 0320.42, 0320.43, 0320.44, 0320.45, 0320.46, 0320.48, 0320.50, 0320.51, 0320.53, 0320.54, 0320.55, 0320.65, 0758.09, 0758.10, 0758.11, 0758.12, 0758.13, 0758.14, 0762.08Partial Tracts in Orange County0218.26--the following census blocks:1012, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 10270219.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 10140219.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40060219.15--the following census blocks:1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130219.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070219.19--the following census blocks:1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 2000, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110219.21--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 30030219.22--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40090219.24--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3010, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3043, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3059, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40090320.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 20340320.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 3000, 3005, 3006, 30100320.13--the following census blocks:1009, 2003, 2013, 30020320.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 4006, 40070320.22--the following census blocks:40000320.27--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20070320.40--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20040320.47--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 40030320.49--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 50120320.57--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160320.64--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120320.66--the following census blocks:2010, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5004, 5005, 5007, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 60080524.19--the following census blocks:2000, 20010524.23--the following census blocks:3006, 30070524.28--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2008, 40060524.30--the following census blocks:7001, 9000, 9001, 9003, 9004, 9005, 9006, 9014, 9015, 9016, 9017, 9018, 9019, 9037, 9038, 9039, 9040, 90410524.37--the following census blocks:5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5020, 5021, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5053, 50540756.04--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 6000, 60010756.05--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 50130758.15--the following census blocks:10060758.16--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20080762.02--the following census blocks:2000, 3000, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30100762.05--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060762.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006RIVERSIDEWhole Tracts in Riverside County0418.03, 0418.04, 0418.06, 0418.07, 0418.08, 0418.09, 0418.10, 0419.09, 0419.10, 0419.12, 0419.13, 0419.14, 0419.15, 0420.07, 0427.08, 0427.11, 0427.14, 0427.16, 0427.24, 0427.33, 0427.38, 0427.39, 0427.40, 0427.41, 0427.42, 0427.43, 0427.48, 0427.51, 0427.52, 0430.01, 0430.03, 0430.05, 0430.06, 0430.07, 0430.08, 0430.09, 0430.10, 0432.06, 0432.09, 0432.10, 0432.11, 0432.27, 0432.28, 0432.29, 0432.70, 0432.71, 0432.72, 0432.74, 0432.76, 0432.78, 0432.79, 0464.01, 0464.02, 0464.03, 0464.04, 0464.05, 0479.01, 0479.02, 0481.00, 0497.01, 0497.02, 0498.00, 0503.01, 0504.01, 0504.02, 0505.02, 0506.00, 0507.02Partial Tracts in Riverside County0406.09--the following census blocks:4031, 40320414.04--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 10160414.05--the following census blocks:10230414.10--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 10130414.13--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120414.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20080414.15--the following census blocks:1009, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 30260416.02--the following census blocks:1005, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 10320417.02--the following census blocks:3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150418.05--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090418.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160418.13--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170419.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180419.05--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2006, 2007, 2008, 20090420.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 30210420.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170420.05--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 30160420.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 40310420.09--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 3008, 3009, 40110427.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120427.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110427.26--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 30350427.28--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 10410427.30--the following census blocks:1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1049, 1050, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 40170427.31--the following census blocks:1005, 1007, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3016, 30170427.32--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 30290427.37--the following census blocks:1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1077, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 10930427.49--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 30240427.50--the following census blocks:1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 20400429.02--the following census blocks:3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3020, 3032, 3033, 3034, 4015, 40310429.03--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 30280429.07--the following census blocks:2033, 2034, 2035, 2045, 2046, 2047, 20480432.35--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1074, 20320432.54--the following census blocks:1019, 1024, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1047, 10480496.00--the following census blocks:2010, 20110503.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060505.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180505.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3009, 30100507.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190512.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1035, 1036, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043 21441. Congressional District 41 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 41LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County5002.03, 5013.01, 5013.02, 5014.00, 5015.03, 5015.04, 5017.00, 5018.02, 5018.03, 5018.04, 5019.00, 5020.03, 5020.04, 5020.05, 5024.01, 5024.02, 5025.00, 5026.02, 5026.03, 5026.04, 5027.00, 5028.01, 5029.01, 5030.00, 5031.03, 5031.04, 5031.05, 5031.06, 5032.01, 5032.02, 5033.01, 5033.02, 5034.01, 5034.02, 5035.01, 5035.02, 5036.01, 5036.02, 5037.01, 5037.02, 5037.04, 5037.05, 5038.01, 5038.02, 5039.01, 5039.02, 5040.01, 5040.02, 5041.01, 5042.00, 5339.01, 5339.02, 5340.01, 5340.02, 5341.01, 5341.02, 5342.01, 5342.02, 5342.03, 5501.01, 5502.01, 5502.02, 5503.01, 5505.01, 5505.02, 5506.01, 5506.02, 5507.00, 5508.01, 5508.02, 5509.01, 5509.02, 5510.01, 5510.02, 5511.01, 5511.02, 5512.01, 5512.03, 5512.04, 5513.00, 5514.01, 5514.02, 5515.01, 5515.02, 5517.00, 5518.01, 5518.02, 5523.01, 5523.02, 5524.00, 5531.00, 5532.01, 5532.02, 5533.00, 5534.00, 5540.01, 5540.02, 5541.01, 5541.05, 5541.06, 5542.01, 5542.03, 5542.04, 5543.01, 5543.02, 5544.03, 5544.04, 5544.05, 5544.06, 5552.02, 5553.00, 5700.01, 5700.02, 5700.03, 5707.01, 5707.03, 5708.00, 5709.01, 5709.02, 5711.01, 5711.02, 5712.02, 5713.00, 5714.00, 5778.00, 9800.12, 9800.34Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County4087.03--the following census blocks:10075002.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 50175010.01--the following census blocks:1000, 20135010.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010, 2018, 3012, 3019, 30215012.00--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2023, 2025, 2026, 2028, 2029, 2034, 2035, 2036, 20395015.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 10235016.00--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 50065021.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3009, 30105022.00--the following census blocks:30155023.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2020, 2025, 5000, 5001, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5008, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5023, 5024, 50255519.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40125520.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30055520.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 20095522.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 30105550.01--the following census blocks:10075550.02--the following census blocks:20105701.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 10105702.04--the following census blocks:10045706.03--the following census blocks:1000, 10085710.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 60085712.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40075720.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 10175736.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 8000, 8001, 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, 8007, 8008, 9000, 9001, 9002, 9003, 9004, 9005, 9006, 90075737.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 40195738.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40105739.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 10235741.00--the following census blocks:30009800.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0011.01, 0011.02, 0011.03, 0012.01, 0012.02, 0013.01, 0013.03, 0013.04, 0014.01, 0014.02, 0014.04, 0015.03, 0015.04, 0016.04, 0017.09, 1100.06, 1100.14, 1101.08Partial Tracts in Orange County0014.03--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20230015.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 30200015.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 40170015.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20230015.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3026, 3027, 30280016.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20130017.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 30000017.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20080117.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 40140218.14--the following census blocks:4005, 4015, 4016, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 40321100.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 3024, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40131100.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30121100.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4020, 40211100.15--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 30261101.13--the following census blocks:2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20241101.17--the following census blocks:4004, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014 21442. Congressional District 42 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 42LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County5715.04, 5718.00, 5719.00, 5722.01, 5722.02, 5730.02, 5730.03, 5730.04, 5731.01, 5731.02, 5732.01, 5732.02, 5733.00, 5734.01, 5734.02, 5734.03, 5740.00, 5742.01, 5742.02, 5743.00, 5744.00, 5745.00, 5746.02, 5748.00, 5749.01, 5749.02, 5750.01, 5750.02, 5751.01, 5751.02, 5751.03, 5752.01, 5752.02, 5753.00, 5754.01, 5754.02, 5758.01, 5758.02, 5758.03, 5759.01, 5759.02, 5760.01, 5762.00, 5763.01, 5763.02, 5764.01, 5764.02, 5764.03, 5765.01, 5765.02, 5765.03, 5766.01, 5766.02, 5767.00, 5768.01, 5768.02, 5769.01, 5769.03, 5769.04, 5770.00, 5771.00, 5772.00, 5773.00, 5774.00, 5775.01, 5775.04, 5776.02, 5776.04, 5776.05, 5776.06, 5779.00, 5781.00, 5990.00, 5991.00, 9800.07, 9800.18Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County5712.01--the following census blocks:20065715.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40095715.05--the following census blocks:2005, 20135720.01--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 40245726.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10025727.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10025736.01--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 5000, 5001, 5002, 50035737.00--the following census blocks:20095739.02--the following census blocks:10145741.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 50115777.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 20015780.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 40199800.06--the following census blocks:1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 10169800.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 10539800.33--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 10819903.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0626.42, 0627.01, 0627.02, 0628.00, 0629.00, 0630.04, 0630.05, 0630.06, 0630.08, 0630.09, 0630.10, 0631.02, 0631.03, 0632.01, 0632.02, 0633.01, 0633.02, 0634.00, 0635.00, 0636.01, 0636.03, 0636.04, 0636.05, 0637.01, 0637.02, 0638.02, 0638.03, 0638.05, 0638.06, 0638.07, 0638.08, 0639.02, 0639.03, 0639.04, 0639.05, 0639.06, 0639.08, 0639.09, 0639.10, 0740.05, 0740.06, 0741.07, 0992.12, 0992.14, 0992.15, 0992.16, 0992.17, 0992.20, 0992.35, 0992.37, 0992.38, 0992.39, 0992.40, 0992.42, 0992.43, 0992.44, 0992.45, 0992.46, 0993.05, 0993.06, 0993.07, 0993.08, 0993.09, 0993.10, 0993.11, 0994.02, 0994.04, 0994.05, 0994.06, 0994.07, 0994.08, 0994.10, 0994.11, 0994.12, 0994.15, 0994.16, 0994.17, 0994.18, 0994.19, 0995.04, 0995.06, 0995.08, 0995.09, 0995.10, 0995.11, 0995.12, 0995.13, 0995.14, 0996.04, 0996.05Partial Tracts in Orange County0626.10--the following census blocks:5021, 5022, 5023, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5049, 5052, 5053, 5054, 5055, 5058, 5059, 5060, 5061, 5062, 5063, 5064, 5065, 5066, 5070, 5071, 5072, 5073, 5074, 5076, 5077, 5078, 5079, 5080, 5081, 5082, 5083, 5084, 5085, 5097, 5098, 5099, 5100, 5101, 5102, 5103, 5104, 51050626.14--the following census blocks:8013, 8014, 8015, 80160626.43--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011, 7012, 7013, 7014, 70150630.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130631.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110740.04--the following census blocks:1008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 40120741.02--the following census blocks:2011, 2012, 30110741.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220741.10--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060741.11--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150755.16--the following census blocks:6077, 6078, 6103, 61040992.41--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20180995.02--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1014, 1016, 1018, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1054, 1055, 1058, 10590996.02--the following census blocks:1010, 1011, 1012, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 20090996.03--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 40270997.02--the following census blocks:2009, 2010, 2011, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20210997.03--the following census blocks:1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 10221100.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3022, 30251100.08--the following census blocks:2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 20171100.12--the following census blocks:4018, 40199901.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011 21443. Congressional District 43 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 43LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County2402.00, 2403.01, 2403.02, 2404.01, 2404.02, 2405.00, 2406.00, 2407.00, 2408.00, 2409.01, 2409.02, 2410.01, 2410.02, 2411.10, 2411.20, 2412.01, 2412.02, 2413.00, 2414.00, 2420.00, 2421.00, 2422.01, 2422.02, 2423.00, 2426.00, 2427.00, 2430.01, 2430.02, 2431.00, 2761.01, 2761.02, 2774.00, 2911.10, 2911.20, 2911.30, 2912.10, 2912.20, 5404.00, 5406.00, 5407.00, 5408.00, 5409.01, 5409.02, 5411.00, 5412.00, 5413.00, 5414.01, 5414.02, 5415.00, 5416.03, 5416.04, 5416.05, 5416.06, 5420.00, 5421.03, 5421.04, 5421.05, 5421.06, 5422.00, 5424.01, 5424.02, 5425.01, 5425.02, 5426.01, 5426.02, 5427.00, 5428.00, 5429.00, 5430.00, 5432.01, 5432.03, 6001.00, 6002.01, 6002.02, 6003.02, 6003.03, 6003.04, 6004.00, 6005.01, 6006.01, 6006.02, 6007.02, 6007.03, 6007.04, 6008.01, 6008.02, 6009.02, 6009.11, 6009.12, 6010.01, 6010.02, 6011.00, 6012.02, 6012.11, 6012.12, 6013.01, 6013.02, 6013.03, 6014.01, 6014.02, 6015.01, 6015.02, 6016.00, 6017.00, 6018.01, 6018.02, 6019.00, 6020.02, 6020.03, 6021.03, 6021.04, 6021.05, 6021.06, 6022.01, 6022.02, 6023.01, 6023.02, 6024.02, 6024.03, 6024.04, 6025.04, 6025.05, 6025.06, 6025.07, 6025.10, 6025.11, 6025.12, 6025.13, 6026.01, 6026.02, 6027.00, 6028.01, 6028.02, 6029.00, 6030.04, 6030.05, 6030.06, 6030.07, 6030.08, 6031.01, 6031.02, 6032.00, 6033.01, 6033.02, 6034.00, 6035.00, 6036.00, 6037.02, 6037.03, 6037.05, 6037.06, 6038.01, 6038.02, 6039.01, 6039.02, 6040.01, 6040.02, 6041.01, 6041.02, 6042.00, 6500.01, 6500.03, 6500.04, 6501.01, 6501.02, 6502.00, 6504.01, 6506.04, 6506.05, 6508.01, 6508.02, 6509.01, 6509.03, 6509.04, 9800.05Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County2380.00--the following census blocks:20002382.00--the following census blocks:2018, 2019, 30132383.20--the following census blocks:30012397.02--the following census blocks:20062400.10--the following census blocks:2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20202400.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30132766.07--the following census blocks:1004, 10052766.08--the following census blocks:10062772.00--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 20082780.01--the following census blocks:1018, 2020, 20212913.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2019, 2020, 2021, 20225410.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1032, 1033, 1035, 10375418.01--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3007, 30085418.02--the following census blocks:1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 10265431.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 5004, 50055433.05--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1028, 1084, 10856503.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 50116505.01--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 2001, 2002, 30056506.06--the following census blocks:1000, 10056506.07--the following census blocks:10006507.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 20387030.02--the following census blocks:3012, 30139800.28--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1062, 1063, 1066, 1067, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094 21444. Congressional District 44 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 44LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County2920.01, 2920.02, 2932.03, 2932.04, 2932.05, 2932.06, 2933.07, 2941.10, 2941.20, 2942.00, 2943.01, 2943.02, 2944.10, 2945.10, 2945.20, 2946.10, 2946.20, 2947.01, 2948.10, 2948.20, 2948.30, 2949.00, 2951.03, 2962.10, 2962.20, 2963.00, 2964.01, 2964.02, 2965.00, 2966.00, 2969.01, 2969.02, 2970.01, 2970.02, 2971.10, 2971.20, 2972.01, 2972.02, 2973.00, 2974.00, 2975.01, 2975.02, 2976.01, 2976.02, 5325.00, 5326.05, 5326.06, 5326.07, 5327.00, 5328.00, 5329.00, 5330.01, 5330.02, 5331.03, 5331.04, 5331.05, 5331.08, 5332.01, 5332.04, 5335.01, 5335.04, 5345.01, 5345.02, 5347.00, 5348.02, 5348.03, 5348.04, 5349.00, 5350.01, 5350.02, 5351.01, 5351.02, 5352.00, 5353.00, 5354.00, 5355.01, 5355.02, 5355.03, 5356.03, 5356.04, 5356.05, 5356.06, 5356.07, 5357.01, 5357.02, 5358.02, 5358.03, 5358.04, 5359.01, 5359.02, 5360.00, 5361.02, 5361.03, 5361.04, 5362.01, 5362.02, 5400.00, 5401.01, 5401.02, 5402.01, 5402.02, 5402.03, 5403.00, 5405.01, 5405.02, 5417.00, 5433.04, 5433.06, 5433.21, 5433.22, 5434.00, 5435.01, 5435.02, 5435.03, 5436.01, 5436.03, 5436.05, 5436.06, 5436.07, 5437.01, 5437.03, 5437.04, 5437.05, 5438.01, 5438.03, 5438.04, 5439.03, 5439.05, 5440.01, 5440.02, 5535.02, 5535.03, 5535.04, 5536.01, 5536.02, 5537.01, 5537.02, 5538.01, 5538.02, 5539.01, 5539.02, 5702.02, 5702.03, 5703.03, 5703.04, 5703.05, 5703.06, 5704.02, 5704.03, 5704.04, 5705.02, 5705.03, 5705.04, 5706.01, 5706.02, 5716.00, 5717.01, 5717.03, 5717.04, 5723.01, 5725.00, 6099.00, 9800.02, 9800.14, 9800.15, 9800.16, 9800.25, 9800.31, 9800.37Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County2913.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30122933.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20132933.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20182944.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 30035333.00--the following census blocks:10015410.03--the following census blocks:1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1034, 1036, 1038, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 20575418.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30095418.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30125431.00--the following census blocks:5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 50235433.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1013, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 10995701.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20125702.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20145706.03--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 30035715.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 10065715.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20125726.00--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40065727.00--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 40105777.00--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30115780.00--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 40049800.11--the following census blocks:1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1033, 10549800.33--the following census blocks:10239903.00--the following census blocks:0007 21445. Congressional District 45 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 45LOS ANGELESWhole Tracts in Los Angeles County5521.00, 5526.01, 5526.02, 5527.00, 5528.00, 5529.00, 5530.00, 5545.11, 5545.12, 5545.13, 5545.14, 5545.15, 5545.16, 5545.17, 5545.18, 5545.19, 5545.21, 5545.22, 5546.00, 5547.00, 5548.01, 5548.02, 5549.00, 5551.05, 5551.06, 5551.07, 5552.11, 5552.12Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County5519.00--the following census blocks:2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4011, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 40175520.01--the following census blocks:2006, 2007, 2008, 3006, 3007, 30085520.02--the following census blocks:2010, 20115522.00--the following census blocks:2004, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 40305550.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40085550.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 20095710.00--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 30085738.00--the following census blocks:1000ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0016.02, 0017.04, 0017.06, 0017.10, 0114.02, 0115.03, 0115.04, 0117.12, 0117.21, 0880.01, 0880.02, 0881.04, 0881.05, 0881.06, 0881.07, 0882.01, 0882.02, 0882.03, 0883.01, 0884.01, 0885.01, 0885.02, 0886.01, 0886.02, 0887.01, 0887.02, 0888.01, 0888.02, 0889.01, 0889.02, 0889.03, 0889.04, 0889.05, 0890.01, 0890.03, 0891.06, 0992.02, 0992.03, 0992.04, 0992.22, 0992.23, 0992.24, 0992.25, 0992.26, 0992.27, 0992.29, 0992.30, 0992.31, 0992.32, 0992.33, 0992.34, 0992.47, 0992.50, 0992.51, 0996.01, 0997.01, 0998.01, 0998.02, 0998.03, 0999.02, 0999.03, 0999.04, 0999.05, 0999.06, 1100.01, 1100.03, 1100.04, 1100.05, 1100.10, 1100.11, 1101.02, 1101.04, 1101.06, 1101.09, 1101.10, 1101.11, 1101.14, 1101.15, 1101.16, 1101.18, 1103.01, 1103.02, 1103.03, 1103.04, 1105.00, 1106.03, 1106.06, 1106.07Partial Tracts in Orange County0015.05--the following census blocks:3007, 3013, 30190016.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 10270017.05--the following census blocks:3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080017.08--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080018.01--the following census blocks:1004, 1014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 40040018.02--the following census blocks:30050110.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 50050112.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080113.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 20300114.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180114.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 10070115.02--the following census blocks:3000, 30070117.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120117.11--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 50050117.14--the following census blocks:10260117.20--the following census blocks:2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30050117.22--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120741.08--the following census blocks:2004, 2016, 20170748.03--the following census blocks:20050761.03--the following census blocks:1003, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 40020868.01--the following census blocks:1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170868.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060875.03--the following census blocks:5004, 5014, 50150876.02--the following census blocks:2008, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 20190878.06--the following census blocks:2006, 20120879.01--the following census blocks:10120879.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170881.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 10560883.02--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110884.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20070884.03--the following census blocks:1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110890.04--the following census blocks:1001, 1003, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 30020891.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30130891.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 20030891.07--the following census blocks:1005, 1010, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1023, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20130992.41--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170995.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1056, 1057, 10600996.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 20000996.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170997.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 30210997.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1003, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30151100.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 30271101.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 20321101.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 40091102.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30081102.02--the following census blocks:2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 50051102.03--the following census blocks:1003, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20121104.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40221104.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30071106.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 40181106.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4008, 4009, 4010, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010 21446. Congressional District 46 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 46ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0019.01, 0019.02, 0019.03, 0111.01, 0111.02, 0116.01, 0116.02, 0117.10, 0117.15, 0117.16, 0741.03, 0741.09, 0742.00, 0743.00, 0744.03, 0744.05, 0745.01, 0745.02, 0746.01, 0746.02, 0747.01, 0747.02, 0748.01, 0748.02, 0748.05, 0748.06, 0749.01, 0749.02, 0750.02, 0750.03, 0750.04, 0751.00, 0752.01, 0752.02, 0753.01, 0753.02, 0753.03, 0754.01, 0754.04, 0754.05, 0758.05, 0758.06, 0758.07, 0758.08, 0759.01, 0759.02, 0760.01, 0760.02, 0761.02, 0761.04, 0761.05, 0762.01, 0762.04, 0863.01, 0863.03, 0863.04, 0863.05, 0863.06, 0864.02, 0864.04, 0864.05, 0864.06, 0865.01, 0865.02, 0866.01, 0866.02, 0867.01, 0867.02, 0868.02, 0869.01, 0869.02, 0869.03, 0870.01, 0870.02, 0871.01, 0871.02, 0871.03, 0871.05, 0871.06, 0872.00, 0873.01, 0873.02, 0874.01, 0874.03, 0874.04, 0874.05, 0875.04, 0875.05, 0876.01, 0877.01, 0877.03, 0877.04, 0878.01, 0878.02, 0878.03, 0878.05, 0891.05, 0992.48, 0992.49, 9800.00Partial Tracts in Orange County0018.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 40050018.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 4000, 5000, 50010110.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 3000, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 60130112.00--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 40190113.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180114.01--the following census blocks:20100114.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 50190115.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 30280117.08--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30130117.09--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 20160117.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2002, 20030117.14--the following census blocks:1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 10380117.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180117.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2001, 2002, 20120117.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070218.10--the following census blocks:2011, 20120218.20--the following census blocks:2022, 2023, 20240218.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 10110219.13--the following census blocks:4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 40240219.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 20120219.18--the following census blocks:10080740.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 20520740.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 30110741.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3012, 3013, 30140741.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 10150741.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 20270741.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 10150741.11--the following census blocks:10000744.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40150744.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 10060748.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090754.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3028, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40110755.04--the following census blocks:1022, 1024, 10250755.05--the following census blocks:3010, 3011, 3033, 30340755.16--the following census blocks:6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6019, 60200756.04--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2004, 2005, 2017, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 6005, 6006, 60070757.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1003, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3006, 30070757.03--the following census blocks:3000, 30070758.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090758.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 10130761.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 10070762.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 40110762.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40070762.06--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30130864.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40080868.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070868.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 60070875.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 50130876.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 5000, 5001, 5002, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 7000, 7001, 70020878.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 40050879.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110879.02--the following census blocks:3001, 3002, 30050881.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 10070883.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 10120884.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10020884.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 10200890.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 30030891.02--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20130891.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060891.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 10291101.13--the following census blocks:2000, 20011102.01--the following census blocks:10151102.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2010, 3000, 3001, 30021102.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 40041104.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1005, 1006, 10071104.02--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30121106.04--the following census blocks:10201106.05--the following census blocks:4006, 4007 21447. Congressional District 47 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 47ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0320.14, 0320.29, 0423.05, 0423.07, 0423.13, 0423.17, 0423.19, 0423.20, 0423.23, 0423.24, 0423.25, 0423.26, 0423.27, 0423.28, 0423.29, 0423.30, 0423.31, 0423.32, 0423.33, 0423.34, 0423.35, 0423.36, 0423.37, 0423.38, 0423.39, 0524.08, 0524.10, 0524.11, 0524.15, 0524.16, 0524.17, 0524.21, 0524.22, 0524.24, 0524.25, 0524.27, 0524.29, 0524.31, 0524.32, 0524.33, 0524.34, 0524.35, 0524.36, 0524.38, 0524.39, 0525.02, 0525.05, 0525.06, 0525.11, 0525.13, 0525.14, 0525.18, 0525.19, 0525.20, 0525.21, 0525.22, 0525.23, 0525.24, 0525.26, 0525.27, 0525.28, 0525.29, 0525.30, 0525.31, 0525.32, 0525.33, 0525.34, 0525.35, 0626.05, 0626.11, 0626.19, 0626.20, 0626.22, 0626.25, 0626.26, 0626.27, 0626.28, 0626.29, 0626.30, 0626.31, 0626.32, 0626.33, 0626.34, 0626.35, 0626.36, 0626.37, 0626.38, 0626.39, 0626.40, 0626.41, 0626.45, 0626.46, 0626.47, 0626.48, 0626.49, 0626.50, 0626.51, 0626.52, 0626.53, 0626.54, 0626.55, 0626.56, 0626.57, 0626.58, 0744.08, 0755.06, 0755.07, 0755.12, 0755.13, 0755.14, 0755.17, 0755.18, 0756.03, 0756.06, 0756.07, 0757.02Partial Tracts in Orange County0219.14--the following census blocks:2008, 2009, 2010, 20110219.24--the following census blocks:3040, 3041, 3042, 30440320.11--the following census blocks:20350320.12--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3008, 30090320.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130320.15--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4008, 40090320.22--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 40140320.27--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30050320.40--the following census blocks:10090320.47--the following census blocks:1000, 10010320.49--the following census blocks:10010421.06--the following census blocks:20230422.01--the following census blocks:1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5037, 5038, 50390422.05--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 40190422.06--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2010, 2011, 20130423.11--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40220423.15--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 50130423.41--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 50090524.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170524.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180524.28--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1021, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4007, 4008, 5000, 50010524.30--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 7000, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011, 7012, 7013, 7014, 7015, 8000, 8001, 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, 8007, 9002, 9007, 9008, 9009, 9010, 9011, 9012, 9013, 9020, 9021, 9022, 9023, 9024, 9025, 9026, 9027, 9028, 9029, 9030, 9031, 9032, 9033, 9034, 9035, 9036, 9042, 9043, 9044, 9045, 9046, 9047, 9048, 9049, 9050, 9051, 9052, 9053, 9054, 9055, 9056, 90570524.37--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 4000, 4001, 4002, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5022, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5050, 5051, 5052, 5055, 5056, 5057, 5058, 5059, 50600626.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5024, 5040, 5041, 5047, 5048, 5050, 5051, 5056, 5057, 5067, 5068, 5069, 5075, 5086, 5087, 5088, 5089, 5090, 5091, 5092, 5093, 5094, 5095, 50960626.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011, 7012, 7013, 7014, 8000, 8001, 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, 8007, 8008, 8009, 8010, 8011, 8012, 8017, 8018, 8019, 8020, 8021, 8022, 8023, 8024, 8025, 8026, 8027, 8028, 80290626.43--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 70070630.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 10160631.01--the following census blocks:1014, 1017, 10180740.03--the following census blocks:10210744.06--the following census blocks:4013, 40140744.07--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20180754.03--the following census blocks:3020, 3024, 3025, 3026, 30270755.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20150755.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3035, 3036, 30370755.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 6009, 6010, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018, 6021, 6022, 6023, 6024, 6025, 6026, 6027, 6028, 6029, 6030, 6031, 6032, 6033, 6034, 6035, 6036, 6037, 6038, 6039, 6040, 6041, 6042, 6043, 6044, 6045, 6046, 6047, 6048, 6049, 6050, 6051, 6052, 6053, 6054, 6055, 6056, 6057, 6058, 6059, 6060, 6061, 6062, 6063, 6064, 6065, 6066, 6067, 6068, 6069, 6070, 6071, 6072, 6073, 6074, 6075, 6076, 6079, 6080, 6081, 6082, 6083, 6084, 6085, 6086, 6087, 6088, 6089, 6090, 6091, 6092, 6093, 6094, 6095, 6096, 6097, 6098, 6099, 6100, 6101, 6102, 6105, 6106, 6107, 6108, 61090756.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 60180756.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30100757.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2001, 3000, 3004, 3005, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 40220757.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30139901.00--the following census blocks:0012, 0013, 0014, 0015, 0016, 0017, 0018, 0019, 0020, 0021, 0022 21448. Congressional District 48 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 48RIVERSIDEWhole Tracts in Riverside County0427.23, 0432.01, 0432.02, 0432.03, 0432.04, 0432.05, 0432.07, 0432.08, 0432.16, 0432.17, 0432.18, 0432.20, 0432.22, 0432.46, 0432.48, 0432.52, 0432.56, 0432.62, 0432.64, 0432.65, 0432.66, 0432.67, 0432.92, 0432.93, 0432.94, 0432.95, 0432.96, 0432.97, 0432.98, 0433.06, 0433.07, 0433.08, 0433.09, 0433.10, 0433.12, 0433.13, 0433.14, 0433.15, 0433.16, 0433.18, 0433.19, 0434.01, 0434.03, 0434.04, 0434.05, 0435.03, 0435.05, 0435.19, 0435.20, 0444.06, 0444.07, 0446.02, 0446.04, 0446.05, 0447.01, 0448.04, 0448.05, 0448.06, 0448.07, 9405.00, 9407.00, 9408.00, 9410.02, 9413.00, 9414.00Partial Tracts in Riverside County0427.20--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 30330427.26--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 10670427.30--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 30210427.37--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 10980427.44--the following census blocks:1016, 10170427.45--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1015, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3017, 3018, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 30290432.35--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1075, 1076, 1077, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2033, 20340432.54--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1033, 1045, 1046, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150433.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 50260433.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2008, 20090435.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 40030435.13--the following census blocks:10290435.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20240435.21--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30040435.22--the following census blocks:1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 10100435.23--the following census blocks:1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110435.24--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170437.01--the following census blocks:1018, 1019, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 10270437.02--the following census blocks:1003, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 10320444.03--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1042, 1046, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3040, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 40290444.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2021, 2022, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2059, 2062, 2063, 2064, 20650444.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3015, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 3026, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 30480445.20--the following census blocks:2057, 2058, 20590445.21--the following census blocks:1044, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1102, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 11120445.24--the following census blocks:2086, 2087, 2097, 2098, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2111, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2165, 21690446.06--the following census blocks:1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 4008, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 40470447.02--the following census blocks:10150449.04--the following census blocks:3000, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3008, 30090449.11--the following census blocks:3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130449.28--the following census blocks:3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3015, 3017, 30180450.00--the following census blocks:30060451.17--the following census blocks:4000, 4013, 4014, 40150451.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 20360451.23--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20230451.24--the following census blocks:2020, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2039, 20400451.25--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3028, 40100451.27--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 10210496.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160503.02--the following census blocks:20140505.01--the following census blocks:3008, 3009, 3010, 3013, 3019, 30200505.03--the following census blocks:30080507.01--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 10620512.00--the following census blocks:1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3007, 3008, 30099410.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20179411.00--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1010, 10119412.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018SAN DIEGOWhole Tracts in San Diego County0185.16, 0185.17, 0185.18, 0185.19, 0190.02, 0191.07, 0191.08, 0191.09, 0192.03, 0192.05, 0192.06, 0192.08, 0192.09, 0192.10, 0194.03, 0194.04, 0194.05, 0194.06, 0195.01, 0195.02, 0195.03, 0196.01, 0196.02, 0197.02, 0199.02, 0199.03, 0199.05, 0200.21, 0200.23, 0200.24, 0200.25, 0200.26, 0200.28, 0200.29, 0200.36, 0200.37, 0200.38, 0200.39, 0200.40, 0200.41, 0200.44, 0201.08, 0201.09, 0202.02, 0202.06, 0202.07, 0202.08, 0202.09, 0202.11, 0202.13, 0202.14, 0203.05, 0203.08, 0206.01, 0210.01, 0210.02Partial Tracts in San Diego County0171.12--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1012, 1013, 10170171.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20100185.22--the following census blocks:1015, 1021, 10220186.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1004, 1012, 1013, 10140190.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 20280191.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160191.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 40250191.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3018, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 30270191.11--the following census blocks:2000, 2009, 2011, 20160193.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120193.04--the following census blocks:2006, 2007, 20080193.05--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 20250197.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20100198.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 10030198.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180198.09--the following census blocks:10000198.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 10420198.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1021, 10220199.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 40070200.17--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3000, 3001, 3002, 30030200.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180200.31--the following census blocks:3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 30170200.32--the following census blocks:20090200.42--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120200.43--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20130201.05--the following census blocks:1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 30020201.06--the following census blocks:1009, 1011, 1013, 1016, 2001, 2004, 20050201.07--the following census blocks:1015, 2001, 2003, 2004, 20050201.10--the following census blocks:2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3016, 3017, 30400201.11--the following census blocks:1015, 2018, 2020, 20210202.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20050203.04--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 40280203.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 20170203.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 30050203.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1008, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1029, 1030, 2021, 2023, 20240203.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1018, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20050204.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 2000, 20010204.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10040205.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 30240206.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4010, 40110207.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2010, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30180207.07--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080207.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1008, 1009, 2003, 2004, 20070208.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1040, 2005, 2006, 2008, 20090209.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 30790209.04--the following census blocks:40250211.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1168, 1169, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 204621449. Congressional District 49 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 49ORANGEWhole Tracts in Orange County0320.58, 0320.59, 0320.61, 0320.62, 0320.63, 0421.07, 0421.08, 0421.09, 0421.11, 0421.12, 0421.13, 0421.14, 0421.15, 0421.16, 0422.03, 0423.12, 0423.40Partial Tracts in Orange County0320.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 10190320.57--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 30060320.64--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 30360320.66--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 5003, 5006, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 6004, 6005, 6006, 60070421.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 20310422.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1044, 1045, 3000, 5033, 5034, 5035, 50360422.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 30380422.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20120423.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30130423.15--the following census blocks:2007, 2008, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 50050423.41--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40069901.00--the following census blocks:0023, 0024, 0025SAN DIEGOWhole Tracts in San Diego County0083.24, 0083.27, 0083.28, 0083.30, 0083.31, 0083.36, 0083.37, 0083.65, 0083.66, 0083.67, 0083.68, 0083.69, 0083.70, 0083.71, 0083.72, 0083.73, 0083.74, 0170.31, 0170.33, 0170.34, 0170.35, 0170.36, 0170.61, 0170.62, 0170.63, 0170.64, 0170.65, 0170.66, 0170.69, 0170.70, 0170.71, 0171.04, 0171.07, 0171.08, 0171.09, 0172.01, 0172.02, 0173.03, 0173.05, 0173.06, 0173.07, 0173.08, 0174.03, 0174.05, 0174.06, 0174.07, 0174.08, 0175.01, 0175.02, 0176.01, 0176.03, 0176.05, 0176.06, 0177.01, 0177.02, 0178.01, 0178.08, 0178.09, 0178.10, 0178.11, 0178.13, 0179.01, 0179.02, 0180.00, 0181.01, 0181.02, 0182.01, 0182.02, 0183.01, 0183.02, 0184.00, 0185.04, 0185.09, 0185.10, 0185.11, 0185.12, 0185.15, 0185.20, 0185.21, 0185.23, 0185.24, 0185.25, 0186.01, 0186.08, 0186.09, 0186.13, 0186.15, 0186.16, 0186.17, 0186.18, 0186.19, 0186.20, 0186.21, 0186.22, 0187.00, 0188.01, 0188.03, 0188.04, 0188.05, 0189.03, 0189.04, 0189.05, 0189.06, 0193.01, 0198.03, 0198.04, 0200.15, 0200.30, 0200.33, 0200.34, 0200.35, 0215.01, 0215.02, 0221.01, 0221.02Partial Tracts in San Diego County0083.05--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 10200083.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 30010083.39--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1032, 1033, 1038, 1039, 1047, 10480083.46--the following census blocks:2002, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 30160083.47--the following census blocks:5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 50110083.48--the following census blocks:3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070083.80--the following census blocks:20020170.18--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20040170.37--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 40030170.56--the following census blocks:1000, 10010171.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 40230171.11--the following census blocks:1030, 1032, 1041, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20220171.12--the following census blocks:1000, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1031, 1032, 1034, 10350171.13--the following census blocks:1003, 1004, 2005, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 20260185.22--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 30130186.12--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20100190.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 40160193.03--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 3003, 30040193.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20050193.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 20240197.01--the following census blocks:1013, 1018, 1019, 1023, 1025, 1026, 2003, 20050198.05--the following census blocks:1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060198.08--the following census blocks:20070198.09--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 30250198.10--the following census blocks:1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 20100198.11--the following census blocks:1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150199.04--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 10180200.17--the following census blocks:2027, 2028, 20290200.19--the following census blocks:30080200.31--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3005, 30060200.32--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 20110200.42--the following census blocks:1006, 10080200.43--the following census blocks:10040203.11--the following census blocks:2022, 2026, 2027, 20289901.00--the following census blocks:0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011, 0012, 0013, 0020 21450. Congressional District 50 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 50SAN DIEGOWhole Tracts in San Diego County0051.01, 0051.02, 0052.02, 0053.01, 0053.02, 0054.01, 0054.02, 0054.03, 0058.02, 0062.00, 0063.00, 0066.00, 0068.01, 0068.02, 0069.00, 0070.02, 0071.00, 0072.00, 0073.02, 0073.03, 0073.04, 0074.01, 0074.02, 0075.01, 0075.02, 0076.01, 0076.02, 0077.01, 0077.02, 0078.00, 0079.05, 0079.07, 0079.08, 0079.10, 0079.11, 0079.12, 0080.02, 0080.03, 0080.06, 0081.01, 0081.02, 0082.01, 0082.02, 0083.01, 0083.03, 0083.06, 0083.07, 0083.10, 0083.11, 0083.13, 0083.43, 0083.44, 0083.45, 0083.49, 0083.50, 0083.51, 0083.52, 0083.53, 0083.55, 0083.56, 0083.57, 0083.58, 0083.59, 0083.60, 0083.61, 0083.62, 0083.63, 0083.64, 0083.75, 0083.76, 0083.77, 0083.78, 0083.79, 0083.81, 0085.01, 0085.02, 0085.03, 0085.04, 0085.05, 0085.06, 0085.07, 0085.09, 0085.10, 0085.11, 0085.12, 0085.13, 0086.00, 0087.01, 0088.00, 0089.01, 0090.00, 0091.01, 0091.02, 0091.03, 0091.04, 0091.07, 0091.08, 0091.09, 0094.00, 0095.04, 0099.01, 0099.02, 0108.00, 0109.00, 0111.00, 0113.00, 0166.06, 0166.09, 0166.10, 0166.13, 0166.14, 0166.15, 0166.17, 0166.18, 0166.20, 0166.21, 0170.06, 0170.09, 0170.14, 0170.20, 0170.22, 0170.39, 0170.40, 0170.41, 0170.43, 0170.44, 0170.45, 0170.46, 0170.47, 0170.48, 0170.49, 0170.50, 0170.51, 0170.52, 0170.53, 0170.54, 0170.55, 0170.57, 0170.58, 0170.59, 0170.60, 0170.67, 0170.68, 0203.12, 0204.01, 0204.05, 0207.06, 0207.10, 0207.11, 0207.12, 0208.05, 0208.06, 0208.12, 0208.13, 0214.01, 0214.02, 0216.00, 0218.00Partial Tracts in San Diego County0047.00--the following census blocks:20050051.03--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060052.01--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20050056.01--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110056.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 20380058.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 20170061.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2025, 20260065.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 30370083.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 20070083.12--the following census blocks:1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 40380083.39--the following census blocks:1030, 1031, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 10460083.46--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30100083.47--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 50040083.48--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120083.80--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 30020089.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20040093.07--the following census blocks:10050095.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1016, 10170102.01--the following census blocks:1009, 10110105.01--the following census blocks:10180106.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2032, 20330110.00--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 20330162.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1072, 10730165.03--the following census blocks:10040166.07--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150166.08--the following census blocks:1000, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 10110166.16--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20220166.19--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30070167.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 10150167.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1007, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3002, 3003, 3006, 3007, 3008, 30090169.01--the following census blocks:1017, 10180170.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160170.18--the following census blocks:20050170.21--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120170.37--the following census blocks:3005, 30060170.56--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20050171.06--the following census blocks:2001, 3002, 3003, 30040171.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 2020, 20210171.12--the following census blocks:1030, 1033, 1036, 10370191.03--the following census blocks:1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120191.05--the following census blocks:2008, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20230191.10--the following census blocks:1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 30330191.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120201.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 10030201.06--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2002, 20030201.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 2000, 20020201.10--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2017, 2018, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 30510201.11--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 30120202.10--the following census blocks:20040203.04--the following census blocks:1000, 40000203.09--the following census blocks:1024, 10270203.10--the following census blocks:2004, 20060203.11--the following census blocks:1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2025, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 20350203.13--the following census blocks:1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1032, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 10710204.03--the following census blocks:1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 20260204.04--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 30150205.00--the following census blocks:3013, 3022, 3025, 3026, 30270206.02--the following census blocks:4007, 4008, 4009, 4012, 40130207.05--the following census blocks:1009, 1010, 1011, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 30210207.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 30010207.08--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 20120208.01--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1026, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 30170208.07--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1023, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1041, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 20239901.00--the following census blocks:0014, 0015, 0016, 0017, 0018, 0019 21451. Congressional District 51 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 51SAN DIEGOWhole Tracts in San Diego County0001.00, 0002.01, 0002.02, 0003.01, 0003.02, 0004.00, 0005.00, 0006.00, 0007.00, 0008.00, 0009.01, 0009.02, 0010.00, 0011.00, 0012.01, 0012.02, 0013.01, 0013.02, 0014.00, 0015.00, 0017.00, 0018.01, 0018.02, 0019.00, 0020.01, 0020.02, 0021.00, 0023.01, 0027.02, 0027.03, 0027.11, 0027.12, 0028.01, 0028.03, 0028.04, 0029.02, 0029.03, 0029.04, 0029.05, 0031.03, 0031.05, 0031.14, 0031.15, 0043.00, 0044.00, 0045.01, 0055.00, 0057.00, 0059.00, 0060.00, 0087.02, 0092.01, 0092.03, 0092.04, 0093.01, 0093.05, 0093.06, 0093.08, 0095.02, 0095.06, 0095.07, 0095.09, 0095.10, 0095.11, 0096.02, 0096.03, 0096.04, 0097.03, 0097.04, 0097.05, 0097.06, 0098.01, 0098.02, 0098.04, 0098.05, 0135.03, 0135.04, 0135.05, 0135.06, 0136.01, 0136.04, 0136.05, 0136.07, 0136.08, 0137.01, 0137.02, 0138.01, 0138.02, 0140.01, 0141.01, 0141.02, 0143.00, 0144.00, 0145.00, 0146.01, 0146.02, 0147.01, 0147.02, 0148.03, 0148.04, 0148.05, 0148.06, 0149.01, 0149.02, 0150.01, 0150.02, 0151.00, 0152.00, 0153.01, 0153.02, 0154.03, 0154.05, 0154.06, 0154.07, 0154.08, 0155.01, 0156.01, 0156.02, 0157.01, 0157.04, 0157.05, 0157.06, 0158.01, 0158.02, 0159.01, 0159.02, 0160.00, 0161.00, 0162.01, 0163.01, 0163.02, 0164.01, 0164.03, 0164.04, 0165.02, 0165.04, 0167.05, 0167.06, 0168.04, 0168.06, 0168.07, 0168.09, 0168.10, 0168.11, 0168.12, 0168.13, 0169.02, 0208.10, 0208.11, 0209.02, 0212.06Partial Tracts in San Diego County0016.00--the following census blocks:4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 40120030.03--the following census blocks:4000, 4003, 4004, 4010, 4011, 4012, 40130031.07--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3003, 30040032.08--the following census blocks:1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 50050032.09--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 30040032.13--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160032.14--the following census blocks:1001, 1005, 30000041.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30230041.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 10120042.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40060046.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 20090052.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1007, 1008, 10210056.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 10040056.02--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 20450058.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2002, 2007, 2013, 20140061.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 20270065.00--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3002, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 30290089.02--the following census blocks:1014, 1015, 1016, 10170093.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 40150095.05--the following census blocks:1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 40060140.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 20220142.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 40080155.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 20280162.02--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1074, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 20110165.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 20160166.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080166.08--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1003, 10040166.16--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 20210166.19--the following census blocks:2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 20130167.03--the following census blocks:2000, 20010167.04--the following census blocks:1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 3000, 3001, 3004, 30050169.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 50160170.10--the following census blocks:1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 10140170.21--the following census blocks:20040208.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1029, 1030, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 30260208.07--the following census blocks:1001, 1002, 1042, 1043, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 20240209.03--the following census blocks:2131, 21760209.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 40570212.02--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 2000, 20010212.04--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2023, 2024, 2025, 20260212.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 30190213.05--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1029, 2012, 2013, 2014 21452. Congressional District 52 consists of the following:Partial Counties in Congressional District 52SAN DIEGOWhole Tracts in San Diego County0022.01, 0022.02, 0023.02, 0024.01, 0024.02, 0025.01, 0025.02, 0026.01, 0026.02, 0027.05, 0027.07, 0027.08, 0027.09, 0027.10, 0030.01, 0030.04, 0031.01, 0031.08, 0031.09, 0031.11, 0031.12, 0031.13, 0032.01, 0032.02, 0032.04, 0032.07, 0032.11, 0032.12, 0033.01, 0033.03, 0033.04, 0033.05, 0034.01, 0034.03, 0034.04, 0035.01, 0035.02, 0036.01, 0036.02, 0036.03, 0038.00, 0039.01, 0039.02, 0040.00, 0048.00, 0049.00, 0050.00, 0100.01, 0100.03, 0100.04, 0100.05, 0100.09, 0100.10, 0100.11, 0100.12, 0100.13, 0100.15, 0100.16, 0100.17, 0100.18, 0100.19, 0101.03, 0101.04, 0101.06, 0101.07, 0101.09, 0101.10, 0101.11, 0101.12, 0102.02, 0103.00, 0104.01, 0104.02, 0105.02, 0116.01, 0116.02, 0117.00, 0118.01, 0118.02, 0119.02, 0120.02, 0120.03, 0121.01, 0121.02, 0122.00, 0123.02, 0123.03, 0123.04, 0124.01, 0124.02, 0125.01, 0125.02, 0126.00, 0127.00, 0128.00, 0129.00, 0130.00, 0131.02, 0131.03, 0131.04, 0132.03, 0132.04, 0132.05, 0132.06, 0133.01, 0133.02, 0133.03, 0133.06, 0133.07, 0133.08, 0133.09, 0133.12, 0133.15, 0133.16, 0133.17, 0133.18, 0133.19, 0133.20, 0133.21, 0133.22, 0133.23, 0133.24, 0133.25, 0133.26, 0133.27, 0134.01, 0134.09, 0134.11, 0134.12, 0134.14, 0134.15, 0134.16, 0134.17, 0134.18, 0134.20, 0134.21, 0134.22, 0134.23, 0134.24, 0134.25, 0139.03, 0139.05, 0139.06, 0139.07, 0139.08, 0139.09, 0211.01, 0213.02, 0213.04, 0213.06, 0219.00, 0220.00Partial Tracts in San Diego County0016.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 30100030.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4001, 4002, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4014, 40150031.07--the following census blocks:1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1022, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3007, 30080032.08--the following census blocks:5006, 5007, 50080032.09--the following census blocks:2007, 20080032.13--the following census blocks:10080032.14--the following census blocks:1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 20060041.01--the following census blocks:3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 30220041.02--the following census blocks:1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 10210042.00--the following census blocks:1009, 10110046.00--the following census blocks:2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 20140047.00--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 20190051.03--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 20200052.01--the following census blocks:10220102.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 30180105.01--the following census blocks:1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 10190106.01--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036, 20370110.00--the following census blocks:10000140.02--the following census blocks:1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 20210142.00--the following census blocks:3016, 30170155.02--the following census blocks:1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 10290211.02--the following census blocks:1033, 1072, 1073, 1083, 1084, 1091, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1170, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 20450212.02--the following census blocks:2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 20370212.04--the following census blocks:1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 20320212.05--the following census blocks:2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 20040213.05--the following census blocks:1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 202321453. In the event that a census tract or census block is not listed, is listed more than once, or is only partially accounted for, and, as a result, an ambiguity or dispute arises regarding the location of a boundary line, the Secretary of State and the elections official of each county shall rely on the detailed maps prepared by the Assembly Committee on Elections and the Senate Committee on Elections and Constitutional Amendments.21454. This chapter shall become operative only if Assembly Constitutional Amendment 8 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is approved by the voters and takes effect, and subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XXI of the California Constitution, as added by that constitutional amendment, becomes operative.21455. This chapter shall remain in effect only until a new map of congressional districts is certified by the Citizens Redistricting Commission pursuant to Section 2 of Article XXI of the California Constitution and, as of that date, is repealed.SEC. 2. The redistricting plan enacted by this act is severable. If any part of this congressional redistricting plan or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other parts or applications that can be given effect without the invalid part or application.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order that congressional redistricting plans may be implemented as soon as possible, and to ensure the rights of all Californians to equal protection of the laws, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.